,title,company,salary,location,job_desc
0,Developer Strategy PM for Data Science and Data Engineering,Microsoft,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Microsoft is on a mission to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. Our culture is centered on embracing a growth mindset, a theme of inspiring excellence, and encouraging teams and leaders to bring their best each day. In doing so, we create life-changing innovations that impact billions of lives around the world. You can help us to achieve our mission.

The Australian subsidiary is looking for a motivated, self-driven individual to drive Azure adoption with the local professional developer community—specifically in the area of data science, data engineering. In this role you will drive awareness and engagement with the professional developer community, both as the local developer audience expert and as an Azure subject-matter expert. You love to engage technically 1:1 with customers and also build strategies and programs that can drive engagement and impact at scale. The right candidate brings a technical leadership mindset with experience engaging with developers and data scientists across both open-source and Microsoft AI + ML technologies. This candidate must have a strong data engineering or machine learning background and love to collaborate with a team of fun, tech-minded humans!

Azure Developer Product Managers use their deep audience expertise and strategic planning skills to reach and influence professional data scientist and data engineers to try Microsoft’s Azure platform, both through in-person 1:many engagements and at digital scale. Azure Developer PMs help drive broad awareness, skilling and adoption of Azure services to promote a self-sustaining ecosystem of skilled cloud data scientists and data engineers.
Responsibilities
Business Management (30%)
Build strategies to reach and engage data scientists and data engineers
Track plan effectiveness, report insights, make adjustments as needed
Manage investments and funds, create accelerator programs /offers for customers and partners and land programs and offers across business groups
Create engagement strategy, including campaign/program business plan, community, customer and partner strategy, and campaign investment decisions that drive maximum reach/impact.
Influence the creation of marketing plans and campaign investment decisions that accrue to your core strategy.
Provide product-related content like customer benefits, competitive differentiators, and value of the product innovation to your audience
Conduct marketplace environmental and competitive analyses to inform your strategy
Identify strategic market-maker partners and influence joint go-to-market plans where relevant

Orchestration (30%)
Drive orchestration to deliver on metrics and commitments, support Rhythm of the Business (ROB)
Operate across many teams and stakeholders to bring the best of Microsoft to bear behind your strategy and to support your audience—key teams include: Marketing, Product Marketing, Technical Sales, and Solution Architects.
Determine a common set of KPIs for marketing activities in collaboration with other teams involved (e.g. segment marketing, audience marketing, other BGs)
Ability to drive impact through influence of others—whether inside Microsoft or across customers, partners, and the community.

Product Evangelism (40%)
Maintain product knowledge and evangelise the product internally and externally to Press, enthusiasts, influencers, pre-sales customer scenarios—represent Microsoft at first- and third-party events
Plan and execute activities that promotes Microsoft AI products and feature releases; lead product launch activities/releases
Influence and support marketing teams on customer journeys, messaging, call to actions, and activities (events, webinars, etc) that drive impact for your business strategy
Act as the voice of the field by ensuring timely updates/feedback to Corporate on product marketing and campaign execution in subsidiary
Leverage the customer voice to support your strategy in reaching your audience
Qualifications
Experience: 5-7 years related experience
Experience with cloud technologies, data, analytics, AI, and modern app dev
Evangelist and subject matter expert for product
Deep customer focus and understanding
Strong analytical skills
Excellent communicator
Experienced in core marketing functions
Education: Bachelor’s Degree (B.S./B.A.) required, MBA a plus. Relevant fields of study include Marketing, Business, Computer Science.
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances.

Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.
30+ days ago
Report job"
1,Data Scientist,Ever Better Recruitment (EBR),Not shown,Australia,"We are looking for Talented Superstars! If you are an A Player, then hit APPLY Now!
Our client is seeking a passionate individual with excellent engineering skills and deep knowledge of Machine Learning. You must be able to analyse problems, develop innovative solutions, and implement them for real-world use on top of their machine learning platform.

Key Requirements:
7+ years of engineering experience with python
3+ years of working experience in data science
scikit-learn
Java or C++
Git
Strong communication skills (English)
Experience with memory-efficient pre-processing pipelines and time series, NLP, Clustering and unsupervised learning
Bonus:
Visualizing data with javascript
Kaggle grandmaster, former top 10, or current top 100
R, Spark
Geospatial modeling
Past experience with startups
Currently located in Singapore
Core contributor of an open source machine learning or data science project
As a Data Scientist, you will work on the machine learning platform and actively contribute to the development of our state-of-the-art pre-processing and modelling capabilities
If this sounds like the perfect role for you, APPLY NOW!
Our agency guarantees that all applications made to our advertised positions are 100% confidential and all candidates are met with before submitting details to any of our client base. Applicant resumes will not be passed onto a 3rd party without your prior consent.
30+ days ago
Report job"
2,"Machine Learning Scientist - Adelaide, South Australia",Amazon Support Services PtyLtd,Not shown,Adelaide Region SA,"PhD in CS, Machine Learning, Operational research, Statistics or in a highly quantitative field. (PhD strongly preferred).
Strong Problem solving ability
Good skills in Python (or similar language)
Strong communication and data presentation skills

Interested in creating new state-of-the-art solutions using Machine Learning and Data Mining techniques on Terabytes of Data? Join our newly created Machine Learning Lab in Adelaide, South Australia!

At Amazon Australia, we are developing state-of-the-art large-scale Machine Learning Services and Applications on the Cloud involving Terabytes of data. We work on applying predictive technology to a wide spectrum of problems in areas such as Amazon Retail, Seller Services, Customer Service and so on. We are looking for talented and experienced Machine Learning Scientists (Ph.D. in a related area preferred) who can apply innovative Machine Learning techniques to real-world e-Commerce problems. You will get to work in a team dedicated to advancing Machine Learning technology at Amazon and converting it to business-impacting solutions.

Although this position will be based in Adelaide, South Australia, for the duration of the Coronavirus-19 outbreak arrangements will be made to enable the successful candidate to observe the relevant travel restrictions, possibly by working from home, or another Amazon office.

Major responsibilities
Use machine learning, data mining and statistical techniques to create new, scalable solutions for business problems
Analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of Amazon’s historical business data to help automate and optimize key processes
Design, develop and evaluate highly innovative models for predictive learning
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches

5+ years of industrial experience in predictive modeling and analysis, predictive software development
Experience handling gigabyte and terabyte size datasets
Experience working with retail or e-commerce data
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing
Experience in using R, Matlab, or any other statistical software
Experience in mentoring junior team members, and guiding them on machine learning and data modeling applications
Publications or presentation in recognized Machine Learning and Data Mining journals/conferences
Amazon.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
3,Groundwater/Geoscience Data Scientist,Randstad,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Randstad are proud to offer the opportunity to be part of an outcome-focused reputed organisation with stable funding arrangements. They are currently recruiting an intermediate Groundwater/Geoscience Data Scientist for an initial 12 month contract period.
The key duties and accountabilities of the successful candidate will include:
Manipulate and Interrogate large groundwater/geoscientific datasets.
Develop and apply innovative data analysis techniques to large regional data sets.
Undertake timeseries analysis, decomposition and signal separation using statistical methods.
Extract meaningful insights from multidisciplinary datasets.
Assist various projects with wrangling, processing, visualising and interpreting data.
Contribute towards and support the technical team in the assessment and management of groundwater impacts of water extraction by the resources industry.
Prepare technical reports, workflows, documentation and memos.
Develop and maintain constructive working relationships and networks with clients, stakeholders, and project teams
The successful candidate will possess the following qualifications/skills:
Preferably a tertiary qualification in geoscience or computer science; however, an applicant with qualification in other scientific fields or engineering will be considered.
Desirable experience including:
Python (pandas, numpy, scipy, scikit-learn, matplotlib).
Familiarity with ML methods.
A working knowledge of groundwater/geoscience concepts and principles.
Familiarity with analytical and numerical modelling techniques.
Additionally they will demonstrate strong oral/written communication, presentation and interpersonal skills. They will display initiative, attention to detail, and have the ability to work autonomously and unsupervised whilst contributing to the wider team's objectives of ensuring service delivery exceeds expectations.
Our client is proud to offer the successful candidate the following:
Opportunity to be part of an outcome-focused reputed organisation with stable funding arrangements.
Competitive remuneration package with secure and stable employment compared to industry peers.
Opportunity to work on regional-scale and strategic projects.
Opportunity to collaborate and directly interact with stakeholders including landholders, industry, research organisations and regulators.
Opportunity to think outside the box and design projects and research to meet specific objectives.
Learning and mentoring opportunities from some of industry’s leading national and international experts and practitioners in the field.
Apply by clicking onto the ""Apply"" button. Please submit a resume and covering letter outlining relevant experience as part of your application.
For a confidential discussion of this opportunity, please do not hesitate to contact James Chapman on 07 3031 3220 or email james.chapman@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background.
17 days ago
Report job"
4,Data Science Analyst,GMT People,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Work in Canberra or Offsite
Baseline Security Clearance Essential
Mandatory languages: R, SQL

The Role:
Our Government client seeks an experienced Data Science Analyst to perform statistical analytics to systematically monitor activity in their transactional systems.
You will:
Provide an automated & statistically sound method of identifying quantitative & categorical anomalies.
Project documentation, including evaluation & suitability of anomaly detection methods
Provide recommendations for implementation.
Demonstrated Experience/Abilities:
Significant practical experience in:
Programming
Statistical evaluation & relational databases -
including extracting, validating & cleansing data
Mandatory languages: R, SQL
Strong experience in data analysis & analytical report writing
Highly developed data visualisation & communication skills.
Project management skills are highly desirable
Eligibility
Australian Citizenship required - this role is in a Federal Government environment where only Australian Citizens are eligible to work. You must also hold a Federal Government Baseline Security Clearance


Apply Now/Contact Us:
For more information contact GMT People - 02 62010100 / 03 86139999 - and speak with one of our team members
Just posted
Report job"
5,Data Scientist,HiTech Personnel,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Innovative Federal Government Department!
Part-time work available! ASAP START
Rewarding Hourly Rates $$
One of Australia's most reputable Federal Government Departments is looking to engage a skilled Data Scientist/Dashboard Developer to join a multidisciplinary team based in Canberra ACT . You will use an agile approach to design and deliver dashboards doe the department. You will secure an initial 3 month contract, partnered with a 6 month extension option!

The successful Data Scientist/Dashboard Developer will be responsible for, but not limited to;
Increasing the departments data capability by mentoring 1-2 staff to assist in the development of the dashboard and developing instructional material for staff
Provide detailed documentation outlining how to use, maintain and extend the dashboards including all data sources and data preparation/cleansing undertaken.
Designing and developing dashboards that will provide an overview of expenses, identify areas of risk, perform risk monitoring and enable evidence-based decision making
The successful Data Scientist/Dashboard Developer must have the following;
Demonstrated experience in the development of dashboards and expertise in business intelligence using tools such as Tableau, Power BI or similar
Excellent problem solving and analytical skills, an ability to quickly understand the data and operating environment to assist the business area interpret data and identify outliers
Demonstrated experience in data extraction, cleansing and manipulation.
Experience with statistical analysis and statistical concepts
Experience using SQL or similar query language to extract and manipulate data
This is a great opportunity for talented and highly motivated Data Scientist/Dashboard Developer looking to join high profile federal government department to enhance their career. You will be given the opportunity to work part time within a skilled team! If you have the required skills, DON'T DELAY, APPLY NOW please forward your resume to jobs@hitechaust.com quoting ref number JB042425 today!
30+ days ago
Report job"
6,Lead Data Analytics Consultant,Auto & General Insurance,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Work Type : Full Time
Location : Brisbane
Multiple roles available at various levels in a newly created division
Join a highly innovative business who challenge the status quo
Toowong Location – Brisbane Inner City
The Role:

Auto & General have established a new Data and Analytics division and therefore are seeking data analytics professionals & leaders to join our growing and innovated business.

The Data, Analytics and Insights team designs, develops, deploys and embeds end-to-end analytics solutions that intelligently leverage data for commercial outcomes, enabling data-driven decision-making throughout Auto & General.

Accountabilities:
Design, develop and deploy analytics solutions (data models, dashboards, predictive models, real-time decision services and more), working in partnership with commercial teams and decision makers;
Build and sustain a deep applied understanding of business strategy and operations within a particular domain/business area of Auto & General, translating this into a strong understanding of data, systems and decision-making processes;
Maintain a continual cadence of analytics solution delivery, aligned to business strategy and priorities, and focused on strengthening decision-making at all levels;
Support the growth of data acumen and self-service analytic solutions throughout Auto & General, providing training and support as solutions are embedded;
Contribute to the ongoing evolution of Auto & General’s systems and processes, bringing data architecture into design considerations.

Knowledge and Experience:

ESSENTIAL
Data science, actuarial science, mathematics or computer science qualification (or relevant experience);
Strong commercial acumen, using data to solve complex business problems and inform decision-making at all levels;
High level customer orientation and business acumen, demonstrated through the ability to translate business strategy and operations into powerful data solutions;
End-to-end analytic solution development expertise using cloud-based data analytics platforms to deliver self-service analytics solutions and/or real-time decisioning services;
Multi-lingual analytics solution development expertise;
Self-driven learner, with a strong appetite for data innovation.


DESIRABLE
Applied mathematical/statistical/machine learning model development skills demonstrated in a commercial environment;
Financial services domain expertise.


Who are Auto & General:

Auto & General is the Australian arm of a private global group with 8,000 employees across 31 offices and over 8.9 million customers worldwide.

In Australia, Auto & General launched in 2000 and has grown to provide industry-leading motor, home and travel insurance products both directly through Budget Direct and via industry leading partnerships. With an Australian team of 1400+ we are now looking for talented individuals who can help drive our ambitious growth plans.

Our Benefits:
Toowong - City fringe location
Join our vibrant social and community activities including annual celebration, family fun days and regular events across each of our sites;
Enjoy additional leave days - ‘ME’ leave and ‘Volunteer Day’ leave;
Study support (up to 50% of tuition fees for relevant courses) and professional membership reimbursement;
Employee discounts on Car, Home, Travel insurance, Roadside Assistance;
Income protection insurance provided to support you in the event of non-work related illness or injury;
Discounts with a broad range of providers, including gym memberships, accommodation, dental care and more.



Auto & General welcome and value diversity in the workplace

*A note from Auto & General to recruitment agencies: We politely ask that you avoid making any approaches or sending any unsolicited resumes to our Recruitment Team or Hiring Leaders across our business. Auto & General is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.
#LI-155866361_SR1
5 days ago
Report job"
7,Machine learning specialist,HAYS,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"The ideal candidate would have advanced experience with Machine Learning.

Your new company

Your new company is a government agency based in Sydney CBD

Your new role

This role will be within the IT team of this department. They are looking for a candidate who can help them with a Speech recognition project

What you'll need to succeed

To be successful in this application you should have experience in the following:
One year + experience with Machine learning
Python
R
Speech to text
Cognitive services
Power BI
Office 365

What you need to do now

If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV to laura.c.walsh@hays.com.au , or call me on 02 8226 9805
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

LHS 297508 #2354457
30+ days ago
Report job"
8,Data Analyst/Data Scientist - Associate,PwC,Not shown,Perth WA,"Line of Service
Assurance
Industry/Sector
Not Applicable
Specialism
Risk
Management Level
Associate
Job Description & Summary
With PwC, you’ll ignite a meaningful career while being supported by a flexible working culture, innovative learning and development opportunities and progressive policies and benefits, such as 18 weeks paid parental leave for mums, dads and foster carers (no minimum service!)
What will you create?
You’ll help Australian businesses, not-for-profits and governments create value and improve the way they work. From digitising healthcare, to creating smarter cities and igniting our start-up industry, together we build trust in society and solve important problems.
Our Data Assurance team brings this to life by helping clients to protect and strengthen every aspect of their business; from people to performance, systems to strategy and business plans to business resilience. You’ll use your data analysis and visualisation skills to communicate insights for some of Australia's largest energy, resources, utilities, government and health organisations. Helping them to solve problems such as automating financial and operational processes, digitising reporting, remediating business issues using data and identifying fraudulent activities through cross functional testing.
As an Associate in our Data Assurance team your impact will be seen by:
Partnering with clients to enable them to understand the value in their data through analytics and visualisation
Helping businesses make sense of complex data sets to improve efficiency and quality of assurance processes
Demonstrating an ability to listen, learn and understand when challenged by complex project issues
About you

You have 1-3 years experience with a background in Data Science, or Computer Science, or Programming and Applied Statistics, or Mathematics underpinned by related degree-level qualification or other fields such as Econometrics, Finance, Accounting, Commerce, Science or Engineering . You have working knowledge of process automation, reporting digitisation, and/or data governance, transformation, analysis , and experience with Alteryx, Sql, Python, R, Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Tableau and/or Qlik Sense.
Passionate about being at the forefront of change, you’re ready to help our Assurance team solve complex business issues, improve how systems work and provide confidence on the bigger decisions.
You’re collaborative and enjoy working in an innovative environment. You’re a problem solver by nature and want to join a firm that values the kind of people who reimagine the possible for their clients and stakeholders. Most importantly, you act with integrity and show care for the people you work with.

Life at PwC
Our culture and benefits are something we’re proud of, and also why we’re consistently named as one of Australia’s best workplaces. With PwC, you’ll belong to an inclusive community where differences are both embraced and the underlying driver in everything we create together.
We empower you with the technology, coaching, flexibility and trust needed to make a meaningful difference, while supporting you in bringing your whole self to work each day. We’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce because we know it’s only by working together that we can realise the potential of our people, clients and society around us.
We’re living this commitment through initiatives including our Reconciliation Action Plan to increase Indigenous employment and employee-led diversity networks promoting cultural, disability, LGBTI and gender equality. At our core we’re a people business, which means you’ll be supported not just in your professional development but your personal growth as well.
Liza Darnell is the Recruitment Manager for the role. As the team experiences high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a timely and fair process for all.
Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)
Degrees/Field of Study required:
Degrees/Field of Study preferred:
Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)
Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)
Travel Requirements
Not Specified
Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?
Yes
Government Clearance Required?
No
Job Posting End Date
March 31, 2021
18 days ago
Report job"
9,Machine Learning Engineer,Preacta Recruitment,"$120,000 - $140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Join a fast-growing Product company headquartered in California
Grow your Machine Learning skills within one of the best tech startup companies
Work with a global Engineering team between the US and Australia

The company and context

My client, an Analytics Product startup, is currently growing their Data Science and AI practice to keep on building some cool products and add more features to the current ones.

At this stage, they have developed 2 successful data products that they are selling across the US and Australia. In the last 3 months they have signed more deals than over the past 2 years. For that reason, they need to strengthen their products and grow their tech team based in Sydney.

Their data team is spread across Sydney and San Diego, California. In this role you will be in charge of the data platform, meaning management of its performance as well as making sure that the data quality is there on a daily basis.

Are you keen to know more about it? Send your CV and I will reach out to you!

Job Responsibilities – MACHINE LEARNING ENGINEER
Build ML models using Python
Put data models into production and integrate them with the reusable data pipelines
Build the required infrastructure using SQL, Spark and AWS services
Work with big data and build an optimised ML solution that’s performant and scalable
Requirements – MACHINE LEARNING ENGINEER
Best-in-class Software Engineering practices
Experience with big data systems using structured and unstructured data
Hands-on experience with both Python and AWS

Why should you apply?
They are an Australian Unicorn expanding their market shares to the huge US market
They deal with long-term governmental clients
Get to work remotely
They are flexible and agile – as long as you get the job done, you will get some flexibility and plenty of social perks
Take part in a greenfield project where you will get the opportunity to make your mark
Grow your technical leadership skills
Work with a global team spread across Sydney and San Diego, California
11 days ago
Report job"
10,Data science analyst,HiTech Personnel,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"High profile federal government department
Initial 3 month contract with view to be extended for 12 months
Rewarding hourly rate
One of Australia's most highly regarded federal government departments is looking to engage an experienced Data Science Analyst to perform statistical analytics to systematically monitor activity in the department’s transactional systems. You will be offered an initial 3 month contract with he view to be extending for up to 12 months.
The successful Data Science Analyst must have the following:
Significant practical experience in programming, statistical evaluation and relational databases, including experience in extracting, validating and cleansing data from a wide range of sources and systems.
Mandatory languages: R, SQL
Strong experience in undertaking data analysis and analytical report writing, along with highly developed data visualisation and communication skills.
Project management skills are highly desirable
This is a fantastic opportunity for a talented Data Science Analyst looking to join a high-profile federal government team to enhance their career. The successful candidate will be offered an initial 3 month contract with the view to be extended for 12 months. If you have the required skills, DON'T DELAY, APPLY NOW please forward your resume to jobs@hitechaust.com quoting ref number JJ1791 today!
Today
Report job"
11,Data Scientist,HAYS,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Python - Data-bricks - R coding - MS Azure - Machine Learning - NLP - Power BI - R Shiny

Your new company
You will be working for a large Federal Government Department

Your new role
As the Data Scientist you will be using advanced analytics techniques to answer complex questions from large data sets. These Questions include:
Determining skills shortages or surplus
Analysing the structural shifts that are occurring in the labour market
Identifying current, emerging and future skills needs.

You will be using Machine learning and statistical analysis techniques to extract meaningful output from the Data.

What you'll need to succeed
Demonstrated experience in applying data science to meet the needs of business users, including understanding business requirements, articulating problem statements and developing criteria for suitable implementation of data science solutions.
Demonstrated knowledge of appropriate techniques to explore, profile and cleanse data from a diverse range of sources and experience in presenting exploratory data analysis to non-technical stakeholders.
Experience using Python, PySpark, R or SparkR programming languages through development environments including Databricks for developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning models, with a particular emphasis on Natural Language Processing.
Experience with proof-of-concept development, preferably in Power BI or Shiny.
Experience working with big, unstructured datasets. Knowledge of the Burning Glass dataset would be an advantage.
Expertise in Agile methodology and a clear understanding of the ethical implications and governance of algorithms.
You must be an Australian citizen and will possess or be willing to go through the process to obtain and maintain a (Baseline, NV1 or NV2) personnel security clearance.

What you'll get in return
The chance to work on an exciting advanced analytics project as well as an initial contract to June 30 2021 + a 12 month extension option is on offer.

What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV. Call Liam O'Meara on 02 62579802 or email Liam.omeara@hays.com.au for any questions relating to this role.

LHS 297508 #2434208
30+ days ago
Report job"
12,"Senior Manager, Data Science Australia",Visa,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Company Description
As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.
At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of disruptors, trailblazers, innovators and risk-takers who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.
You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let's transform the way the world pays.

Job Description
Team Summary
Visa's Data Science team is a high-performing team of data scientists, data analysts, statisticians, and business analysts from a variety of countries – serving major FIs and merchants within Asia Pacific. We are looking for a hands-on person who is result oriented, highly organized and focused to delivered industry leading analytics solutions
What a Senior Manager, Data Science does at Visa:
The Sr. Manager, Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific (AuNZSP) will be the analytics subject matter expert and will be reporting to the Head of Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific. The incumbent will be expected to have exceptional problem-solving skills using advanced analytics/ Machine learning/ AI with a sharp focus on execution. Responsibilities will include deconstructing the business problem into analysis approach, package analysis insights into client consumable format within committed timeline/scope and develop new solution capabilities. The incumbent is expected to be hands on and will have the required knowhow to work with big data using cutting-edge machine learning/ AI solutions. The role will have to closely collaborate with data science analysts, members of the broader team in Visa Consulting and Analytics and other business stakeholders. Staying on top of the analytics industry trends, the candidate will need to ensure the analytics solutions are constantly revamped, innovations are fostered and solutions are implementable. The role is focused on Australia market and will be based in Sydney, Australia.
Analytics subject matter expert in all analytics topics including business problem definition, constructing analytical framework, development, validation of said framework via best statistical methodologies and implementation and package insights into client consumable format
Enhance existing analytic techniques by promoting new methodology and best practices in analytics field
Delivering multiple analytics projects along with rest of the stakeholders in Data Science & Consulting teams
Develop analytical solutions and strategies, testing & monitoring frameworks, estimate revenue impact for the client(s)
Actively seek out opportunities to innovate by using non-traditional data and new modeling techniques
Collaborating with the internal teams to fully understand business requirements and desired business outcomes
Defining detailed analytic scope and methodology, and creating analytic plan
Providing thought leadership in both using data to solve business problems and in arriving at innovative statistical solutions
Ensuring all project documentation is up to date and maintain the highest levels of quality in deliverables
Ensuring project delivery within timelines and budget requirements
Contribute to the development of the team’s analytical skills and expertise.
Cultivates open and clear communications across team members and stakeholders
Why this is important to Visa
As a payment consulting arm of Visa, VCA is growing a team of highly specialized experts that can provide best in class payment expertise to the client. We want to bring this expertise closer to our clients by placing the Sr. Manager, Data Science in-market in Sydney. We are a global organization leveraging global expertise and best practice with local knowledge and understanding of our client partners. This enables us to deepen our partnership with our clients and bring value to their business.

Qualifications
What you will need:
10+ years of hands on analytical experience
Subject matter expert in analytics especially in areas of analytical methodologies
Strong understanding and prior experience in Machine Learning and Geo-location-based analytics is must.
Proficiency in coding skills using SAS, SQL, Hive, Python, R, Spark and Pyspark on large datasets
Proficiency in data visualisation and data visualisation software such as Tableau, Power BI etc.
Excellent communicator – should have the capability to translate numbers to business insights
Experienced in managing multiple projects and initiatives
Superior analytical and problem-solving skills, with demonstrated intellectual and analytical rigor
Must be team oriented, collaborative, diplomatic, and flexible, with excellent presentation skills, including strong oral and writing capabilities
Experienced in working across a matrixed organization; multi-regional experience preferred
What will also help:
Very strong advanced analytics experience. Hands on experience in developing machine-learning models using Python, R, SAS and other open source resources.
Strong expertise in data visualisation tools
Thorough understanding of the recommender system, classification techniques, graph theory, bayesian, time series and regression models are recommended
Excellent written English
Expert level PowerPoint
Experience and in-depth knowledge of the cards and payments business
26 days ago
Report job"
13,"Team Leaders - Data Science, Systems Administration, Software Development, Tech Support",Australian Federal Police (AFP),Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Job Details

JOB TITLE - Team Leaders - Data Science, Systems Administration, Software Development, Tech Support
EMPLOYMENT TYPE - Ongoing Full time
LOCATION - ACT; VIC
AFP BAND & SALARY - Band 07, $105,974.00 - $113,500.00
JOB REFERENCE NUMBER - 5787
CONTACT OFFICER - Mark, Phone: 02 5126 7152, Email: Technical.Recruitment@afp.gov.au
APPLICATIONS CLOSE - 11:59pm (AEDT) 24/02/2021
This advertisement is to create a merit pool for future vacancies arising over the next 12 months.
Australian Federal Police
Policing for a safer Australia - the world is changing, crime is changing, we are changing to meet new challenges.
The mission of the AFP is to provide dynamic and effective law enforcement to the people of Australia. It provides policing throughout Australia in relation to the prevention and detection of crimes against the Commonwealth, its laws and integrity, and community police services to the Community of the ACT.
Applications are invited from suitably qualified people who are interested in an appointment to the AFP. Applicants should demonstrate a commitment to the core values of the AFP, and their application must address selection criteria and the relevant work level standards.
The AFP offers a generous remuneration and conditions package, full details can be found here .
As an inclusive organisation, the AFP provides opportunity for all Australians to fairly gain employment in the AFP. We appreciate that everyone is unique and acknowledge that diversity in thought leads to greater transparency and improved consideration in our decision making. To support our employees we also provide flexible work arrangements.
Role Summary
Applications are sought from suitably qualified individuals wishing to be considered for technical team leader positions within the AFP’s Digital Surveillance Collection (DSC) unit.
DSC supports AFP operations through the development and delivery of surveillance capabilities including telecommunications interception, surveillance devices, computer access capabilities and collection of information from online sources.
We are currently recruiting for two specific Team Leader positions:
Team Leader, Law Enforcement Monitoring Facility (LEMF).
The LEMF team is primarily responsible for the successful interception and delivery of data subject to lawful telecommunications interception (TI) legislation, along with maintenance and presentation to end-users through our vendor-provided platform. The LEMF team employs systems administrators to maintain the platform, and technical support staff to provide support to end-users within the AFP and other agencies. The team works closely with internal and external stakeholders including telecommunications carriers to deliver this essential capability. LEMF team tech support staff also provide internal end-user support for other DSC capabilities. This team is mostly based in Canberra, with one member in Melbourne. The team leader could be based in either city.
Team Leader, Data Analysis and Enrichment (DAE).
DAE is primarily responsible for the enrichment and analysis of data subject to lawful telecommunications interception (TI) and surveillance device (SD) and computer access warrant (CAW) legislation. The DAE team works with both external and internal stakeholders, including researchers, to deliver data science support to AFP operations.
This team is primarily based in Melbourne and we have a preference for a Melbourne-based team leader.
DSC is also growing, and we expect future Team Leader vacancies in areas such as:
Software development
Systems administration
Multi-disciplinary DevOps teams
Data science
Tech support
This recruitment will establish a merit pool that will be used to fill current and future vacancies.
As a Team Leader in the AFP you play a pivotal role in developing people, managing change and influencing behaviours that lead to a supportive culture that respects the perspectives, talents and value of each individual. Consistent with the AFP values, AFP leadership philosophy, organisational reform agendas, AFP corporate business plans and your Performance Development Agreement, the expectation is that you will deliver on the core responsibilities and meet any requirements of the position as outlined below.
Role Description & Responsibilities
The panel will assess applications against the available role scope and selection criteria. As this is a technical role, applicants are encouraged to highlight in their applications and CV their technical experience.
As a Technical Team Leader, your responsibilities will include:
Ensuring outputs are achieved within the strategic direction of Digital Surveillance Collection (DSC) and the AFP
Providing technical leadership and direction to ensure a high level of service delivery across the AFP
Leading a team, including providing clear and consistent communication, setting clear performance and behavioral standards, managing performance, delegating responsibility, inspiring the workforce, and guiding and developing our people
Representing Digital Surveillance Collection in a professional capacity within the AFP as well as throughout the wider Law Enforcement and Intelligence community
Maintaining information management standards to meet government requirements
Maintaining currency in information technology processes and technical knowledge through ongoing professional development
Providing accurate and professional technical advice to domestic and international stakeholder
Identifying opportunities for improvement and developing and delivering methodologies to enhance business outcomes
Maintaining currency in subject matter expertise through ongoing professional development and learning opportunities outside the formal education process
Supporting and maintaining functionality of our application platform(s).
Essential Requirements
A Negative Vetting 2 (Top Secret) security clearance or the ability to obtain one.
Demonstrated resilience and high-level interpersonal skills.
Tertiary qualifications, or equivalent professional experience, in an IT, engineering or similar technical field.
Experience leading a technical team.
Experience in service management and/or technical service delivery.
Desirable Requirements
TL LEMF:
Knowledge of telecommunications infrastructure and systems, including (but not limited to) voice and data over both fixed line and mobile
Knowledge of relevant legislation, such as Telecommunications (Interception & Access) Act and Telecommunications Act
Experience working with telecommunications interception and Law Enforcement Monitoring Facilities
Experience with supporting a client/server commercial vendor application delivered to a large user base
Knowledge of the Australian Government Information Security Manual (ISM).
TL DAE:
Experience analyzing data sets, including but not limited to communications/financial/geospatial data, network traffic, intelligence data
Knowledge of digital communications meta-data opportunities and limitations
Knowledge of cloud infrastructure (eg. Google, AWS, Azure) offerings
Experience with machine learning processes and techniques.
Future TL vacancies:
Technical skills in relevant areas, which may include software development, systems administration, DevOps, data science or tech support.

Selection Criteria
Achieve results
Contributes to strategic thinking
Cultivates productive working relationships
Shows personal drive and integrity
Communicates with influence
Required Application Documents

As part of your application you will be required to submit the following documents:
Applicant response ( pitch – maximum two pages)
Resume/CV
Advice for Applicants
Application
All mandatory fields must be completed by the applicant. Applicants must provide all requested documents as outlined above in Required Application Documents.

All requested documents must be uploaded to the application form and submitted before the closing date and time. Any documents not supplied may result in your application being withdrawn from the recruitment process.
The applicant response ( pitch ) should address the selection criteria and work level standards relevant to the role and provide evidence as to why you are the best fit for the position. The work level standards are specific to the band level of the role you are applying for and can assist in guiding you to address the selection criteria to the level required of the role.

Employment Suitability Requirements
Applicants, who are not current AFP employees, that progress to the next stage of an AFP recruitment process will be required to provide the following documents:
Completed Employment Suitability Questionnaire ( ESQ );
Traffic history for the last 10 years; and
Proof of Australian citizenship.
Applicants will be advised by AFP Recruitment if they are required to provide this information. We encourage all applicants to review the AFP’s minimum employment requirements and employment suitability standards to ensure that you meet the set requirements before you submit your application. Applicants whom do not meet these requirements, or fail to provide the required documents, will be removed from the recruitment process.
For further information on positions, and other employment opportunities in the AFP, please visit our website or contact the contact officer listed.
www.afp.gov.au
5 days ago
Report job"
14,Sr. Data Scientist,Net2Source Australia,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Net2Source is a Global Workforce Solutions Company headquartered at NJ, USA with its branch offices in Asia Pacific, ANZ, middle East, UK/Europe region. We are one of the fastest growing IT Consulting company.
We are hiring "" Senior Data Scientist "" for one of our clients. We offer a wide gamut of consulting solutions customized to our 450+ clients ranging from Fortune 500/1000 to Start-ups across various verticals like Technology, Financial Services, Healthcare, Life Sciences, Oil & Gas, Energy, Retail, Telecom, Utilities, Technology, Manufacturing, the Internet, and Engineering.

Job Summary

Position : Senior Data Scientist
Location: Geelong, Victoria
Job Type: 6 Months Contract Role

Essential Functions of The Job

We are looking for Senior Data Scientist for a contract of 6 months role based out of Geelong, Victoria.

Qualifications Basic

Bachelor's degree or equivalent required from an accredited institution.

and Responsibilities
Experience in building, training and deploying Machine Learning models.
Programming experience with S3, SageMaker, lambda etc.
Extensive development experience with Spark framework.
CI/CD pipeline in AWS - Codebuild, Codpipeline, Stepfunctions etc.
Python: (PySpark, TensorFlow, Pandas, other Client libraries, Visualization libraries)
AWS: (IAM, EC2, VPC, S3, SageMaker, QuickSight, lambda, CloudFront)
Good to have: Container services (ECS, EKS, Docker)

About Net2Source Australia
Net2Source Australia is a Diversity Certified Global Workforce Solutions Company headquartered at NJ, USA with its operations in 32+ countries across The Americas, EMEA, ANZ and APAC. We offer a wide gamut of customized talent solutions including Managed IT Services, SoW, Staff Augmentation, Permanent Hiring, RPO, PEO/EOR, VMO and back office outsourcing. With over 4200+ contractors and 750+ in-house employees, and over 250+ Fortune 500/Global 2000 clients we are rated as one of the 100 fastest growing staffing firms by Staffing Industry Analysts. Want to read more about Net2Source? Visit us at https://net2source.com.au/
30+ days ago
Report job"
15,Senior Data Scientist,Talent Insights Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Melbourne-based (following lifting of lock-downs and 100% Remote work)
Customer Analytics and Machine Learning - Marketing, Sales and Loyalty Analytics
AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, Spark, Databricks, SQL, Python, R,

You will be part of a data science and analytics internal consulting team, which delivers analytics and data science solutions to various business units, often leveraging retail and customer big data. Your team members will include data engineers, analytics delivery leads and a senior machine learning engineer.

This company have incredible data, cutting edge technology and models at your fingertips, ready to use. Your mission is to help businesses get the maximum impact and ROI from data.

About the role:

Your mission is to use data and cutting-edge analytics and cloud tools to deliver a highly personalized Customer Experience for millions of customers. Any recommendation engines or marketing personalisation with customer loyalty data sets is very valuable and something we'd like to see.

Your internal stakeholders (such as Head of Marketing, or Digital Campaign Manager) will vary in their data literacy and how experienced they are with using insights - so you will help them;

Ask the right business and data questions and guide them on where and how to find the answers
Focus on building models and solutions that are practical, interpretable and that make a material difference to quality of decisions by business stakeholders
Manage senior stakeholder relationships and take customers further on their data journey



About You:

We are open to candidates with 5 or more years of commercial analytics / data science experience. Importantly, we would like to see this experience in a business domain that is relevant such as retail, telco, banking, e-commerce, loyalty analytics - preferably a business with millions of customers where you are doing B2C analytics for marketing, sales, campaign and advertising outcomes.

The type of data science work you have done is end-to-end and we will give heavy preference to you if you have worked with customer sales, transaction, marketing, digital campaign, customer behavioural and marketing analytics projects. If you have leveraged customer loyalty data to accomplish the above - we definitely want to hear from you.

Some other things in your toolkit;
Leading stakeholder engagement with senior, non-technical campaign and marketing managers on a weekly basis
Confident presentation skills - have you delivered insights to business and non-technical stakeholders? Can you explain how a model might vary as you adjust key features and why you selected certain features to a marketing or business stakeholder?
Commercial Acumen and analytics - you can give us examples of real solutions you have built where a machine learning model has led to real business results such as improved sales, more accurate campaign measurement, a change in promotional or new product strategy, attribution of digital media or marketing spend, etc!
Academic background at a bachelor, masters or PhD level can vary, but it will include a numerical foundation, such as Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science, Mechanical Engineering, etc.
You will have commercially used and built models such as; Random Forest / Decision Trees GBMs, GLM & XGBoost.
Propensity modelling, recommendation engines, next-best-offer and campaign evaluation models will be valuable so make sure to mention them in your application!
Commercial experience using Python or R for machine learning model build, SQL, R or Python for data scripting, management and ETL, Spark, hadoop or Databricks for distributed computing and a track-record of building productionised models (with assistance from engineering teams is fine).

This is a permanent and full-time role. For a confidential chat please email james.lecoutre@talentinsights.com.au

Please note, this is neither a graduate role nor a team leadership role. Please view other listings to apply for any suitable openings at those experience level, if applicable.
17 days ago
Report job"
16,Market Insights and Analytics Senior Consultant,KPMG,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Job no: 510461
Work type: Fixed Term Full Time
Location: Melbourne
Division: Business Services
Business services opportunity (Consultant / Senior Consultant / Manager)
Data Analyst / Data Scientist
Flexible working options available
KPMG is one of the most trusted and respected global professional services firms. Through depth of expertise, clarity of insight and strength of purpose we help our clients solve complex challenges, steer change, strengthen, transition and grow. We are looking for talented people who share our purpose of inspiring confidence and empowering change for our clients, our people and our communities.
Our highly skilled Market Insights & Analytics capability helps the firm to use their data resources for creating value, enhancing competitiveness and driving business decisions using Data & Analytics. We provide unique services to the firm through undertaking strategic analytics projects, custom analytics work, proofs of concept, and uplifting the firm’s capability through exposure to cutting edge tools and techniques to build your commercial analysis skills.
Your new role
Our team is seeking data analysts to support our strong growth strategy. Working in our team you'll be mixing with some of the brightest minds while working on significant commercial projects – solving real world problems supporting our growth strategy, using some of the most exciting and interesting data you wouldn’t normally have access to. You’ll be working collaboratively within a team environment and building strong internal relationships with senior leaders.
Joining our team you’ll be working across projects that are applying data solutions to solve problems for our firm, performing one or more of the following:
Undertaking deep dive analysis of sales pipeline, market trends and signals, productivity, investment and commercial performance – using tools like SQL, PowerBI and Excel.
Solving challenging problems with Data Science and Machine Learning techniques – using tools like R and Python, and libraries like Scikit-learn, TensorFlow.
Building and deploying scalable data pipelines to clean and transform unstructured data into model-ready formats.
Having experience in one or more of the above capabilities is desirable.
You bring to the role
We are open to candidates of all skill levels and experience, looking to take the next step in their career. You’ll demonstrate your experience in a consulting environment and/or experience within industry, where you have developed your subject matter expertise and led others. You’ll need to bring an ability to work collaboratively within a team environment and to build strong client relationships. We're looking for talented people, team players and progressive thinkers who can communicate their ideas convincingly.
What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.
Advertised: 15 Dec 2020 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close:
30+ days ago
Report job"
17,Data Analytics Consultant,Ever Better Recruitment (EBR),Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are looking for Talented Superstars! If you are an A Player, then hit APPLY Now!
Our client is seeking a Data Analytics Consultant with deep algorithmic knowledge! You will learn from the top Data Scientists in the world, and teach them a thing or two along the way.
Our client uses a massively parallel processing train and searches through millions of possible combinations of algorithms, pre-processing steps, features, transformations and tuning parameters to best deliver the models for dataset and prediction targets.
If you’re passionate about statistics and think you have what it takes to take on a challange and simplify complex models, keep reading!
You will work with the sales team to develop client relationships and deliver data science solutions for customers across a variety of industries. You will need to be comfortable leading technical demonstrations, helping clients develop models that add value to their organizations, and integrating those models into client environments. Ideal candidates enjoy day-to-day data science problem-solving mixed with high levels of customer interaction.
Main requirements:
4-5+ years of real-world business experience
Hands-on experience building and implementing predictive models
Strong customer interaction skills
Excellent organizational, communication, writing and interpersonal skills
Desire to enhance skills in areas of machine learning and quantitative decision making
Familiarity with a variety of technical tools for the manipulation of datasets
Up to 50% travel
Desired skills:
Experience with machine learning techniques
Fluency with scripting (Python / R)
Experience with Hadoop and related Big Data technologies
A tertiary degree in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Statistics, Actuarial Science, Finance, Mathematics, Economics, Data analysis)
Experience in any of the following would be great:
Distributed Systems
Cloud Computing
SAS
CRM
Machine learning
Data Mining

If this role appeals to you, don’t wait – APPLY NOW!
Our agency guarantees that all applications made to our advertised positions are 100% confidential and all candidates are met with before submitting details to any of our client base. Applicant resumes will not be passed onto a 3rd party without your prior consent.
30+ days ago
Report job"
18,Senior Software Engineer (Java) - Data Analytics Platform,Canva,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"At Canva, we work every day to make a significant positive impact on society. Our mission is to democratise design and empower creativity for anyone and everyone, on every platform!

Since launch in April 2013 we have grown exponentially, amassing over 20 million users in over 100 languages. We are one of the world’s fastest growing technology companies with software engineering being the core part of who we are.

As a Data Engineer at Canva, you will be building out the infrastructure to support the efforts of the Product, Data Science and Data Analytics capability across the entire business - ensuring we continue to deliver business value and rich features and functionality to our millions of users around the world.

Some of the technologies in our environment you’ll be working with include: Java, Scala, Terraform, Docker, Python. You'll also be heavily exposed to the tools we use within AWS, including Kinesis Data Streams (KDS), and EC2 Container Service (ECS).
Responsibilities
Designing, building, future-proofing and operating large scale data infrastructure in production (performance, reliability, monitoring)
Thinking through long-term impacts of key design decisions and handling failure scenarios
Responsibility for the continued development of new features, functionality, and optimization from raw data ingestion, to the access and serving layers
Responsibility for the delivery of Data projects from inception to deployment across a wide range of initiatives across the business; in conjunction with Growth, Experiments, Analytics, and the Data Science Team
Required Experience & Skills
Strong software engineering skills; ideally not constrained to a particular area of our stack but rather able to navigate it holistically
Strong understanding of Computer Science/Engineering fundamentals and first principles covering: non-trivial system design, concurrency, multithreading, data structures, architecture, and various design patterns
Advanced coding proficiency in Java (interview will be in Java) (Python, Scala, C#, or C++ experience is great)
Clear communication skills and ability to work cross-functionally across the business
Experience working in cloud-hosted Linux environments (AWS, Google Cloud, Azure)
Solid understanding of databases with solid working knowledge of SQL
An understanding of distributed data processing methodologies, frameworks, and best practices
Benefits
Competitive salary, plus stock options via our ESOP plan
Flexible daily working hours, we value work-life balance
Breakfast and lunch prepared by our wonderful Vibe team
Onsite-Gym and Yoga Membership
End-of-Trip Facilities: Bicycle parking and showers
Generous parental (including secondary) leave policy
Pet-friendly offices
Sponsored social clubs, team events and celebrations
Relocation budget for interstate or overseas individuals (see below for visa information)
The Canva workspace is set up for you to do your best work and have a great time doing so, with breakout areas, little nooks, and quiet places to retreat.
Want to experience Canva for yourself?
Check out what life is like at Canva on Instagram.
Check out what our users are saying about us on Twitter.
Learn how we work from Dave, our CTO
Get to know our Chef, Chris
Meet our CEO, Melanie
Finally, give Canva a go!
If you're seeking professional growth and enjoy working on large, distributed, cloud-based applications that delight our millions of individual and business users alike - then apply now to be considered for the position!
If you require visa sponsorship, you must ensure you have at least two (2) years of post-University commercial experience as a Software Engineer and meet the mandatory sponsorship requirements laid out by Department of Home Affairs.
We will not accept or review any CVs from external recruitment agencies.
5 days ago
Report job"
19,Data Engineer | Contract | (Data/Scala/Python) | Leader in Data Analytics,Naviro Pty Ltd,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Sydney's most progressive Data Engineering Teams
Working with some of Australia's leading Data experts
Build Next Generation Data Analytics Tools

We are specialists in Data Research providing full potential of client's Data assets globally.

We are looking to expand our Data Engineering team

A Little bit about us
We have a team of awesome expert data strategists, architects, engineers and data scientists.
Regular Tech gatherings
We build innovative Data platforms with the latest Data Technologies in Australia and Globally
Team of expert engineers solving challenging business and technical problems
About you
Open Source Data languages and Tools i.e. Kafka/Spark
Expert level experience in languages like Python/SQL/Scala
Experienced building Data Driven and Data Streaming Products
An interest in Machine Learning/Big Data Analytics/Data Science
Strong interest in working with different technologies and approaches suited to the problem
Strong

Attitude, passion, dedication and high-quality work are key point to being successful with your application.

Please Apply now with a CV you are really proud of, that demonstrates what you are capable of along with your key achievements to date.
7 days ago
Report job"
20,Data Scientist – Senior,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Project Space:
Projects are around the Security Domain of the Bank which covers / impacts 7 Tribes
The ANZ Team are releasing 5 data sets at a time
Some POC’s (proof of concepts) have been done and are now moving into Production – Platform and systems are being built
This is the 1st time using MONGODB in the Bank
There are approximately 200 Data Sources within the Bank
Required Skills:
Must be proven and capable in this space
Must be proven in creating relational Data-Bases
Have worked on Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence and have a solid understanding of NoSQL
Need to be able to transform SQL into NoSQL
NoSQL database provides a mechanism for storage and retrieval of data that is modelled in means other than the tabular relations used in relational databases.
How to apply:
Please apply calling Sanky on 03 9118 2071 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
21,Python for Data Science,PanAsia Resources,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Greetings!
Am writing this email context to a opportunity that we currently have position with MNC for Australia Location
About us:
Pan-Asia is a multimillion dollar privately held multi interest group headquartered in Singapore and with business operations worldwide. Founded in1994, Pan Asia's service offerings span diverse areas such as trading in energy products and emerging technologies to Management & IT consulting and human capital solutions. Our clients span across various geographies and industry domains including Hi-Tech, BFSI, Manufacturing, Logistics and FMCG.
To have a better idea, you can visit our website www.panasiagroup.net. Kindly find the Job details below and let us know your comfort level.
JD:
Python, jupiter notebook, Alteryx.
Experience in customer analytics – like churn.
Ability to predict churn, upgrade, RSP churn of customers based on,
Customer experience data
Usage behaviour
With layover of Network data on it.
External data sets like ABS, corelogic data external data
kindly fill the below details : (also kindly attach the resume)
Name AND Gender
Nationality
Current Location
Languages (add a few more tables to make it easy for the candidate if he knows more than 2 languages)
Date of Birth
Qualification
Last Employer
Total Experience
Relevant Experience
Last Salary
Expected Salary
Notice Period
Mobile Number
Mail ID
Reason for change
Passport Validity period
Contract length: 6 months
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
25 days ago
Report job"
22,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA - Australia,Not shown,South Australia,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.

This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)

As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will co nduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.

To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.

Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.



Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients



Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted

At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible - to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com .
PharmiWeb.jobs
Today
Report job"
23,Senior Data Scientist,TheDriveGroup,"$140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Join a High Performing Passionate Team
Recieve Constant Training & Development from Industry Leaders
Work on Greenfiled Big Data Projects

Senior Data Scientist / Data Analyst

This is an amazing opportunity to join an Australian owned Software Engineering company with a global reach that builds cutting-edge big data products for companies for analytics and consumer insights.

You will be joining a passionate team of high-performance big data engineers, data scientists, product managers, and software engineers giving you the opportunity to develop your skills and have exposure to multiple technologies and methodologies helping you become an expert in your area.

As Data Scientist, you will have the opportunity to work alongside the Software Engineer team and provide valuable insights during the process. You will be dealing with large Datasets on a regular basis, meaning you will need to have experience with some leading Big Data technologies (Scala being one of the leading technologies that we work with). You will also work with Spark and Redshift, and we want you to be adaptable to learning new technologies that will be implemented in the future through our technical roadmap. The role will also involve working with our NoSQL Databases (MongoDB), as you will be working with Petabyte datasets.

You will also have the opportunity to visit clients sites and gain valuable insights into the whole process of the development of new products getting and end to end picture. The visits will involve engaging the clients wants and needs, and they will set deliverables for the projects they want completed. Other visits will involve updates, issues and successes of the project(s) you are working on.

Key Skills Required
Commercial experience as Data Scientist
Experience with Machine Learning
Big Data - Scala (preferred), Spark, Kafka, Redshift
Experience with R, Python or Scala is Desirable
Strong Business Awareness
Positive Approach
Extremely passionate about solving problem
Experience writing Algorithms
Deep Learning
Stakeholder Engagement
Strong Communication skills
IT'S NICE TO HAVE
Statistical Analysis
Master's or PhD in relevant subjects
Culture & Benefits:
Opportunity to develop a career in Data Science
Real Career Progression & Certifications
Exposure to senior stakeholders at all levels of the business
This is an amazing opportunity for an aspiring Junior Data Scientist to join a team who are working on high profile projects with the latest technology. You will have constant training and development as you progress through the ranks to becoming a Senior Data Scientist. This is an immediate need and they offer a quick interview process.
30+ days ago
Report job"
24,Lead Data Scientist,Eliiza,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We're looking for a Lead Data Scientist to join our Eliiza team.
In this awesome role you will work with other smart, passionate and skilled people to deliver data science products and services to clients.
With our diverse range of clients and projects, no day will look the same - but here's a great snapshot of what's in store:
you'll get to lead client projects by carrying out technical work, engaging with key stakeholders, helping to up-skill our clients and providing delivery oversight.
support pre-sales activities through client conversations, project scoping, and helping pull together proposals.
leading our internal data science capability by mentoring other data scientists, guiding our learning and development strategy, and helping with recruitment.
Who are we?
Glad you asked! We are Eliiza. Data science. Engineered for scale.
We are a passionate and collaborative team of data scientists and engineers who apply data science and machine learning to solve real-world problems. Our mission is to create a bright future for Australian businesses and society in a world increasingly influenced by intelligent technologies.

We've built a hybrid approach to remote working where you can access one of our awesome hubs providing a space for collaboration across Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, Magnetic island (and more to come!) meaning you can choose a work model that works best for you

We've created a culture that values diversity and fosters inclusion, where our people can truly be themselves! We're focused on providing opportunities for underrepresented minority groups to work within the tech industry.
While we get excited about building AI solutions for our customers we love nothing more than being part of the broader community. You'll find us at Meetups, writing blog posts, hosting brown bag sessions and podcasts!
We're also part of Mantel Group's 'house of brands' which means it's not just the Eliiza team you'll work with, learn from and see at social events - there's another 300+ of us across DigIO, Kasna & CMD Solutions!
So you're ready for something new?
We're keen to know more about you! Our team is made up of a range of people, with different experience across a huge range of data driven skill sets.
If you're the right Lead Data Scientist for us, you'll have:
an undergraduate degree in maths or statistics, or a postgraduate in broader disciplines such as the sciences
commercial data science experience across different industries and organisations
consulting experience, either with external clients or internally within an organisation
an understanding of key statistical and machine learning concepts across different areas of data science
the ability to manipulate complex data sets to visualise and model the data
fundamental software engineering skills
the ability to plan the different phases of a data science project
an awareness of how to deliver outcomes, prioritise steps and manage a team
experience in people leadership, thought leadership and driving best practices
a genuine passion for and connection to the data science and ML community
However, we value diverse skill-sets, and don't necessarily require that you're skilled with all of the above. If you feel you don't fit all the experience/skills listed above we still encourage you to apply or get in touch.
What's on offer if you join us?
We make sure you're always one step ahead by investing your learning and development, every year. We build our own training where it doesn't exist yet.
We hire smart people and get out of their way. By focusing on our five principles and not getting caught up in red tape, we trust you to get the job done.
You'll get all the tools you need - a new iPhone or Google phone, a new Macbook Pro or Dell, and a lot of branded swag!
But hold on, you mentioned a house of brands?
We certainly did! Mantel Group is an Australian-owned, 'house of brands' company with four technology businesses (Eliiza being one of them!) across Australia. We're building a group of companies with open borders so we can support you to take on new skills without leaving an awesome team - we understand you won't have one job for life!
We may only be just over 3 years old but Mantel Group has already been recognised #9 in the 2020 Best Places to Work in Australia and #4 in the AFR's 2020 fastest growing new companies.
Keen to chat?

Click ""Apply"" to share your details with our talent team, and we'll be in touch.

In the meantime, check out 'how we hire' to find out what's in store if you're successful and get to know us better by visiting our website and following Eliiza on LinkedIn.
30+ days ago
Report job"
25,Sr. Data Scientist,Net2Source Australia,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Net2Source is a Global Workforce Solutions Company headquartered at NJ, USA with its branch offices in Asia Pacific, ANZ, middle East, UK/Europe region. We are one of the fastest growing IT Consulting company.
We are hiring "" Senior Data Scientist "" for one of our clients. We offer a wide gamut of consulting solutions customized to our 450+ clients ranging from Fortune 500/1000 to Start-ups across various verticals like Technology, Financial Services, Healthcare, Life Sciences, Oil & Gas, Energy, Retail, Telecom, Utilities, Technology, Manufacturing, the Internet, and Engineering.

Job Summary

Position : Senior Data Scientist
Location: Geelong, Victoria
Job Type: 6 Months Contract Role

Essential Functions of The Job

We are looking for Senior Data Scientist for a contract of 6 months role based out of Geelong, Victoria.

Qualifications Basic

Bachelor's degree or equivalent required from an accredited institution.

and Responsibilities
Experience in building, training and deploying Machine Learning models.
Programming experience with S3, SageMaker, lambda etc.
Extensive development experience with Spark framework.
CI/CD pipeline in AWS - Codebuild, Codpipeline, Stepfunctions etc.
Python: (PySpark, TensorFlow, Pandas, other Client libraries, Visualization libraries)
AWS: (IAM, EC2, VPC, S3, SageMaker, QuickSight, lambda, CloudFront)
Good to have: Container services (ECS, EKS, Docker)

About Net2Source Australia
Net2Source Australia is a Diversity Certified Global Workforce Solutions Company headquartered at NJ, USA with its operations in 32+ countries across The Americas, EMEA, ANZ and APAC. We offer a wide gamut of customized talent solutions including Managed IT Services, SoW, Staff Augmentation, Permanent Hiring, RPO, PEO/EOR, VMO and back office outsourcing. With over 4200+ contractors and 750+ in-house employees, and over 250+ Fortune 500/Global 2000 clients we are rated as one of the 100 fastest growing staffing firms by Staffing Industry Analysts. Want to read more about Net2Source? Visit us at https://net2source.com.au/
30+ days ago
Report job"
26,Data scientists,Oprime technologies,"$100,000 - $150,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Urgently hiring
Data scientist with 5 yr experience in python, machine learning, developing mathematical models,etc
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $100,000.00 – $150,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
26 days ago
Report job"
27,Data Scientist,Aurec,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Large Scale Manufacturing Organisation
Eastern Melbourne | Diverse Projects
12 month contract | Competitive Daily Rate
This large scale industrial manufacturing organisation is looking for an experienced Data Scientist that can create advanced analytics tools across the business.
You will be responsible for understanding what data is available (from internal and external sources), and designed advanced analytics models enabling critical business decisions from smart meters to social media.
The ideal candidate would possess the following skills/experience:
Strong commercial experience as a Data Scientist.
Deep understanding of analytics methods including statistical modelling, machine learning and/or deep learning.
Experienced with analytical tools including SQL, R, Python, Spark, Hadoop/Hive.
Prior experience in large scale manufacturing organisations would be ideal.
Hands-on experience delivering end to end data science solutions.
Ability to work with technical and business stakeholders to explain data science concepts.
Strong written and verbal communications skills.
Apply directly to this job posting or contact Jay Kacha for a confidential discussion.

Data Scientist / Python / R / Eastern Melbourne / Victoria / Machine Learning / Statistical Modelling

BBBH46045_161215769793294
14 days ago
Report job"
28,Technical Product Manager (Machine Learning),Wargaming,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job Overview
Wargaming Sydney is looking for a talented Product Manager to join our development team creating cutting edge software products for the Wargaming portfolio of games. As the Product Manager you will provide vision and strategy for the products in your portfolio; you will identify new opportunities for the studio and ensure stellar communication with our partners. Your work will impact millions of players around the world, bringing them fun, excitement and delight.
Reports To
Product Director
What will you do?
Your responsibilities will include market research, liaising with business intelligence, establishing requirements and success metrics, building a product vision, execution strategy and roadmap for software products.
What are we looking for?
The ideal candidate will have 2+ years of experience in a product management background in software technology or video games.
Knowledge / experience in the machine learning space from a conceptual level, not necessarily the low level details of libraries used.
Be able to communicate with technical stakeholders on Machine Learning subject material.
You've a clairvoyant sense for understanding customer needs and strong problem-solving ability to craft solutions to solve their problems.
Analytical, with a strong data driven mindset.
Ability to inspire the team to build amazing products with a constant dedication to understand, question and improve.
Strong communication, listening & presentation skills (verbal and written)
Possess strong negotiation and influencing skills.
What additional skills will help you stand out?
A technical background is a benefit given the nature of the products we create.
Experience in custom game engines / Unreal
Experience in balancing / mitigating risk of delivering products where the underlying technology has a strong research leaning.
Experience in taking a software product from inception, through to pitching, development and into live service is a huge plus.
About Wargaming:
Wargaming is an award-winning online game developer and publisher headquartered in Nicosia, Cyprus. Delivering legendary games since 1998, Wargaming has grown to become one of the leaders in the free-to-play MMO gaming industry with 4500+ employees and more than 20 offices globally. Over 200 million players enjoy Wargaming's titles across all major gaming platforms, including the massively popular World of Tanks and World of Warships.
Working in our company means always having interesting challenges and gaining valuable experience while working with top-class experts.
Take your place among our passionate and experienced team and bring out the best in yourself at Wargaming!

Please see Wargaming Candidate Privacy Policy for details on how Wargaming uses your personal data.
30+ days ago
Report job"
29,Lecturer - Data Science,University of New South Wales,"$109,000 - $128,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Job no: 500211
Work type: Full-time
Location: Sydney, NSW
Categories: Lecturer
Lecturer in Data Science
One of Australia’s leading research & teaching universities
Vibrant campus life with a strong sense of community & inclusion
Enjoy a career that makes a difference by collaborating & learning from the best
At UNSW, we pride ourselves on being a workplace where the best people come to do their best work.
THIS ROLE IS LOCATED IN SYDNEY, AUSTRALIA.
The School of Mathematics and Statistics currently has more than sixty continuing academic staff and more than thirty research staff as well as visiting academics. UNSW is the only university in Australia to be ranked in the top 100 in the world in Mathematics and Statistics by each of the four ranking bodies: CWTS Leiden, ARWU, USNews, QS. The School embodies a broad range of research interests in the areas of applied and pure mathematics and statistics. It has particular research strengths in Algebra and Number Theory, Bayesian and Monte Carlo Methods, Mathematical Modelling and Biomathematics, Biostatistics and Ecology, Combinatorics, Computational Mathematics, Data Science, Dynamical Systems and Integrability, Finance and Risk Analysis, Functional and Harmonic Analysis, Geometry, Mathematical Physics, Nonparametric Statistics, Ocean and Atmospheric Sciences, Optimisation, Stochastic Analysis, Stochastic Modelling and Fractional Calculus. The School's research groups are interconnected, with frequent interactions between groups and with other schools and faculties both within and outside UNSW. The School is currently expanding its teaching and research programs in Data Science. The School is affiliated with the newly established UNSW Data Science Hub which is a major strategic initiative of the Faculty of Science to cultivate and promote foundational and applied research in Data Science.
The Lecturer in Data Science will; (i) conduct research in this specialized field and align, where possible, with the existing research strengths in the School; (ii) contribute actively to the School’s teaching activities in Data Science and Statistics across a range of undergraduate and postgraduate courses, including online teaching; (iii) engage with the community and industry to build links in Data Science.
Women and candidates from diverse backgrounds are particularly encouraged to apply.
About the role
$109k - $128k - plus 17% Superannuation and leave loading
Fixed Term – 5 years CTT (Convertible Tenure Track)
Full-time (35 hours per week)
The Lecturer reports to the Head of School via the Head of Department.
Specific responsibilities for this role include:
Actively carry out research in Data Science, Mathematics and Statistics with a view to publication in influential and high-impact scholarly journals.
Work both collaboratively and independently on research grant proposals and applications to national competitive grant agencies and other funding bodies.
Develop research collaborations within the School as well as links with other groups on campus and with industry.
Develop research collaborations nationally and internationally.
Actively disseminate research findings at seminars and conferences within the School, the UNSW environment, nationally and internationally.
Supervise Honours and Masters Course Work projects; and supervise PhD and Masters Research students.
Teach data science, mathematics, and statistics courses to a range of audiences at the University.
Teach specialist Honours and Masters level courses.
Contribute to the design and delivery of the School’s face-to-face teaching programs and courses.
Contribute to the design and delivery of the School’s online teaching programs and courses.
Actively participate in School activities and demonstrate an ability and willingness take on leadership roles in the School.
Undertake administrative duties as specified by the Head of School and participate in School, Faculty and/or University committees as required.
Align with and actively demonstrate the UNSW Values in Action: Our Behaviours and the UNSW Code of Conduct.
Cooperate with all health and safety policies and procedures of the university and take all reasonable care to ensure that your actions or omissions do not impact on the health and safety of yourself or others.
About the successful applicant
To be successful in this role you will have:
PhD or equivalent qualification in relevant mathematical or data sciences.
Demonstrated research ability in Data Science, Mathematics and Statistics.
Demonstrated ability to conduct research with other researchers in the School.
Evidence of effective teaching experience.
Evidence of research group collaborations.
Capacity to conduct productive research at an international level.
Strong publication record in top, peer-reviewed journals.
A record, or demonstrated ability, of success in external research funding.
Ability to supervise PhD students.
Experience in student supervision including, for example, Honours, Masters, Vacation Scholars projects.
Willingness to engage in teaching into online programs in Data Science and Statistics.
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
You should systematically address the selection criteria listed within the position description in your application.
Please apply online - applications will not be accepted if sent to the contact listed.
Contact:
Jake Olivier
E: j.olivier@unsw.edu.au
Applications close: March 8th, 2021
Find out more about working at UNSW at www.unsw.edu.au
UNSW aspires to be the exemplar Australian university and employer of choice for people from diverse backgrounds. UNSW aims to ensure equality in recruitment, development, retention and promotion of staff and that no-one is disadvantaged on the basis of their gender, cultural background, disability, sexual orientation or identity or Indigenous heritage. We encourage everyone who meets the selection criteria to apply.
UNSW partners with Australia’s leading diversity organisations, networks, and campaigns. Please refer to UNSW’s diversity offerings for further information on our flexible work and leave options, and support for carers (childcare, parent rooms, parental leave).

Position Description
Advertised: 04 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 08 Mar 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
12 days ago
Report job"
30,"Technical Writer - Data, Cloud & Analytics!",Talent Insights Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Technical Writing, business process analysis, documentation & training + ISO
Work with cutting-edge analytics, big data and cloud platform technologies!
Great opportunity to dive into data and analytics

We are recruiting an experienced Technical Writer to work with one of Australia's leading data & analytics teams for a 6-month contract. This will see you work closely with a range of specialists including;
executives
data scientists
engineers
data analysts & data governance

What work will I be doing?

You will directly produce some extremely important documents and pieces of work, such as;
Process Diagrams & Maps
Data, computing and cloud architectures
Technology Roadmaps, RFQ/SOWs, Solution architecture documents
Internal Training Guides
Assistance in preparation for ISO certification

Why is this role different and appealing?
This team does some complex and very specialised work with big data, analytics and machine learning.
You will be the first professional technical writer to help communicate this to broader audiences.
Many of the processes and solution/data architectures you will document have never been captured before! This is an opportunity to have a bigger impact given the greenfield nature, instead of just updating legacy documentation.


If you have worked with complex technology (e.g software / cloud / legal) processes and technical writing assignments previously, this will add to that experience and expose you to some concepts, tools and tech that are in the emerging data science and machine learning fields. This could be very marketable and valuable, including for extended work within this large company!



Application process:
Please send your profile, CV or information through via the links and we will arrange a follow-up call and more information with all short-listed candidates.

This role is not suitable for graduates, we will consider people with related professional experience, such as; technical business analysts, instructional design or business process analysts.
7 days ago
Report job"
31,Data Science Lead Trainer - Contract,Good Folk,Not shown,Remote,"Remote - Australia & Singapore
The Why
The Institute of data offer programs that are life-changing educational experiences where students graduate with the skills and mind set to take on new careers in a wide variety of newly created tech and data driven roles. Their students are passionate about data and anything digital, often career changers who are working full time in a similar or unrelated field.
Together we are looking for Lead Trainers to lead this transformative experience. Part time and full time roles available for the right candidates. The work in person or remote via virtual classrooms.
The Institute of Data's - Data Science and Artificial Intelligence (AI) programs are life-changing educational experiences where students graduate with the skills and mind set to take on new careers in a wide variety of Data Science & AI roles. Students at the Institute are passionate about data science, often career changers who are working full time in a similar or unrelated field.
The What
If you are looking to make a life-changing impact by doing what you know and love, this is the position for you. Through this unparalleled opportunity, you will:
Hone your own leadership and management skills by becoming part of the team
Deepen your own skills by guiding students through a rigorous journey where they begin as driven beginners and leave as empowered data analysts and scientists.
Contribute your own expertise to a deep and broad curriculum
Facilitate a supportive and energetic community that lasts well beyond the course.
As a member of the trainer team, you will not only impact the careers of your own students who are mostly changing careers, but you’ll also have a unique opportunity to shape the potential of students.
Day to Day, you will:
Coordinate with directors with the planning and implementation of the Data Science and AI program
Deliver instructions up between 15 to 40 hours per week, including teaching, advising, and content development.
Work closely with your instructional team to provide students with meaningful and prompt feedback on their progress.
Collaborate alongside staff in order to best meet the needs and learning styles of your students.
Guide students through the development of real world projects that will showcase their abilities to hiring managers.
Facilitate a dynamic and collaborative classroom community.
Inspire students to persevere through the challenges of learning complex subjects.
Contribute to the material and direction of an expanding curriculum, ensuring the course remains cutting-edge and effective for students.
The How
Must Have:
You have previous data science or engineering teaching experience, through a course, workshop, team training, etc.
You are eager to shape the skills, minds, and trajectories of the newest generation of data scientists.
You are eager to join a fast-growing education business.
You have at least 3 years of professional data science experience.
You are an expert in SQL, Python, and related Python libraries (pandas, numpy).
You have domain expertise in statistics, mathematics, and probability.
You can build and apply statistical models in python using machine learning libraries, such as scikit-learn and statsmodels.
You have a deep understanding of statistical hypothesis testing and experimental design, data visualization techniques and tools (i.e. matplotlib, bokeh, etc), and manipulation of large data sets.
You can demonstrate and explain the function of machine learning algorithms such as regularized regression, naive bayes, decision trees, ensemble methods, KNN, K-means clustering, and neural networks.
You are the person your colleagues naturally gravitate to when they are trying to figure something out.
Nice to have:
You have proficiency with python libraries such as NLTK; Hadoop or Apache Spark; D3.js or R.
You are on top of industry trends in big data, machine learning, deep learning, and AI.
Management and/or director experience in a small business or team
Relevant data professional certification.
Sound like you ? Email Jessica@joingoodfolk.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
32,Head of Data Science,Employment Hero,"$160,000 - $200,000 a year",Remote,"Employment Hero is an Australian SaaS start-up. Our platform is the easiest way for small to medium businesses to manage HR, payroll, employee engagement and benefits. We’re on a mission to make employment easier and more rewarding, for everyone, whilst being a Remote First workplace with global ambitions!
We're looking for a Head of Data Science who enjoys solving complex problems and combining their passion for both people and product. You will be responsible for leading and overseeing our data governance, and managing a small team to design, develop, and maintain our data warehouse.
We have over 4000 clients and over 250,00 users that engage with our platform every day. The successful candidate will provide not only hands on technical leadership, but also create situations to ignite valuable data insights for growth and success within our platform.
Responsibilities
Your team will have the following responsibilities:
> Data steward of BI
> Design, development, maintenance and management of our data warehouse
> Management of the BizOps initiatives to provide automation and reporting for teams to drive efficiencies and facilitate data-informed decisions
> Product development through ML initiatives
Coach, mentor and manage two direct reports to achieve team objectives
Data governance for all internal data sources, in the areas of:
> Data access, protection and privacy
> Data quality, integrity and architecture
> Data lifecycle management
> Data reporting
> Stakeholder management, education and training of internal teams including Product, Sales, Marketing and Finance
Build production-ML models
Work with the Product team to identify new product opportunities leveraging ML
Requirements
Essential:
4+ years of experience in SQL and report writing
2+ years experience building ML models used in production environments
2+ years coding in Python or R
Degree/Masters/PhD in Maths, Engineering or Data Science
Bonus:
2+ years of experience with ETL or systems integration projects
Benefits
Self, health, wealth, happiness programs
Remote-first and flexible working arrangements
Our Sydney office is dog friendly and remains open for team meetings, collaboration days and those who need a day away from their home office (we are a COVID-safe workspace for those who choose to use it)
A generous budget to spend on setting up your home office (if you need a desk, chair, screen? You name it!)
We set you up for success with the latest and greatest hardware, tools and tech
Continuing education / post-graduate assistance program
Virtual yoga classes
Weekly virtual happy-hour and social events to get to know your new colleagues
Quarterly & yearly team celebrations
Access to the EH Employee Benefits Program and Hero Rewards Shop, of course!
**When COVID restrictions lift, for those who come to our Hub to work:
Friday drinks in our fancy in-office bar
Daily breakfast & lunch
Lunchtime personal training sessions


**When applying for this position, please fill out all of the application questions, thank you**
30+ days ago
Report job"
33,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA - Australia,Not shown,South Australia,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.

This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)

As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will co nduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.

To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.

Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.



Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients



Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted

At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible - to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com .
PharmiWeb.jobs
Today
Report job"
34,Data Scientist,Insight Timer,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are the world's largest meditation community of 18 million people, from 120 countries speaking 50+ languages. We publish 60,000 free guided meditations and music tracks by 8,000 meditation teachers and musicians from around the world.
We have been featured by TIME, Forbes, The New York Times and Vogue, and our apps have picked up the Editors Choice award by Google, and App of the Day by Apple on multiple occasions throughout the world.
The Role
More time is spent on Insight Timer than all other meditation apps combined. Data is one of our key competitive advantages as we have more variety and more depth than any other meditation app. This is a unique opportunity to be an integral part of building the nascent Data Science function at Insight Timer. We are hiring Machine Learning engineers, Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Research Scientists who are passionate about using data, ML and AI to better understand users and to offer new products and experiences that can help improve their lives.
As a Senior Data Scientist you will be integral to creating ML models and algorithms that are used in real life through creative experiments and new features. You will be instrumental in improving our recommendation engine, proposing and validating new features and understanding our tremendous dataset at a deep level.
The team includes ex-Google and ex-Atlassian employees and is advised by the former Head of Data Science at LinkedIn. You will work cross functionally and collaborate with Engineers, Designers and Product Managers to bring your insights and ideas to life.
What you’ll do:
Wrangle with the data to develop a deep understanding of our business along numerous dimensions to develop insights and hypotheses that influence our ML models, algorithms and product decisions
Design, run and analyse live experiments (A/B, multivariate and multi-armed bandit tests)
Work with Machine Learning Engineering to improve our Machine Learning models to provide better content and social recommendations
Work with Data/Feature Engineering to continuously improve and enrich our feature set in creative ways so that we can continuously improve our models and algorithms
Work with the business to communicate actionable insights based on in-depth understanding of our data
Requirements
Graduate or Masters degree in a technical field - engineering, economics, statistics or similar.
Solid understanding of statistical modelling (regression, clustering, decision trees, etc.)
Proficiency with large-scale experimentation (testing hypotheses, causal inference)
Proficiency with data querying languages (SQL, BigQuery)
Proficiency with wrangling and analysing data (Python, R)
Experience with analytics tools (Tableau, Looker)
Bonus if experienced with deep learning framework, recommender systems and/or ETL tools and piping
Benefits
Our team is a global bunch of conscious creators who are passionate about building products that make a difference. Like most of the world, we've transitioned to working from home and we’re working hard to keep our team connected. We host team meditations, focus on our wellbeing, incorporate flexibility into our work week and celebrate our successes along the way. If your application matches what we are looking for we will be in touch.
30+ days ago
Report job"
35,Data Analyst/Data Scientist - Associate,PwC,Not shown,Perth WA,"Line of Service
Assurance
Industry/Sector
Not Applicable
Specialism
Risk
Management Level
Associate
Job Description & Summary
With PwC, you’ll ignite a meaningful career while being supported by a flexible working culture, innovative learning and development opportunities and progressive policies and benefits, such as 18 weeks paid parental leave for mums, dads and foster carers (no minimum service!)
What will you create?
You’ll help Australian businesses, not-for-profits and governments create value and improve the way they work. From digitising healthcare, to creating smarter cities and igniting our start-up industry, together we build trust in society and solve important problems.
Our Data Assurance team brings this to life by helping clients to protect and strengthen every aspect of their business; from people to performance, systems to strategy and business plans to business resilience. You’ll use your data analysis and visualisation skills to communicate insights for some of Australia's largest energy, resources, utilities, government and health organisations. Helping them to solve problems such as automating financial and operational processes, digitising reporting, remediating business issues using data and identifying fraudulent activities through cross functional testing.
As an Associate in our Data Assurance team your impact will be seen by:
Partnering with clients to enable them to understand the value in their data through analytics and visualisation
Helping businesses make sense of complex data sets to improve efficiency and quality of assurance processes
Demonstrating an ability to listen, learn and understand when challenged by complex project issues
About you

You have 1-3 years experience with a background in Data Science, or Computer Science, or Programming and Applied Statistics, or Mathematics underpinned by related degree-level qualification or other fields such as Econometrics, Finance, Accounting, Commerce, Science or Engineering . You have working knowledge of process automation, reporting digitisation, and/or data governance, transformation, analysis , and experience with Alteryx, Sql, Python, R, Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Tableau and/or Qlik Sense.
Passionate about being at the forefront of change, you’re ready to help our Assurance team solve complex business issues, improve how systems work and provide confidence on the bigger decisions.
You’re collaborative and enjoy working in an innovative environment. You’re a problem solver by nature and want to join a firm that values the kind of people who reimagine the possible for their clients and stakeholders. Most importantly, you act with integrity and show care for the people you work with.

Life at PwC
Our culture and benefits are something we’re proud of, and also why we’re consistently named as one of Australia’s best workplaces. With PwC, you’ll belong to an inclusive community where differences are both embraced and the underlying driver in everything we create together.
We empower you with the technology, coaching, flexibility and trust needed to make a meaningful difference, while supporting you in bringing your whole self to work each day. We’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce because we know it’s only by working together that we can realise the potential of our people, clients and society around us.
We’re living this commitment through initiatives including our Reconciliation Action Plan to increase Indigenous employment and employee-led diversity networks promoting cultural, disability, LGBTI and gender equality. At our core we’re a people business, which means you’ll be supported not just in your professional development but your personal growth as well.
Liza Darnell is the Recruitment Manager for the role. As the team experiences high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a timely and fair process for all.
Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)
Degrees/Field of Study required:
Degrees/Field of Study preferred:
Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)
Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)
Travel Requirements
Not Specified
Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?
Yes
Government Clearance Required?
No
Job Posting End Date
March 31, 2021
18 days ago
Report job"
36,"Machine Learning Scientist - Adelaide, South Australia",Amazon Support Services PtyLtd,Not shown,Adelaide Region SA,"PhD in CS, Machine Learning, Operational research, Statistics or in a highly quantitative field. (PhD strongly preferred).
Strong Problem solving ability
Good skills in Python (or similar language)
Strong communication and data presentation skills

Interested in creating new state-of-the-art solutions using Machine Learning and Data Mining techniques on Terabytes of Data? Join our newly created Machine Learning Lab in Adelaide, South Australia!

At Amazon Australia, we are developing state-of-the-art large-scale Machine Learning Services and Applications on the Cloud involving Terabytes of data. We work on applying predictive technology to a wide spectrum of problems in areas such as Amazon Retail, Seller Services, Customer Service and so on. We are looking for talented and experienced Machine Learning Scientists (Ph.D. in a related area preferred) who can apply innovative Machine Learning techniques to real-world e-Commerce problems. You will get to work in a team dedicated to advancing Machine Learning technology at Amazon and converting it to business-impacting solutions.

Although this position will be based in Adelaide, South Australia, for the duration of the Coronavirus-19 outbreak arrangements will be made to enable the successful candidate to observe the relevant travel restrictions, possibly by working from home, or another Amazon office.

Major responsibilities
Use machine learning, data mining and statistical techniques to create new, scalable solutions for business problems
Analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of Amazon’s historical business data to help automate and optimize key processes
Design, develop and evaluate highly innovative models for predictive learning
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches

5+ years of industrial experience in predictive modeling and analysis, predictive software development
Experience handling gigabyte and terabyte size datasets
Experience working with retail or e-commerce data
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing
Experience in using R, Matlab, or any other statistical software
Experience in mentoring junior team members, and guiding them on machine learning and data modeling applications
Publications or presentation in recognized Machine Learning and Data Mining journals/conferences
Amazon.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
37,Azure Data & Analytics Engineer,Altis,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Azure Data & Analytics Engineer

Are you passionate about using data and information to deliver tangible business outcomes? This is an exciting opportunity to join a leader in the industry and be part of a high performing team.

Why Altis?
Altis Consulting was established in 1998 and has become the leading Information Management (Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing and Data Analytics) consultancy in Australia and New Zealand. We’re proud to have been recognised 10 years in a row as a Great Place to Work and of our strong company culture focused around people and enabling them to achieve their best.
As a vendor-independent consultancy, you’ll work with traditional technologies and leading edge solutions for on premise and Cloud. You’ll receive training from industry thought leaders and be mentored to develop your full potential. At Altis you’ll engage with diverse clients and industries and be part of projects that deliver tangible business outcomes.

About the role
As an Azure Data & Analytics Engineer at Altis Consulting, you will use your knowledge and experience to contribute to the delivery of projects by applying strong analytical skills and attention to detail to ensure quality outcomes for the team’s projects and activities. This will include developing the Microsoft BI and cloud stack, requirement analysis, data collection, processing, cleansing, transforming, and modelling.

Desired skills and experience:
Develop design patterns in conjunction with Solution Architecture that support the delivery of quality data and robust advanced analytical models in production.
Integrating data into analytical platforms and managing structured and unstructured data flows.
Develop, test, integrate, and deploy ETL components using AZURE Dev-Ops tools and scripting languages - as required.
Work closely with analytics and data science teams to build and optimise ‘big data’ pipelines, warehouse/data lake and reports/visualisations.
Microsoft Platform knowledge on Azure.
Experience with Data Factory, Data Lake & Data Bricks.
Data Lake Architecture & Design features decomposition.
Experience with solutions involving SQL Data Warehouse (Synapse), Azure Analysis Services.
Demonstrated knowledge and experience in designing, implementing and configuring Azure resources.
MS BI Stack experience.

What to expect as an Altis consultant
As part of an Altis team, you’ll experience the full development life-cycle and be part of a dynamic workplace in which diversity, camaraderie and professional excellence are celebrated. We like to have fun as a team, encourage knowledge sharing and continuous learning and take pride in delivering the best possible outcomes for our clients.

In addition we offer:
Competitive Salary Package
Training and Development to help propel your career
Education Support
Paid Parental Leave
Health and Wellness Program
Reward and Recognition Program
Employee Perks such as additional leave, social nights, discounts through our Rewards portal

If you think you have the necessary skills and experience to excel in this role, we are keen to speak with you.
Altis is proud to be a WORK180 Endorsed Employer for Women. If you would like to know more information about how we are supporting our employees, you can view our policies and initiatives here: https://au.work180.co/employer/altis-consulting/about

Please note that you must have the right to work in Australia to be eligible for this role.
30+ days ago
Report job"
38,Manager | Analytics,PwC,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Line of Service
Advisory
Industry/Sector
Not Applicable
Specialism
Analytics
Management Level
Manager
Job Description & Summary
With PwC, you’ll ignite a meaningful career while being supported by a flexible working culture, innovative learning and development opportunities and progressive policies and benefits, such as 18 weeks paid parental leave for mums, dads and foster carers (no minimum service!)
Join PwC's Consulting Analytics team as a Financial Services sector focused Manager to work collaboratively with our broader Consulting capability to deliver data backed, insight led solutions for our clients’ complex problems.
The role will operate from Sydney or Melbourne, and can involve work with clients from across Australia.
What will you create?
You will focus on building trusted client relationships and creating innovative, analytical solutions to provide insight and value to clients making critical business decisions.
More broadly at PwC, you’ll help Australian businesses, not-for-profits and governments create value and improve the way they work. Together we build trust in society and solve important problems.
Consulting brings this to life by helping clients improve the way they operate, reduce costs, manage risks, leverage talent, or fundamentally change the way they do business. Your work here will help organisations of all shapes and sizes work smarter and grow faster.
As a Manager in our Analytics team your impact will be seen by:
Working with the Partners, our other team leaders and broader Consulting teams on projects to establish and build trusted relationships with client executives, management and delivery teams through excellence and innovation in analytics-backed project delivery, delivering on opportunities to help solve their most complex business issues from strategy to execution
Managing small fast paced teams (typically 2 to 5 people) to design, build and deliver innovative analytics-backed solutions for the nations biggest Financial Institutions. You will begin to establish and develop key client relationships, working as a team to generate new insights, shaping propositions for clients, supporting proposal responses, structuring delivery engagements and performing team management roles for data science projects, from initiation through to successful client outcomes
Always taking a business led approach to analytics, blending your commercial understanding with your analytical experience and consulting mindset to ensure that the insight we develop can truly be used by our clients to add value to their organisation.
Helping manage and energise, cross competency teams for client project delivery, drawing on multiple skill sets to deliver client value in a highly collaborative, agile and accelerated manner using a broad range of different analytical techniques and technologies
Supporting growth of our team through sharing your analytical expertise and understanding, but also experience, energy and passion in coaching and supporting high performing analytical teams.
About you

You will most likely have a background and a track record of success in working in teams with clients to shape and deliver solutions backed by analytics. You understand the applications and benefits that analytics and innovation can bring and how to communicate this with both client executives and analytics practitioners. You have the desire and drive to develop strong and meaningful client relationships, within their team and across PwC, to help drive business growth and revenue.
You have experience of working in a fast moving, client focused and project based delivery organisation - this may include experience working within a consulting firm, analytics boutique or corporate environment with a strong analytically focused role. You have good experience developing analytical solutions using both traditional and cloud based technologies, together with an understanding and experience of the application of descriptive, predictive and prescriptive analytics techniques.
You will most likely have a hands-on analytical background, developed in a consultative environment and be able to maintain a business perspective while also being able to delve into a detailed solution level as needed with your team or clients. You will have the ability to work in teams to understand client commercial and technical objectives from stakeholders and translate those into a solution design. You will have demonstrated skills in building personal networks, hypothesis-based problem solving and the ability to execute actions effectively.
You will have good communication, presentation, project management and time-management skills. You will have the ability to handle multiple or large projects simultaneously in a fast-paced environment. You have both enthusiasm and drive to play a leadership role in our team, helping shape and develop its future.
It is likely that you will have qualifications in numerical-based and / or management based degrees, however our team does come from a wide variety of educational and technical backgrounds.
You are likely to have 5 to 7 years of experience applying advanced analytics to complex issues, with professional services experience preferred.
You will have experience of hands-on delivery and leading teams using a variety of analytical techniques and technologies . Examples could include:
Descriptive analytics: Database development, data analysis and insight generation to solve business problems (e.g. Alteryx, SQL etc). Creation of dashboards and reportings (e.g. Tableau, PowerBI, Qlik, etc.) using best practice data visualisation techniques
Predictive analytics: Development of predictive models using a wide variety of statistical models using Python and / or R. Undertaking statistical analysis (including different machine learning techniques) to identify key trends and draw out key conclusions that address the key business questions
Simulation/Optimisation: Development of simulation and/or optimisation models (both linear and nonlinear) (using tools such as AnyLogic or programming languages such as Java or Python). Undertake sensitivity analysis using methods such as Monte Carlo analysis
Data engineering & programming: Use of full stack solutions on cloud platforms (such as AWS, Azure, GCP) using microservices programming languages such as Java and or Python. Develop and maintain large and complex databases.
We would like you to have strong analytical skills in at least one, maybe two of these areas as a minimum. We are interested in recruiting different candidates with experience covering each of these areas. Please note the techniques and technologies listed are examples only and are not intended to be exhaustive or all required for a particular analytical area.
You will have good experience managing teams of 2 to 5 people using data analytics to deliver outcomes in the Financial Services Sector. Much of our work in the Financial Services team is focused on Banking and Insurance, but we also work more widely with other sectors and industries. Experience in one or more of Financial Crime, predictive risk analytics, advanced credit modelling, claims analytics and digital omni-channel management would be ideal.
You will ideally have good experience of business development, proposition and proposal development, and working with project leaders in structuring activities in a programmatic and agile or systematic way across the full delivery lifecycle.
You are passionate about being at the forefront of change, you’re ready to help our Consulting team deliver practical insight that speaks straight to the heart of client business issues and deliver innovative results.
You are highly collaborative and enjoy working in an innovative environment. You’re a problem solver by nature and want to join a firm that values the kind of people who reimagine the possible for their clients and stakeholders. Most importantly, you act with integrity and show care for the people you work with.
Life at PwC
Our culture and benefits are something we’re proud of, and also why we’re consistently named as one of Australia’s best workplaces. With PwC, you’ll belong to an inclusive community where differences are both embraced and the underlying driver in everything we create together.
We empower you with the technology, coaching, flexibility and trust needed to make a meaningful difference, while supporting you in bringing your whole self to work each day. We’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce because we know it’s only by working together that we can realise the potential of our people, clients and society around us.
We’re living this commitment through initiatives including our Reconciliation Action Plan to increase Indigenous employment and employee-led diversity networks promoting cultural, disability, LGBTI and gender equality. At our core we’re a people business, which means you’ll be supported not just in your professional development but your personal growth as well.
Steph Alderton is the Recruitment Manager for the role. As the team experiences high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a timely and fair process for all.
Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)
Degrees/Field of Study required:
Degrees/Field of Study preferred:
Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)
Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)
Travel Requirements
Not Specified
Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?
No
Government Clearance Required?
No
Job Posting End Date
February 26, 2021
30+ days ago
Report job"
39,Account Manager - Data & Analytics,Robert Walters,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Robert Walters tech and transformation division is a highly successful group consisting of five teams and 20 plus consultants including our top 2020 performers in Australia. Consultants are known for their exceptional level of service, consulting capability and industry expertise. The Financial services technology team is now looking to build on their success in line with customer demand, adding a dedicated account resource to the data and analytics specialisation.
As a Senior Consultant or Account Manager within the tech financial services team you will manage relationships and deliver data and data science recruitment specialists into our large preferred supplier accounts (PSAs) across our enterprise financial services and insurance customers. We are keen to hear from Senior Consultants or Account Managers looking to get on a clear path to progression, continue to develop their capability in data and analytics and work with a high performing, passionate and supportive team.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop business across key financial services accounts and maintain communication to build positive corporate relationship
Achieve revenue targets and meet individual and team metrics in a fast moving, constantly adapting consultative sales environment
Manage key accounts and build strong relationships to ensure revenue growth
Drive campaigns to secure top talent for clients across data and analytics
Understand clients’ business operations and consult on their desired outcomes
Develop a strong network of candidates and take the time to gain an in-depth understanding of their needs an motivations to place them in the best possible opportunity
Key Requirements:
As a Senior Consultant, a minimum of three years of experience in a recruitment consulting role within a professional discipline, ideally tech, accounting, data or analytics
Consultative approach
Strong understanding of the financial services market
Excellent time management skills with the ability to multitask
Strong relationship management and negotiation skills
Ability to use own initiative and deliver as part of a successful team
A strong work ethic and desire to achieve
Aligned to our company values: Accountability, solutions focused, roll up your sleeves, invest in yourself, placement sfirst, no ego!
Benefits
A true team-based environment that is collaborative, professional and transparent
A career, not just a job. We're looking to hire and develop the future leaders of our business
Use of cutting-edge recruitment software and technology, a Microsoft Surface Pro is provided in order to work “smart” in a flexible manner
Support from a number of back office functions such as Finance, Credit Control, Marketing, HR and IT to allow you to focus on your core activities
Global career opportunities. Once you have delivered in your role, you will be eligible to transfer to any one of our international offices across 31 countries
A global peer group, opportunity to work from our other offices when overseas
Paid parental leave after a qualifying period
Annual incentive trips for top performers to locations such as Cancun, Las Vegas and Barbados
A first class brand name and excellent reputation in our areas of specialisation both in Australia and internationally
Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Peoples are encouraged to apply. To apply please click apply or call Meghan Donnithorne on +61 2 8289 3141 for a confidential discussion.

Robert Walters tech and transformation division is a highly successful group consisting of five teams and 20 plus consultants including our top 2020 performers in Australia. Consultants are known for their exceptional level of service, consulting capability and industry expertise ...
7 days ago
Report job"
40,Research Fellow - Computer Vision and Deep Learning,University Of Western Australia,"$102,983 - $121,864 a year",Nedlands WA,"Opportunity to contribute to an industry funded project
Fixed term appointment for 2 years
Salary: Level B: $102,983 - $121,864 per annum plus Superannuation
School of Physics, Mathematics and Computing
Department of Computer Science and Software Engineering
The University of Western Australia (UWA) is ranked amongst the top 100 universities in the world and a member of the prestigious Australian Group of Eight research-intensive universities. With an enviable research track record, vibrant campus and working environments, supported by the freedom to ‘innovate and inspire’ there is no better time to join Western Australia’s top University.
About the team
The Department of Computer Science and Software Engineering under the School of Physics, Mathematics and Computing is renowned for its award-winning researchers, teachers and facilities. The broad-based undergraduate and postgraduate programs are complemented by a wide range of research activities and the School is a leader in developing graduates with high level expertise in computer programming and the methods involved in performing complex computations and processing data. In the resource rich state of Western Australia the opportunities for partnership and collaborative research are extensive and the School has well established links with industry.
About the opportunity
You will contribute to a number of industry and government funded projects involving the development of advanced computer vision and deep learning algorithms for a number of applications including ecology, agriculture, augmented reality and/or surveillance applications. You will be part of a dynamic multidisciplinary team that will contribute to new and exciting research.
To be considered for this role you will demonstrate:
PhD in Computer science or other relevant field.
Experience in the supervision of Honours, Masters and PhD students
Highly developed interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills with the ability to work effectively as part of a team and engage with relevant external stakeholders.
The ability to work independently and show initiative.
About you
To be successful in this role you will have a research track record with high quality publication outputs, relative to opportunity, in Computer Vision and Deep Learning, preferably for multi-modal and high-dimensional data and have an excellent command of relevant programming and software packages.
Full details of the position responsibilities and the selection criteria are outlined in the position description. In preparing your application you are asked to demonstrate clearly that you meet the selection criteria.
13 days ago
Report job"
41,Senior Data Scientist,TheDriveGroup,"$140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Join a High Performing Passionate Team
Recieve Constant Training & Development from Industry Leaders
Work on Greenfiled Big Data Projects

Senior Data Scientist / Data Analyst

This is an amazing opportunity to join an Australian owned Software Engineering company with a global reach that builds cutting-edge big data products for companies for analytics and consumer insights.

You will be joining a passionate team of high-performance big data engineers, data scientists, product managers, and software engineers giving you the opportunity to develop your skills and have exposure to multiple technologies and methodologies helping you become an expert in your area.

As Data Scientist, you will have the opportunity to work alongside the Software Engineer team and provide valuable insights during the process. You will be dealing with large Datasets on a regular basis, meaning you will need to have experience with some leading Big Data technologies (Scala being one of the leading technologies that we work with). You will also work with Spark and Redshift, and we want you to be adaptable to learning new technologies that will be implemented in the future through our technical roadmap. The role will also involve working with our NoSQL Databases (MongoDB), as you will be working with Petabyte datasets.

You will also have the opportunity to visit clients sites and gain valuable insights into the whole process of the development of new products getting and end to end picture. The visits will involve engaging the clients wants and needs, and they will set deliverables for the projects they want completed. Other visits will involve updates, issues and successes of the project(s) you are working on.

Key Skills Required
Commercial experience as Data Scientist
Experience with Machine Learning
Big Data - Scala (preferred), Spark, Kafka, Redshift
Experience with R, Python or Scala is Desirable
Strong Business Awareness
Positive Approach
Extremely passionate about solving problem
Experience writing Algorithms
Deep Learning
Stakeholder Engagement
Strong Communication skills
IT'S NICE TO HAVE
Statistical Analysis
Master's or PhD in relevant subjects
Culture & Benefits:
Opportunity to develop a career in Data Science
Real Career Progression & Certifications
Exposure to senior stakeholders at all levels of the business
This is an amazing opportunity for an aspiring Junior Data Scientist to join a team who are working on high profile projects with the latest technology. You will have constant training and development as you progress through the ranks to becoming a Senior Data Scientist. This is an immediate need and they offer a quick interview process.
30+ days ago
Report job"
42,Senior Software Engineer (Java) - Data Analytics Platform,Canva,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"At Canva, we work every day to make a significant positive impact on society. Our mission is to democratise design and empower creativity for anyone and everyone, on every platform!

Since launch in April 2013 we have grown exponentially, amassing over 20 million users in over 100 languages. We are one of the world’s fastest growing technology companies with software engineering being the core part of who we are.

As a Data Engineer at Canva, you will be building out the infrastructure to support the efforts of the Product, Data Science and Data Analytics capability across the entire business - ensuring we continue to deliver business value and rich features and functionality to our millions of users around the world.

Some of the technologies in our environment you’ll be working with include: Java, Scala, Terraform, Docker, Python. You'll also be heavily exposed to the tools we use within AWS, including Kinesis Data Streams (KDS), and EC2 Container Service (ECS).
Responsibilities
Designing, building, future-proofing and operating large scale data infrastructure in production (performance, reliability, monitoring)
Thinking through long-term impacts of key design decisions and handling failure scenarios
Responsibility for the continued development of new features, functionality, and optimization from raw data ingestion, to the access and serving layers
Responsibility for the delivery of Data projects from inception to deployment across a wide range of initiatives across the business; in conjunction with Growth, Experiments, Analytics, and the Data Science Team
Required Experience & Skills
Strong software engineering skills; ideally not constrained to a particular area of our stack but rather able to navigate it holistically
Strong understanding of Computer Science/Engineering fundamentals and first principles covering: non-trivial system design, concurrency, multithreading, data structures, architecture, and various design patterns
Advanced coding proficiency in Java (interview will be in Java) (Python, Scala, C#, or C++ experience is great)
Clear communication skills and ability to work cross-functionally across the business
Experience working in cloud-hosted Linux environments (AWS, Google Cloud, Azure)
Solid understanding of databases with solid working knowledge of SQL
An understanding of distributed data processing methodologies, frameworks, and best practices
Benefits
Competitive salary, plus stock options via our ESOP plan
Flexible daily working hours, we value work-life balance
Breakfast and lunch prepared by our wonderful Vibe team
Onsite-Gym and Yoga Membership
End-of-Trip Facilities: Bicycle parking and showers
Generous parental (including secondary) leave policy
Pet-friendly offices
Sponsored social clubs, team events and celebrations
Relocation budget for interstate or overseas individuals (see below for visa information)
The Canva workspace is set up for you to do your best work and have a great time doing so, with breakout areas, little nooks, and quiet places to retreat.
Want to experience Canva for yourself?
Check out what life is like at Canva on Instagram.
Check out what our users are saying about us on Twitter.
Learn how we work from Dave, our CTO
Get to know our Chef, Chris
Meet our CEO, Melanie
Finally, give Canva a go!
If you're seeking professional growth and enjoy working on large, distributed, cloud-based applications that delight our millions of individual and business users alike - then apply now to be considered for the position!
If you require visa sponsorship, you must ensure you have at least two (2) years of post-University commercial experience as a Software Engineer and meet the mandatory sponsorship requirements laid out by Department of Home Affairs.
We will not accept or review any CVs from external recruitment agencies.
5 days ago
Report job"
43,Market Insights and Analytics Senior Consultant,KPMG,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Job no: 510461
Work type: Fixed Term Full Time
Location: Melbourne
Division: Business Services
Business services opportunity (Consultant / Senior Consultant / Manager)
Data Analyst / Data Scientist
Flexible working options available
KPMG is one of the most trusted and respected global professional services firms. Through depth of expertise, clarity of insight and strength of purpose we help our clients solve complex challenges, steer change, strengthen, transition and grow. We are looking for talented people who share our purpose of inspiring confidence and empowering change for our clients, our people and our communities.
Our highly skilled Market Insights & Analytics capability helps the firm to use their data resources for creating value, enhancing competitiveness and driving business decisions using Data & Analytics. We provide unique services to the firm through undertaking strategic analytics projects, custom analytics work, proofs of concept, and uplifting the firm’s capability through exposure to cutting edge tools and techniques to build your commercial analysis skills.
Your new role
Our team is seeking data analysts to support our strong growth strategy. Working in our team you'll be mixing with some of the brightest minds while working on significant commercial projects – solving real world problems supporting our growth strategy, using some of the most exciting and interesting data you wouldn’t normally have access to. You’ll be working collaboratively within a team environment and building strong internal relationships with senior leaders.
Joining our team you’ll be working across projects that are applying data solutions to solve problems for our firm, performing one or more of the following:
Undertaking deep dive analysis of sales pipeline, market trends and signals, productivity, investment and commercial performance – using tools like SQL, PowerBI and Excel.
Solving challenging problems with Data Science and Machine Learning techniques – using tools like R and Python, and libraries like Scikit-learn, TensorFlow.
Building and deploying scalable data pipelines to clean and transform unstructured data into model-ready formats.
Having experience in one or more of the above capabilities is desirable.
You bring to the role
We are open to candidates of all skill levels and experience, looking to take the next step in their career. You’ll demonstrate your experience in a consulting environment and/or experience within industry, where you have developed your subject matter expertise and led others. You’ll need to bring an ability to work collaboratively within a team environment and to build strong client relationships. We're looking for talented people, team players and progressive thinkers who can communicate their ideas convincingly.
What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.
Advertised: 15 Dec 2020 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close:
30+ days ago
Report job"
44,"Senior Analyst, SMB Credit Risk Analytics",Zip,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About us

We are Zip, a rapidly expanding global fintech headquartered out of Sydney, Australia with a growing presence focused in the US and UK markets.

We're here to simplify how the world pays for what they need by connecting merchants with consumers and offering them fair and seamless payment solutions, everywhere. We’re also the brains behind Pocketbook, which helps almost a million Aussies take control of their money and improve their financial wellbeing.

Our values are at the heart of everything we do. They form our Mamba mentality - how we’re better than yesterday, and are used to create game-changing experiences for our customers and our people.

Central to our goal is our Analytics and Data Science function, who build the models that underpin our products, provide the insights that shape our plans, and run the experiments that move our business forward.

About the role

As we continue to build and grow our SMB lending and cashflow financing product suite, Zip Business, we need an analytics superstar to help us define a risk management strategy and framework, own risk analytics and reporting, and build the limit management strategy to support growth of the SMB portfolio.

Some projects you'll lead will include developing our self-service reporting/BI capabilities using Tableau, building risk-based pricing models and testing elasticities to optimise pricing, and ongoing improvement of our underwriting strategy. Over time, we'd love for you to manage and mentor other analysts, with a focus to grow the risk analytics capability at Zip.

This is a vital role in our mission to own the buy now pay later space for SMBs, to give them cashflow when and where they need it, and help Australia's small businesses invest in growth, capitalise on opportunity, and power the economic success of the country
To help us level up, you'll bring:
3+ years’ experience in credit risk analytics
Specific experience of working in small business lending, and a passion for the space
Excellent communication, stakeholder management and project management skills
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards using Tableau
Advanced SQL Server skills, with the ability to perform complex queries and data manipulation
Bonus points for:
Experience of developing credit risk models
Experience of ML modelling in Python or R
We’re looking for someone who always finds new boundaries to cross - a future Zipster who will obsess over excellence and make constant improvements for our customers. We’ve removed the red tape here to get things done quickly, so if you see a problem, own the solution. You've gotta hustle at Zip!

If you only meet some of the requirements for this role, that's okay. We value a diverse range of backgrounds and ideas and believe this is fundamental for our future success. So, if you have the curiosity to learn and the willingness to teach what you know, we'd love to hear from you.

We pride ourselves on creating an inclusive workplace that provides equal opportunities to all persons regardless of their age, cultural background, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, disability, veteran status, or anything else.

Benefits @ Zip

Flexible working culture
Share incentive programs
Generous paid parental leave
Birthday and wellness leave
Epic offices with a casual dress code
Fun team with high-growth hustle
Free breakfast and weekly lunches
Heaps of social events

Join us on our mission to be the first payment choice, everywhere and every day.
4 days ago
Report job"
45,Manager - Data Scientist,KPMG,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Job no: 510756
Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: Brisbane
Digital Delta Lead Data Scientist
Do you love solving complex problems, designing sophisticated solutions and building innovative technology for Australia’s largest organisations?
Are you passionate about Digital Transformation?
Do you embrace digital disruption?
Are you convinced that the Fourth Industrial Revolution is fundamentally changing the way we live, work and relate to each other?
Do you aspire to create the best customer experiences across Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI)?
Do you believe in creating powerful actionable insights from Data and Analytics?
Do you want to work in a diverse and flexible working environment?

New digital technologies and disruptive business models mean many organisations are struggling to keep pace with the transformative changes required to drive growth and meet customer demands. KPMG Digital Delta provides end-to-end digital innovation and transformation services to help overcome this challenge.

By designing and implementing new fit-for-purpose operating models, KPMG Digital Delta helps organisations to reframe their business models, improve operational productivity, create the best customer experiences, and enhance employee collaboration. We bring together best practice knowledge and technology, along with deep expertise across all industries.

More specifically, we re-imagine and re-invent organisations to become world class digital enterprises using advanced technologies, data and human insights. We help organisations to embrace Digital Strategy, Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Cognitive, the Internet of Things (IoT), Data, Analytics & Modelling, Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI) and more.

We work with clients to:
Formulate strategies that re-imagine organisations
Harness innovation from the 4th industrial revolution
Actioning insights from trusted data to consistently and quickly make clear decisions
Build adaptive organisations
Thrive as a connected enterprise – front, middle and back office

Your new role

The Lead Data Scientist will design, develop and implement practical and scalable analytic solutions. These typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will be comfortable presenting to senior stakeholders, guiding junior consultants on engagements, scoping and pricing an engagement, designing a practical delivery team structure, structuring and writing a deliverable and coding an algorithm. You will work proactively to:

Understand and explain the business impact and strategic significance of analytic outcomes to non-technical senior stakeholders.
Lead clients in the development of their in-house data, analytics environments, organisational structures and information/analytics governance.
Lead and manage the procurement and installation of analytic toolsets considering the client’s maturity and their vision for Digital Delta capabilities.
Work closely with lead architects, engineers and strategists to align collaboration priorities
Lead and manage a multi-disciplinary team of technical specialists comprising of KPMG employees, sub-contractors, vendor specialists and client employees. Define and manage performance, cost, scope, schedule and quality for the team according to the team charter.
Lead and manage the design and development of analytics assets including the identification and collection of applicable data to solve a business problem.
Lead the design, development and implementation of learning and/or optimisation solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels and networks, risk and portfolio analysis, supply chain management and marketing effectiveness.
Lead the design, development and implementation of predictive analytical models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure.
Lead the design, development and implementation of approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths required to support back-testing/test-and-learn model validation.

In addition to your focus on client engagements, you will contribute to the definition and enhancement of analytics and experimental design disciplines within the practice.

You bring to the role
A proven ability to undertake the responsibilities and requirements of the role, as listed above.
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with extensive experience explaining complex technical concepts to business focussed senior stakeholders.
Thought leadership and perspectives on solving complex problems in environments that are often ambiguous, technologically challenged and require creative and lateral thinking.
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests.
Proficiency in enforcing technical disciplines in the use of agile methodologies, version control systems, coding, testing and documentation standards to lead solution delivery
Experience with the following technologies & languages
Fluency in at least one of the following programming languages: R, Python, Scala
Familiarity with the following data-related technologies: Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala, SQL, Teradata, Oracle, SAS, MongoDB
High-level understanding of architecting cloud-based solutions with the following products: AWS Redshift/RDS, S3, EC2, Lambda, EMR, SageMaker, DynamoDB, Cloudformation, Athena, Kinesis – or equivalents in Azure or Google Cloud Platform.

What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.

Please apply for this position by submitting your confidential application online.
Advertised: 13 Jan 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
Applications close: 26 Feb 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
30+ days ago
Report job"
46,Data Scientist,Insight Timer,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are the world's largest meditation community of 18 million people, from 120 countries speaking 50+ languages. We publish 60,000 free guided meditations and music tracks by 8,000 meditation teachers and musicians from around the world.
We have been featured by TIME, Forbes, The New York Times and Vogue, and our apps have picked up the Editors Choice award by Google, and App of the Day by Apple on multiple occasions throughout the world.
The Role
More time is spent on Insight Timer than all other meditation apps combined. Data is one of our key competitive advantages as we have more variety and more depth than any other meditation app. This is a unique opportunity to be an integral part of building the nascent Data Science function at Insight Timer. We are hiring Machine Learning engineers, Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Research Scientists who are passionate about using data, ML and AI to better understand users and to offer new products and experiences that can help improve their lives.
As a Senior Data Scientist you will be integral to creating ML models and algorithms that are used in real life through creative experiments and new features. You will be instrumental in improving our recommendation engine, proposing and validating new features and understanding our tremendous dataset at a deep level.
The team includes ex-Google and ex-Atlassian employees and is advised by the former Head of Data Science at LinkedIn. You will work cross functionally and collaborate with Engineers, Designers and Product Managers to bring your insights and ideas to life.
What you’ll do:
Wrangle with the data to develop a deep understanding of our business along numerous dimensions to develop insights and hypotheses that influence our ML models, algorithms and product decisions
Design, run and analyse live experiments (A/B, multivariate and multi-armed bandit tests)
Work with Machine Learning Engineering to improve our Machine Learning models to provide better content and social recommendations
Work with Data/Feature Engineering to continuously improve and enrich our feature set in creative ways so that we can continuously improve our models and algorithms
Work with the business to communicate actionable insights based on in-depth understanding of our data
Requirements
Graduate or Masters degree in a technical field - engineering, economics, statistics or similar.
Solid understanding of statistical modelling (regression, clustering, decision trees, etc.)
Proficiency with large-scale experimentation (testing hypotheses, causal inference)
Proficiency with data querying languages (SQL, BigQuery)
Proficiency with wrangling and analysing data (Python, R)
Experience with analytics tools (Tableau, Looker)
Bonus if experienced with deep learning framework, recommender systems and/or ETL tools and piping
Benefits
Our team is a global bunch of conscious creators who are passionate about building products that make a difference. Like most of the world, we've transitioned to working from home and we’re working hard to keep our team connected. We host team meditations, focus on our wellbeing, incorporate flexibility into our work week and celebrate our successes along the way. If your application matches what we are looking for we will be in touch.
30+ days ago
Report job"
47,Digital Data Analytics,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Digital Data Analytics
Melbourne
Permanent opportunity
One of the largest financial organisation
Work life balance
Purpose of the Role:
Ensuring digital data and insights are captured, stored and utilized by the business, driving commercial value and driving strategic decision making. To set and implement the data strategy for our digital channels. This role will ensure we have digital data analytics to optimise the adoption of digital channels, drive continous improvements for customers, improve feature utilisation and influence investment into our channels
Core Responsibilities:
Manage a functional area or a collection of related activities to achieve identified objectives. Employees at this Group would be expected to provide advice for a variety of diverse tasks or problems based on the application of judgment in their area of expertise/responsibility.
Maintain consistency of analytics tagging practices and framework
Define and implement data implementation strategy for digital channels including tag management and other data implementation requirements (e.g. Adobe implementation, Amazon data capture/storage)
Manage and maintain digital data model for each platform, ensuring good data quality and reliability
Responsible for ensuring data is being effectively captured from new digital features and products
Ensuring effective data scripting and data transformation (raw data to structured data) as well as automation of data extraction and data population
Proactively manage risk, meeting all policy and compliance requirements; perform controls; adhere to process and procedures pertinent to role; and escalate events, issues or breaches as they are identified (risk accountability forms part of all roles, as everyone is responsible for managing risk and compliance).
Experience / core capabilities required:
Data analytics / Data science
Data strategy and information management
Customer centric focus: A proactive focus on the customer and driving outcomes
Collaborative: Strong collaboration and engagement for flexible modes of working
Continuous improvement: A mindset of continuous improvement and innovation
Agile: Role-modelling of agile ways of working, including sharing methodology and best practices
Leadership: Advocacy of employees across the organisation to build the skills and competencies they need to effectively use and understand new and existing digital capabilities
How to apply:
Please apply calling (Sanky – 03 8506 6541) for further details and share your resumes in Word Format only. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted. Please share your resume in Word format only.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
48,Senior Data Analytics Manager,Talent International,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Opportunity to join this global FMCG organisation to lead the center of excellence for analytics capabilities, and to deliver critical business projects working in collaboration with the entire business.

Key accountabilities
Provide technical analytics leadership for the direct team and coaching the broader business
Define and implement the Analytics Roadmap, including continuous improvement
Partner with key Commercial teams to Interpret, validate and explain findings, and ensure that insights lead to appropriate actions
Influence and collaborate with teams to deliver future solutions
Deliver these advanced analytics projects and proof of concepts
Embrace design thinking, storytelling and translating insights into decisions and actions
Skills and experience
Experience leading and mentoring an Analytics / Data Science team
Strong background in Advanced Analytics / Data Science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Experience working on high volume data projects
Exceptional engagement skills with both senior business and technical teams
Strong leadership and mentoring skills
Experience working in a fast paced Agile project environment
Apply now to secure an interview, or contact Carly Llorente on 9236 7704 for a confidential discussion.
14 days ago
Report job"
49,Lead Data Scientist,Eliiza,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We're looking for a Lead Data Scientist to join our Eliiza team.
In this awesome role you will work with other smart, passionate and skilled people to deliver data science products and services to clients.
With our diverse range of clients and projects, no day will look the same - but here's a great snapshot of what's in store:
you'll get to lead client projects by carrying out technical work, engaging with key stakeholders, helping to up-skill our clients and providing delivery oversight.
support pre-sales activities through client conversations, project scoping, and helping pull together proposals.
leading our internal data science capability by mentoring other data scientists, guiding our learning and development strategy, and helping with recruitment.
Who are we?
Glad you asked! We are Eliiza. Data science. Engineered for scale.
We are a passionate and collaborative team of data scientists and engineers who apply data science and machine learning to solve real-world problems. Our mission is to create a bright future for Australian businesses and society in a world increasingly influenced by intelligent technologies.

We've built a hybrid approach to remote working where you can access one of our awesome hubs providing a space for collaboration across Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, Magnetic island (and more to come!) meaning you can choose a work model that works best for you

We've created a culture that values diversity and fosters inclusion, where our people can truly be themselves! We're focused on providing opportunities for underrepresented minority groups to work within the tech industry.
While we get excited about building AI solutions for our customers we love nothing more than being part of the broader community. You'll find us at Meetups, writing blog posts, hosting brown bag sessions and podcasts!
We're also part of Mantel Group's 'house of brands' which means it's not just the Eliiza team you'll work with, learn from and see at social events - there's another 300+ of us across DigIO, Kasna & CMD Solutions!
So you're ready for something new?
We're keen to know more about you! Our team is made up of a range of people, with different experience across a huge range of data driven skill sets.
If you're the right Lead Data Scientist for us, you'll have:
an undergraduate degree in maths or statistics, or a postgraduate in broader disciplines such as the sciences
commercial data science experience across different industries and organisations
consulting experience, either with external clients or internally within an organisation
an understanding of key statistical and machine learning concepts across different areas of data science
the ability to manipulate complex data sets to visualise and model the data
fundamental software engineering skills
the ability to plan the different phases of a data science project
an awareness of how to deliver outcomes, prioritise steps and manage a team
experience in people leadership, thought leadership and driving best practices
a genuine passion for and connection to the data science and ML community
However, we value diverse skill-sets, and don't necessarily require that you're skilled with all of the above. If you feel you don't fit all the experience/skills listed above we still encourage you to apply or get in touch.
What's on offer if you join us?
We make sure you're always one step ahead by investing your learning and development, every year. We build our own training where it doesn't exist yet.
We hire smart people and get out of their way. By focusing on our five principles and not getting caught up in red tape, we trust you to get the job done.
You'll get all the tools you need - a new iPhone or Google phone, a new Macbook Pro or Dell, and a lot of branded swag!
But hold on, you mentioned a house of brands?
We certainly did! Mantel Group is an Australian-owned, 'house of brands' company with four technology businesses (Eliiza being one of them!) across Australia. We're building a group of companies with open borders so we can support you to take on new skills without leaving an awesome team - we understand you won't have one job for life!
We may only be just over 3 years old but Mantel Group has already been recognised #9 in the 2020 Best Places to Work in Australia and #4 in the AFR's 2020 fastest growing new companies.
Keen to chat?

Click ""Apply"" to share your details with our talent team, and we'll be in touch.

In the meantime, check out 'how we hire' to find out what's in store if you're successful and get to know us better by visiting our website and following Eliiza on LinkedIn.
30+ days ago
Report job"
50,Senior Data Scientist,TheDriveGroup,"$140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Join a High Performing Passionate Team
Recieve Constant Training & Development from Industry Leaders
Work on Greenfiled Big Data Projects

Senior Data Scientist / Data Analyst

This is an amazing opportunity to join an Australian owned Software Engineering company with a global reach that builds cutting-edge big data products for companies for analytics and consumer insights.

You will be joining a passionate team of high-performance big data engineers, data scientists, product managers, and software engineers giving you the opportunity to develop your skills and have exposure to multiple technologies and methodologies helping you become an expert in your area.

As Data Scientist, you will have the opportunity to work alongside the Software Engineer team and provide valuable insights during the process. You will be dealing with large Datasets on a regular basis, meaning you will need to have experience with some leading Big Data technologies (Scala being one of the leading technologies that we work with). You will also work with Spark and Redshift, and we want you to be adaptable to learning new technologies that will be implemented in the future through our technical roadmap. The role will also involve working with our NoSQL Databases (MongoDB), as you will be working with Petabyte datasets.

You will also have the opportunity to visit clients sites and gain valuable insights into the whole process of the development of new products getting and end to end picture. The visits will involve engaging the clients wants and needs, and they will set deliverables for the projects they want completed. Other visits will involve updates, issues and successes of the project(s) you are working on.

Key Skills Required
Commercial experience as Data Scientist
Experience with Machine Learning
Big Data - Scala (preferred), Spark, Kafka, Redshift
Experience with R, Python or Scala is Desirable
Strong Business Awareness
Positive Approach
Extremely passionate about solving problem
Experience writing Algorithms
Deep Learning
Stakeholder Engagement
Strong Communication skills
IT'S NICE TO HAVE
Statistical Analysis
Master's or PhD in relevant subjects
Culture & Benefits:
Opportunity to develop a career in Data Science
Real Career Progression & Certifications
Exposure to senior stakeholders at all levels of the business
This is an amazing opportunity for an aspiring Junior Data Scientist to join a team who are working on high profile projects with the latest technology. You will have constant training and development as you progress through the ranks to becoming a Senior Data Scientist. This is an immediate need and they offer a quick interview process.
30+ days ago
Report job"
51,Dataops Analytics Engineer,HAYS,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Python - Ansible - Linux - Scala - Java - Hadoop - Spark - Apache Airlfow - Nifi - AWS

Your new company
You will be working for a Federal Government Department.

Your new role
As the Data Analytics engineer you will be configuring and setting up advanced data environments to ensure the department can extract strong analytical outcomes from their data. You will be working closely with the Software engineering and Data Science teams to understand their data requirements.

What you'll need to succeed
High proficiency in the administration and troubleshooting of Linux based operating systems, experience using automation and configuration management tools such as Ansible.
Good software engineering skills, including experience with one or more of the following languages: Scala, Python or Java and use of modern engineering practices such as version control, continuous integration/delivery, DevOps, etc.
Experience with the Apache big-data ecosystem, including Hadoop and Spark.
Experience with SQL RDBMS; e.g., writing complex queries and analysing query plans.
Experience in transforming and manipulating large datasets in preparation for data analysis.
Experience in orchestrating complex data pipelines, e.g. using Apache AirFlow, NiFi, etc.
Knowledge of AWS, including security controls, and experience provisioning cloud infrastructure using Terraform.
Prior experience working in DataOps or Analytics Engineering on a large data-focused project. Experience working on research and development projects will be highly regarded.
You must be an Australian citizen and will possess or be willing to go through the process to obtain and maintain a (Baseline, NV1 or NV2) personnel security clearance.

What you'll get in return
This role will give you the opportunity to work with some very interesting subject matter. The aim of the analytics operations is to detect fraud, money laundering and the funding of terrorist activities. This area is well known for having a very advanced and cutting edge analytics environment. There is a long term 12 + 12 + 12 Month contract on offer for the successful candidate.

What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV. Call Liam O'Meara on 0429363994 or email Liam.omeara@hays.com.au for any questions relating to this role.

LHS 297508 #2410173
30+ days ago
Report job"
52,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA - Australia,Not shown,South Australia,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.

This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)

As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will co nduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.

To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.

Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.



Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients



Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted

At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible - to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com .
PharmiWeb.jobs
Today
Report job"
53,Analytics Translator,Kmart,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: VIC Metro
Categories: Information Technology
About Kmart Group
The Kmart Group is comprised of Kmart and Target, Catch, ANKO and the Kmart Group Asia sourcing business. It was formed as the Department Stores Division in February 2016 and rebranded to the Kmart Group in November 2018. The division operates 520 stores across Australia and New Zealand and employs more than 44,000 team members.
Culture
You’ll be joining a dynamic team with a fantastic culture where diversity is openly celebrated, and you’ll be challenged and supported to achieve personal and business goals. Expect a work environment that is highly collaborative, fast-paced, inclusive and progressive - with no two days the same! Our values – Think Customer, Take Care, Live Integrity, Grow Together and Reach Higher will resonate with you deeply and you’ll enjoy being part of a growing, iconic Australian business that has a fantastic culture that is non-hierarchical, diverse and inclusive.
What we’re looking for?
Are you customer obsessed and analytical, execution focused and passionate about Retail? Do you want to be a part of one of the biggest and high performing retailers in the country with increased focus on understanding our customers and meeting their needs through reduced time to market? Are you interested in working in a high impact role? If yes, this opportunity will appeal to you. Join our Data & Analytics team and help understand the problems we are trying to solve by leveraging data & analytics led solutions.
The role will contribute to Kmart’s vision of understanding our customers to be able to exceed their expectations and provide them with the products they need at a time and place of their choosing.
Primary Responsibilities
Leverage data to define business problems: As the Analytics Translator, you will work closely with our Store Central Operations business and act as an informed consultant to help define the problems and opportunities by leveraging the insights you gain from the data.
Roadmap Planning: You will be part of a cross-functional squad consisting of Data Scientists, Loss Prevention specialists, Merchandise & Inventory Planners, Data Engineers and Developers to plan and prioritise data products. You will use high judgement to make critical trade-offs, balancing both business requirements and technological trade-offs.
Requirements definition & delivery: In conjunction with the squad, you will effectively prioritise and manage the scope of each product feature to deliver key benefits on time. Features will be delivered iteratively and with high velocity.
Product roll-out & benefit realisation: In conjunction with the business owner and the data scientists, execute go-to market plans for new features, monitor key performance metrics and realise benefits.
About You
To meet the challenges of this role, you will ideally possess the following skills and experience;
Previous experience working in Retail in Merchandising, Supply Chain and Loss Prevention areas
Strong analytical and quantitative skills with the ability to use & interpret data and structure problems
Superior written and verbal communication skills with proven experience in creating compelling positioning/messaging strategy and present complex information clearly and concisely
Experience in working directly with a wide range of internal stakeholders
Experience working with Data Science and Engineering teams to rapidly deliver high-impact capabilities to market in an Agile environment
Intermediate SQL and excel skills
Prior experience in data product management is preferable
You will be afforded autonomy and accountability in your role and have access to development opportunities across both Kmart and the Wesfarmers Group, excellent remuneration, inclusion in company bonus scheme & access to Wesfarmers share plan (both for eligible team members), free parking and benefits program including a discount card for Kmart, Coles, Target and Officeworks.
At Kmart Group we aim to ensure our teams reflect the diversity of the communities in which we operate.
Candidates interested in this position should apply directly to this advertisement as we are not accepting applications from recruitment agencies.

Advertised: 16 Sep 2020 AUS Eastern Standard Time
Applications close:
30+ days ago
Report job"
54,Strategic Manager – Data Science,Precision Sourcing,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"December 21, 2020
Diverse range of projects that will challenge you and grow your skill set
Develop and lead a small team of high performing analysts and data scientists
Fast pace, data driven and growth focussed environment

About the Role
Solve problems in public policy, economics and social impact
Project manage and deliver large scale projects that impact society
Present recommendations to all clients in a concise and value driven way
Manage and mentor a small team of client facing, high performing data scientists
Experience Required
7 + years commercial experience in a Data Science/Quantitaive role
Must have experience having managed a small team or mentored a small team
Quantitative background or degree in Maths/Stats/Economics or Actuarial
Experience in consulting and ideally within public policy
Strong communicator and ability to manage stakeholders expectations
You must either be based in Canberra, or willing to move for the opportunity to work with a team of bright and passionate professionals.
Please APPLY NOW with a Word version of your resume.
For further information call Emily Nota on 02 8246 7711.
30+ days ago
Report job"
55,Cloud Engineer - Big Data,AWS Australia Pty Ltd,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Big Data role supports our services that leverage data and produce business insights, which may include using Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence (ML/AI). Helping our customers use and integrate Big Data services in what is arguably our industry’s most exciting space. The portfolio of services covers EMR (Hadoop), DynamoDB (NoSQL), MangoDB, and Apache Cassandra.
Advanced experience in Apache Hadoop, Apache Spark, Apache Hive, and Presto
Advanced experience in DynamoDB or NoSQL technologies like MongoDB or Cassandra
Advanced experience with System Administration with Linux (RHEL/CentOS) including Microsoft Active Directory, and LDAP integration.
Experience with troubleshooting Kerberos Authentication problems.
Experience with Network troubleshooting.
Basic understanding of Machine Learning and statistics
Experience with Java and Python and shell scripting
Bachelor’s degree in Information Science / Information Technology, Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics, or a related field OR equivalent experience in a technical position
ABOUT US

Amazon Web Services is the market leader and technology forerunner in the Cloud business. As a member of the AWS Support team you will be at the forefront of this transformational technology, assisting a global list of companies and developers that are taking advantage of a growing set of services and features to run their mission-critical applications. As a Cloud Support Engineer, you will act as the ‘Cloud Ambassador’ across all the cloud products, arming our customers with required tools & tactics to get the most out of their Product and Support investment.

Would you like to use the latest cloud computing technologies? Do you have an interest in helping customers understand application architectures and integration approaches? Are you familiar with best practices for applications, servers and networks? Do you want to be part of a customer facing technology team helping to ensure the success of Amazon Web Services (AWS) as a leading technology organization?

If you fit the description, you might be the person we are looking for! We are a group of smart people, passionate about cloud computing, and believe that world class support is critical to customer success.

WHAT CAN YOU EXPECT FROM A LIFE AT AWS?

Every day will bring new and exciting challenges on the job while you:
Learn and use groundbreaking technologies.
Apply advanced troubleshooting techniques to provide unique solutions to our customers' individual needs.
Interact with leading engineers around the world.
Partner with Amazon Web Services teams to help reproduce and resolve customer issues.
Leverage your extensive customer support experience to provide feedback to internal AWS teams on how to improve our services.
Drive customer communication during critical events.
Drive projects that improve support-related processes and our customers’ technical support experience.
Write tutorials, how-to videos, and other technical articles for the developer community.
Work on critical, highly complex customer problems that may span multiple AWS services.
WHY AWS SUPPORT?
First and foremost this is a customer support role – in The Cloud.
On a typical day, a Support Engineer will be primarily responsible for solving customer’s cases through a variety of customer contact channels which include telephone, email, and web/live chat. You will apply advanced troubleshooting techniques to provide tailored solutions for our customers and drive customer interactions by thoughtfully working with customers to dive deep into the root cause of an issue.
Apart from working on a broad spectrum of technical issues, an AWS Support Engineer may also coach/mentor new hires, develop & present training, partner with development teams on complex issues or contact deflection initiatives, participate in new hiring, write tools/script to help the team, or work with leadership on process improvement and strategic initiatives.
Career development: We promote advancement opportunities across the organization to help you meet your career goals.
Training: We have training programs to help you develop the skills required to be successful in your role.We hire smart people who are keen to build a career with AWS, so we are more interested in the areas that you do know instead of those you haven’t been exposed to yet.
Support engineers interested in travel have presented training or participated in focused summits across our sites or at specific AWS events.
As we operate on a follow-the-sun model, with Premium Support sites located globally, there is no after hours on-call or mandated overtime in this role.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GC3bWcFFZTo&t=24s

Expert experience in the Hadoop Ecosystem including Apache Spark and Presto
Expert experience in NoSQL
Expert experience with blockchain technologies like Etherium
Expert experience in data Data Lake architecture and administration
Experience managing full application stacks from the OS up through custom applications
Prior work experience with AWS - any or all of EC2, VPC, S3, RDS, EMR, Glue, SageMaker
Excellent knowledge of Hadoop architecture, administration and support
Expert understanding of distributed computing principles and their application in the cloud
Good understanding of distributed computing environments
Lead technical discussions on big data systems architecture and design
Strong analysis and troubleshooting skills and experience
AWS Certified Solutions Architect
AWS certified Big Data Specialty
Master’s degree in Information Science / Information Technology, Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics, or a related field OR equivalent experience in a technical position
Amazon Web Services is an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Amazon.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
56,Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP,Oracle,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP-20000SHH

Applicants are required to read, write, and speak the following languages: English
Preferred Qualifications

Principal Member of Technical Staff - Digital Assistant and Bots Platform Team

We are a newly formed group within Oracle creating innovative products that leverage the power of AI and Machine Learning to bring world-class speech, vision and natural language capabilities to Oracle’s Digital Assistant platform. We are like a start-up inside a large company with a big charter and a lot of creative freedom. We have assembled some of the smartest people in the industry and are growing this team.
If you are looking for an exciting new opportunity as a data scientist to help solve difficult problems, be creative, create success for customers, and engage with the product team to do some innovative research and development, please review our profile.

We are looking for someone who is:

Experienced with Machine Learning and AI especially deep learning models.
Experienced with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch.
Experienced with Conversational AI / Chatbots and/or Digital Assistants, including having developed a Chatbot or similar Digital Assistant is a plus.
Ph.D. degree in computer science on natural language processing, speech processing, computer vision is preferred but not a must. A strong publication record is a plus.
Possesses excellent communication skills with an ability to explain and write specifications that embody complex concepts to stakeholders within the team.
Eager to work on a highly sellable, performance optimized infrastructure which elastically handles customer needs.
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment and can quickly adjust to changing priorities.
Detail oriented with a focus on quality of the product, data, and code.
An experienced engineer with 3+ years of professional development in Java, C#, C++ or Python. Java and Python preferred. JavaScript, Node.js, HTML/CSS and Mobile development on Android/iOS is a plus.

DUTIES:

Keep track of and experiment with state of the art dialog systems both from academia and industry to keep pushing the market competitiveness of ODA.
Involve in all steps of software life cycle such as planning, coding, testing and maintenance to productize developed models.
Involve in planning and budgeting product roadmap.
Write papers/reports and communicate results to stakeholders and customers.
Require to communicate and coordinate with ODA head office (California) and European team as necessary which may include travel and after-hour participation.
Detailed Description and Job Requirements
Design, develop, troubleshoot and debug software programs for databases, applications, tools, networks etc.

As a member of the software engineering division, you will take an active role in the definition and evolution of standard practices and procedures. You will be responsible for defining and developing software for tasks associated with the developing, designing and debugging of software applications or operating systems.

Work is non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in area of specialization. Leading contributor individually and as a team member, providing direction and mentoring to others. BS or MS degree or equivalent experience relevant to functional area. 7 years of software engineering or related experience.
Job: Product Development
Location: AU-AU,Australia-Melbourne
Job Type: Regular Employee Hire
Organization: Oracle
30+ days ago
Report job"
57,Senior Manager Data Analytics,Aston Carter,Not shown,East Melbourne VIC,"Job Snapshot


Location:
Melbourne East
Work Type:
Permanent
Category:
Sales & Marketing
Job ID:
523222

Job Summary
Fast-paced growth and innovation environment
Renown international brand renown as a Tech innovator
Join a business with inclusivity and sustainability as part of its core mission statement

The Role's Purpose:
Our client is a global retail business specializing in innovative healthcare devices with inclusivity and sustainability as part of its core mission statement. This is a newly created role for a Data Science leader to join an International global business, reporting to the Head of CRM and Operations, you will play a leadership role for data science across the organisation. With exposure to the entire business and customer journey, you will work to optimise marketing campaigns to generate business opportunity and growth.

About the Role:
Use your advanced analytics skills to extract key insights from large and complex data sets
Collaborate in the delivery of a suite of best-in-class user-cases covering the entire customer journey
Build data-driven models to answer key business needs
Create hypotheses and experiments to uncover hidden insights to drive new Sales strategies
Develop visualisations to influence key stakeholders and draw on your strong communication skills to tell the story ""behind the data"". Develop machine learning models to facilitate Sales processes.
Work collaboratively with other teams across marketing, CRM, IT, Reporting and Analytics to develop operational processes and pipelines
Skills and Experience Required:
Background and degree in quantitative fields like mathematics, physics, computing or engineering
8+ years experience in a similar role across customer data, insights and analytics
Communication and presentation skills and a demonstrable ability to influence key stakeholders
Strong demonstrable analytical, critical-thinking skills
Expertise in management of complex structures of data, SQL, R or Python, Power BI, SSRS, Dataiku.
Forward-thinking mentality; ability to asses ""as-is"" and ""to-be"".
Ability to manage conflicting priorities in a fast-paced environment


If this role sounds like you, hit APPLY or email Michael Brady at michael.brady@astoncarter.com

Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted. Closing date : 15th Feb 2021
26 days ago
Report job"
58,Data Scientist,Zone IT Solutions,"$80,000 - $180,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"We are hiring for a Data Scientist for a Global Consulting client in Melborne.

Requirements:
Key Requirements

Core exp as a Data Scientist – developing and optimizing algorithms using ML and non-ML techniques
Exp in using Azure ML services, DataBricks

Benefits:
About Us:
Zone IT Solutions is Australia based Recruitment company. We specialize in ERP and larger IT Services. We offer flexible, efficient and collaborative solutions to any organization that requires IT, experts. Our agile, agnostic and flexible solutions will help you source the IT Expertise you need. Our delivery Offices are in Melbourne, Sydney, Singapore, and India. If you are looking for new opportunities your profile at Careers@zoneitsolutions.com or contact us at 0434189909
Also follow our LinkedIn page for new job opportunities and more.

Zone IT Solutions is an equal opportunity employer and our recruitment process focuses on essential skills and abilities. We welcome applicants from a diverse range of backgrounds, including Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples, people from culturally and linguistically diverse (CALD) backgrounds and people with disabilities.
30+ days ago
Report job"
59,Lecturer - Data Science,University of New South Wales,"$109,000 - $128,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Job no: 500211
Work type: Full-time
Location: Sydney, NSW
Categories: Lecturer
Lecturer in Data Science
One of Australia’s leading research & teaching universities
Vibrant campus life with a strong sense of community & inclusion
Enjoy a career that makes a difference by collaborating & learning from the best
At UNSW, we pride ourselves on being a workplace where the best people come to do their best work.
THIS ROLE IS LOCATED IN SYDNEY, AUSTRALIA.
The School of Mathematics and Statistics currently has more than sixty continuing academic staff and more than thirty research staff as well as visiting academics. UNSW is the only university in Australia to be ranked in the top 100 in the world in Mathematics and Statistics by each of the four ranking bodies: CWTS Leiden, ARWU, USNews, QS. The School embodies a broad range of research interests in the areas of applied and pure mathematics and statistics. It has particular research strengths in Algebra and Number Theory, Bayesian and Monte Carlo Methods, Mathematical Modelling and Biomathematics, Biostatistics and Ecology, Combinatorics, Computational Mathematics, Data Science, Dynamical Systems and Integrability, Finance and Risk Analysis, Functional and Harmonic Analysis, Geometry, Mathematical Physics, Nonparametric Statistics, Ocean and Atmospheric Sciences, Optimisation, Stochastic Analysis, Stochastic Modelling and Fractional Calculus. The School's research groups are interconnected, with frequent interactions between groups and with other schools and faculties both within and outside UNSW. The School is currently expanding its teaching and research programs in Data Science. The School is affiliated with the newly established UNSW Data Science Hub which is a major strategic initiative of the Faculty of Science to cultivate and promote foundational and applied research in Data Science.
The Lecturer in Data Science will; (i) conduct research in this specialized field and align, where possible, with the existing research strengths in the School; (ii) contribute actively to the School’s teaching activities in Data Science and Statistics across a range of undergraduate and postgraduate courses, including online teaching; (iii) engage with the community and industry to build links in Data Science.
Women and candidates from diverse backgrounds are particularly encouraged to apply.
About the role
$109k - $128k - plus 17% Superannuation and leave loading
Fixed Term – 5 years CTT (Convertible Tenure Track)
Full-time (35 hours per week)
The Lecturer reports to the Head of School via the Head of Department.
Specific responsibilities for this role include:
Actively carry out research in Data Science, Mathematics and Statistics with a view to publication in influential and high-impact scholarly journals.
Work both collaboratively and independently on research grant proposals and applications to national competitive grant agencies and other funding bodies.
Develop research collaborations within the School as well as links with other groups on campus and with industry.
Develop research collaborations nationally and internationally.
Actively disseminate research findings at seminars and conferences within the School, the UNSW environment, nationally and internationally.
Supervise Honours and Masters Course Work projects; and supervise PhD and Masters Research students.
Teach data science, mathematics, and statistics courses to a range of audiences at the University.
Teach specialist Honours and Masters level courses.
Contribute to the design and delivery of the School’s face-to-face teaching programs and courses.
Contribute to the design and delivery of the School’s online teaching programs and courses.
Actively participate in School activities and demonstrate an ability and willingness take on leadership roles in the School.
Undertake administrative duties as specified by the Head of School and participate in School, Faculty and/or University committees as required.
Align with and actively demonstrate the UNSW Values in Action: Our Behaviours and the UNSW Code of Conduct.
Cooperate with all health and safety policies and procedures of the university and take all reasonable care to ensure that your actions or omissions do not impact on the health and safety of yourself or others.
About the successful applicant
To be successful in this role you will have:
PhD or equivalent qualification in relevant mathematical or data sciences.
Demonstrated research ability in Data Science, Mathematics and Statistics.
Demonstrated ability to conduct research with other researchers in the School.
Evidence of effective teaching experience.
Evidence of research group collaborations.
Capacity to conduct productive research at an international level.
Strong publication record in top, peer-reviewed journals.
A record, or demonstrated ability, of success in external research funding.
Ability to supervise PhD students.
Experience in student supervision including, for example, Honours, Masters, Vacation Scholars projects.
Willingness to engage in teaching into online programs in Data Science and Statistics.
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
You should systematically address the selection criteria listed within the position description in your application.
Please apply online - applications will not be accepted if sent to the contact listed.
Contact:
Jake Olivier
E: j.olivier@unsw.edu.au
Applications close: March 8th, 2021
Find out more about working at UNSW at www.unsw.edu.au
UNSW aspires to be the exemplar Australian university and employer of choice for people from diverse backgrounds. UNSW aims to ensure equality in recruitment, development, retention and promotion of staff and that no-one is disadvantaged on the basis of their gender, cultural background, disability, sexual orientation or identity or Indigenous heritage. We encourage everyone who meets the selection criteria to apply.
UNSW partners with Australia’s leading diversity organisations, networks, and campaigns. Please refer to UNSW’s diversity offerings for further information on our flexible work and leave options, and support for carers (childcare, parent rooms, parental leave).

Position Description
Advertised: 04 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 08 Mar 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
12 days ago
Report job"
60,"Supply Chain & Operational Analytics Senior Consultant/Manager, Strategy & Transactions",Ernst & Young,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Covid-19 pandemic is creating seismic challenges around the world. Our purpose, to build a better working world, has never been more important. Life at EY has been transformed dramatically but our strong culture of flexible and remote working has helped EY people navigate new ways of working and remain connected with each other and our clients.
A better working world truly starts with the people at EY who are building it every day. Now more than ever we need talented people from diverse backgrounds to help our clients navigate the complexities of this Transformative Age: people with the passion, curiosity and drive to make things better.
The opportunity
Due to growth, we currently have an opportunity for a Senior Consultant/Manager to join our Decision Science & Analytics team in Sydney. You will be a vital member of the team which is looking to solve supply chain problems using data analytics and data science. As a team, we are a group of experienced industry professionals with a background in advanced analytics who are strategic advisers, enabling us to bring a wealth of deep sector and functional knowledge to our clients.
Your key responsibilities
Manage and lead a team of analytics professional looking to solve supply chain problems
Lead all phases of the engagement lifecycle, including requirements definition, design, development, testing and post-delivery support
Team with client to design and implement solutions. Lead and collaborate to plan engagement objectives and a strategy that addresses client needs. Manage expectations of service delivery; monitor progress, manage risk and ensure key stakeholders are kept informed about progress and expected outcomes. Identify issues and propose both strategies and technical approaches
You will also be focusing on business and practice development as well as developing team members to achieve their goals
Manage and execute operational focused projects supported by advanced analytics and insights
Skills and attributes for success
A bachelor’s degree in either statistics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, operations research, , business analytics or related data science and a minimum of 5 years of (or a master's degree and at least 3 years of) experience in using data, programming and mathematical techniques to solve business issues related to supply chain optimization, operations effectiveness, cost reduction, working capital improvements and other types of operational improvement exercises
Experience in one or more of the following: supply chain improvement / optimization, operations consulting, procurement and/or logistic process improvement roles
Prior experience with advanced data mining tools
Experience of leading and managing small teams in complex business environments
The ability to prioritize effectively on projects and the skills to adapt quickly to new challenges and concepts
Excellent negotiation and influencing skills, and the ability to develop long-lasting relationships both internally and externally
Ideally, you’ll also have
Prior consulting industry experience preferred
Established networking skills in a relevant industry
What working at EY offers
Our Total Rewards package includes: formal or informal flexible working options e.g. remote working, flexible start and finish times, career and learning development e.g. EY badges, career mentoring and an extensive range of wellbeing and benefit offerings e.g. Salary packaging, parental leave and support, health checks.
Who we are
EY is an inclusive and equal opportunity employer offering a vast range of internal networks including Ability EY, our disability network, Unity, our LGBTI network and our Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander network enabling us all to embrace and value the diverse society we live within. If you have any support or access requirements, we encourage you to advise us at the time of application via contactrecruitment@au.ey.com or +61 1800 017 666.
Make your mark. Apply Now!
The preferred applicant will be subject to employment screening by EY or by their external third-party provider.
© 2021 Ernst & Young Australia. All Rights Reserved. Liability limited by a scheme approved under Professional Standards Legislation.
12 days ago
Report job"
61,"Technical Trainer – Data Science , Analytics",Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Technical Trainer – Data Science , Analytics
6 months contract with Tier 1 bank
Melbourne
Purpose:
We are looking for talented technical subject matter experts to join our team to provide advanced technical training to our data science and analytics community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Accountabilities:
Develop, curate, and deliver technical training to the Client data analytics and data science community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Engage stakeholders to understand learning capabilities and tailor training content accordingly.
Develop and implement technical training roadmap for different capabilities/roles/levels across the analytics community
Develop and implement metrics to measure and track technical capability uplift and feedback
Produce and deliver engaging and effective communications to support training
Support the delivery of Training Needs Analysis and implementation of learning and development materials, e.g. FAQs, Reference Guides, Aids and Supporting Documentation, training manuals
Identify and train [in-house] technical experts to become future trainers.
Looking For:
At least 5 years of experience in training or learning and development role
At least 3 years in a business environment
Ability to develop and deliver training via multiple channels e.g. face2face, online, VC, etc.
Effective interpersonal skills, with the ability to work in a cross-functional team
Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to build strong relationships and advocate for new and emerging skills, tools and platforms
A self-motivated approach and comfort with working in a fast-growing, dynamic and ambiguous environment
BA/BS/BComm degree or equivalent qualification
In depth experience both using and teaching some of the below;
Open Source tools
R
Python
SQL
SPARK
Shiny
Scala
Artificial intelligence
Advance Machine Learning
Visualization
Analytics and Modelling Best Practice
Model interpretation and validation techniques
Deep Learning
NLP
Time-series forecasting
Adversarial machine learning
A/B Testing
Graph Theory
Experience with advanced analytics tools and required
How to apply:
Please apply calling Rams on 03 8506 6524 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
62,Solution Architect - Data and Analytics,Embedded Search and Selection,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Data and Technology design
Cloud Based, data and Analytical platform
Leading Edge Technology

About The Company

One of Australia's iconic retail brands is looking for an experienced Solutions Architect - Data and Analytics to be responsible for data and technology design

About The Role

The Solution Architect (Data & Analytics) is responsible for the data and technology design of the Data & Analytics landscape for the whole organisation.

This role will maintain an overarching view of the end to end data environment while designing solution components, data models & structures, ingestion methods, warehouse designs and data lakes.

The aim is to build out a Cloud based, Data & Analytics platform, to deliver a step change in decision making capability to the business.

Responsibilities
Design, develop, maintain and enhance the Data Architecture domain to ensure that the Data technology roadmap is aligned with both the IS and Group strategy.
Design of the Cloud based Data & Analytics platform to support a fast pace and fast changing retail environment
Develop and maintain domain architectures including business systems roadmaps, patterns and standards, utilising both business and technical knowledge
Provide Data Architecture expertise / guidance to other IS colleagues and to project teams
Own overall design of data solutions that strike the right balance between functionality, maintainability and cost effectiveness
Develop and implement the strategic response to changing business requirements to enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the Data & Analytics landscape
Build and maintain effective partnerships with internal and external stakeholders in order to achieve business priorities
Experience
A high level of proficiency in AWS with a focus on data, warehousing & analytics
Strong data modelling, data warehousing, and analytical skills
Problem-solving skills including ability to focus on details while maintaining “big picture” view
Knowledge of Cloud based data warehousing solutions such as Snowflake
Knowledge of other cloud platforms Azure/Google
Architecture Experience (either enterprise or solution) including understanding of architecture standards and methodologies
Considerable experience in data modelling and data science concepts
Design of technology solution in a Cloud environment using modern data architecture concepts

How to Apply
If this is you, please apply below with your up-to-date CV (in Word format). All suitable applicants will be contacted for a discussion; please ensure you have relevant visa’s to work in Australia. For a confidential discussion, please contact Paul Thomson on 0415 176 085.

#LI-PT

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our PRIVACY POLICY.
4 days ago
Report job"
63,Manager - Data Scientist,KPMG,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Job no: 510756
Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: Brisbane
Digital Delta Lead Data Scientist
Do you love solving complex problems, designing sophisticated solutions and building innovative technology for Australia’s largest organisations?
Are you passionate about Digital Transformation?
Do you embrace digital disruption?
Are you convinced that the Fourth Industrial Revolution is fundamentally changing the way we live, work and relate to each other?
Do you aspire to create the best customer experiences across Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI)?
Do you believe in creating powerful actionable insights from Data and Analytics?
Do you want to work in a diverse and flexible working environment?

New digital technologies and disruptive business models mean many organisations are struggling to keep pace with the transformative changes required to drive growth and meet customer demands. KPMG Digital Delta provides end-to-end digital innovation and transformation services to help overcome this challenge.

By designing and implementing new fit-for-purpose operating models, KPMG Digital Delta helps organisations to reframe their business models, improve operational productivity, create the best customer experiences, and enhance employee collaboration. We bring together best practice knowledge and technology, along with deep expertise across all industries.

More specifically, we re-imagine and re-invent organisations to become world class digital enterprises using advanced technologies, data and human insights. We help organisations to embrace Digital Strategy, Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Cognitive, the Internet of Things (IoT), Data, Analytics & Modelling, Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI) and more.

We work with clients to:
Formulate strategies that re-imagine organisations
Harness innovation from the 4th industrial revolution
Actioning insights from trusted data to consistently and quickly make clear decisions
Build adaptive organisations
Thrive as a connected enterprise – front, middle and back office

Your new role

The Lead Data Scientist will design, develop and implement practical and scalable analytic solutions. These typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will be comfortable presenting to senior stakeholders, guiding junior consultants on engagements, scoping and pricing an engagement, designing a practical delivery team structure, structuring and writing a deliverable and coding an algorithm. You will work proactively to:

Understand and explain the business impact and strategic significance of analytic outcomes to non-technical senior stakeholders.
Lead clients in the development of their in-house data, analytics environments, organisational structures and information/analytics governance.
Lead and manage the procurement and installation of analytic toolsets considering the client’s maturity and their vision for Digital Delta capabilities.
Work closely with lead architects, engineers and strategists to align collaboration priorities
Lead and manage a multi-disciplinary team of technical specialists comprising of KPMG employees, sub-contractors, vendor specialists and client employees. Define and manage performance, cost, scope, schedule and quality for the team according to the team charter.
Lead and manage the design and development of analytics assets including the identification and collection of applicable data to solve a business problem.
Lead the design, development and implementation of learning and/or optimisation solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels and networks, risk and portfolio analysis, supply chain management and marketing effectiveness.
Lead the design, development and implementation of predictive analytical models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure.
Lead the design, development and implementation of approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths required to support back-testing/test-and-learn model validation.

In addition to your focus on client engagements, you will contribute to the definition and enhancement of analytics and experimental design disciplines within the practice.

You bring to the role
A proven ability to undertake the responsibilities and requirements of the role, as listed above.
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with extensive experience explaining complex technical concepts to business focussed senior stakeholders.
Thought leadership and perspectives on solving complex problems in environments that are often ambiguous, technologically challenged and require creative and lateral thinking.
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests.
Proficiency in enforcing technical disciplines in the use of agile methodologies, version control systems, coding, testing and documentation standards to lead solution delivery
Experience with the following technologies & languages
Fluency in at least one of the following programming languages: R, Python, Scala
Familiarity with the following data-related technologies: Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala, SQL, Teradata, Oracle, SAS, MongoDB
High-level understanding of architecting cloud-based solutions with the following products: AWS Redshift/RDS, S3, EC2, Lambda, EMR, SageMaker, DynamoDB, Cloudformation, Athena, Kinesis – or equivalents in Azure or Google Cloud Platform.

What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.

Please apply for this position by submitting your confidential application online.
Advertised: 13 Jan 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
Applications close: 26 Feb 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
30+ days ago
Report job"
64,Data Scientists - contract opportunities,Opus Recruitment Solutions,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Title: Data Scientists
Location: WFH - must be based in Australia, ideally Melbourne
Employment type: Day rate contract

Opus have partnered with a leading Australian brand to assist with their data capability expansion. We're hiring for a handful of Data Scientists, all with specialist skills across different areas, to start in the next couple of weeks.

What we are looking for:
Experienced Data Scientists (over 2 years experience commercially and locally in Australia)
Background in; Time-Series Forecasting (LSTM, ARIMA), Optimisation Techniques
Strong SQL, R, Spark and R-Shiny
Proven track record in solving business problems

If you interested in joining a leading business, please apply and i'll be in touch.
19 days ago
Report job"
65,Senior Statistician,peoplefusion,Not shown,Newcastle NSW,"Senior Statistician
Job Title:
Senior Statistician

Contract Type:
Permanent Recruitment

Location:
Newcastle, New South Wales

Specialisation:
Information Technology

Reference:
BBBH20515_1611804085

Contact Name:
Wendy Donovan

Contact Email:
wendyd@peoplefusion.com.au

Job Published:
January 28, 2021 14:21

Job Description
The mission of Hunter Medical Research Institute (HMRI) is to improve the health and wellbeing of the community by undertaking world-class research, from discovery to applied, in collaboration with their partners, the University of Newcastle, Hunter New England Local Health District and the Community.
HMRI was established in 1998 and, in 2012, opened the doors of their world class research facility they call home, which adjoins John Hunter Hospital, Newcastle.
As the world evolves, so too, does HMRI, and we are now at the exciting next phase of our journey towards being global leaders in the effective and efficient translation of health and medical research to develop high-value health solutions.
As part of the implementation of HMRI's current strategic plan, a recent organisational redesign has resulted in the creation of a number of new positions for which we are now recruiting. Each position will be maximum term contract until 30 September 2022 based on the current funding model.
The new organisational structure will enable HMRI to continue to build on collaboration and efficiency, and to focus on activities and projects of greatest value to delivering vital life-changing health and medical research.
About this role
Reporting to the Associate Director Data Science, the Senior Statistician, working as part of a collaborative research team, is responsible for the provision of high-quality statistical support to University of Newcastle and Hunter New England Area Health Service researchers.
The key responsibilities of the role include:
Meet with clients to provide advice on study design, data management, and statistical analysis methods
Manage client expectations
Assist with study design and statistical methodologies for grant applications
Assist with operational management of the unit overseeing 4 direct reports
Provide statistical leadership for large studies funded from either government or industry
Develop data management and statistical analysis plans
Perform complex simulations to determine operating characteristics of a study
Provide supervision of statisticians in carrying out data management and statistical analyses
Develop and maintain programs for statistical analysis according to statistical analysis plans
Develop and maintain research databases
Manage project timeframes and scope to ensure timely delivery of reports
About you
Ideally, we are looking for a person who has had at least 4 years in medical research/biostatistics/ health environment with an ability to communicate and consult with clients, with commercial orientation. Essentially, we are looking for formal qualifications in statistics, being technically solid in this domain, as well as experience in juggling multiple large scale projects with competing deadlines.
Essentials:
Post-graduate/doctoral qualifications in statistics or biostatistics, and a background in medical research with extensive relevant experience
Demonstrated experience across a range of statistical programming languages with application to data management, statistical programming and analysis techniques
Advanced knowledge of study design, statistical methodology, and data quality assurance.
Demonstrated ability in working collaboratively in a multidisciplinary environment to answer complex research questions.
Project management skills, including ability to prioritise multiple deadlines and managing client expectations
Strong written and verbal communication skills, including high quality reporting and presentation skills.
The person appointed to this position will be required to complete a 100-pointidentification check and employment is subject to proof of the right to work in Australia.
How to apply
To access a copy of the success profile pack including position description and essential criteria, please click here.
Applications should include cover letter addressing the criteria and a CV. If you don't have medical research experience please outline your transferrable skills in your covering letter. Confidential enquiries can be made to Wendy Donovan on 0407 525 949 and wendyd@peoplefusion.com.au.
Applications for this position close midnight Friday 19th February 2021
Apply for this job
PeopleFusion Recruitment Specialists
18 days ago
Report job"
66,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA - Australia,Not shown,South Australia,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.

This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)

As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will co nduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.

To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.

Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.



Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients



Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted

At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible - to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com .
PharmiWeb.jobs
Today
Report job"
67,Data Scientist,Zone IT Solutions,"$80,000 - $180,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"We are hiring for a Data Scientist for a Global Consulting client in Melborne.

Requirements:
Key Requirements

Core exp as a Data Scientist – developing and optimizing algorithms using ML and non-ML techniques
Exp in using Azure ML services, DataBricks

Benefits:
About Us:
Zone IT Solutions is Australia based Recruitment company. We specialize in ERP and larger IT Services. We offer flexible, efficient and collaborative solutions to any organization that requires IT, experts. Our agile, agnostic and flexible solutions will help you source the IT Expertise you need. Our delivery Offices are in Melbourne, Sydney, Singapore, and India. If you are looking for new opportunities your profile at Careers@zoneitsolutions.com or contact us at 0434189909
Also follow our LinkedIn page for new job opportunities and more.

Zone IT Solutions is an equal opportunity employer and our recruitment process focuses on essential skills and abilities. We welcome applicants from a diverse range of backgrounds, including Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples, people from culturally and linguistically diverse (CALD) backgrounds and people with disabilities.
30+ days ago
Report job"
68,Senior Big Data Engineer,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Senior Big Data Engineer (Senior-Midlevel; 0-4 positions)
06 Months Contract on a view to extend
Large Insurance Client
Melbourne CBD
Adaps has been scouted to source Senior Big Data Engineer for one of our Large Insurance clients at Mel CBD
Overview:
Data Engineer is responsible for the design, build and run of data pipelines to efficiently and reliably move data (both operational structured and behavioral unstructured, and in both batch and real-time modes) from primary source systems to various reporting and analytical data platforms; the configuration, customisation and integration of data components to deliver and operationally run the data platforms; and, the operationalization of predictive models/ machine learning algorithms in the data platforms.
As a Data Engineer
Are an analytic and strategic thinker: You take ownership and think creatively to solve complex problems, situations or opportunities.
Are planned and organised: You set clearly defined objectives, plan activities and projects well in advance and take account of possible changing circumstances. You manage time effectively and monitor performance against deadlines and milestones.
Have the ability to manage conflicting priorities: You effectively multi-task and work successfully either autonomously or in a collaborative environment.
Are comfortable with ambiguity: You are able to push forward with ideas that are a workin-progress.
Are a team player: You are able to read situations and adapt accordingly, you have a supportive and participative style.
Are action oriented: You are decisive whilst balancing risks, you show initiative and take accountability for your actions and projects.
Are innovative and proactively facilitate change: Thinking creatively for ‘out-of-the-box’ solutions comes naturally to you and you thrive on challenges requiring innovative solutions whilst being an ambassador for change.
Are dedicated to your craft: You have pride in your work as craft, and are always seeking to improve your craftmanship through practice of your skills, self-learning and exploration.
You have…
Proficiency in data management with proven experience developing DW and ETL solutions
Exposure to, or demonstrable selflearning of contemporary Big Data Platforms, Lambda Architecture and distributed computing principles * Experience with Hadoop and related technologies, on premise or in the cloud
Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Azure’s services (or transferable AWS experience)
Experience building data processing pipelines using Kafka/Storm/Spark
Expert level SQL skills, with additional experience in Python, and Java or Scala (Bonus) Experience with NoSQL databases, such as Mongo, Elastic, Cassandra or Hbase
You…
Develop, maintain, test and evaluate data pipelines and solutions
Assess, select and integrate any data tools, components, and frameworks
Support the data science and advanced analytics pipelines and teams
Support and modernise heritage DW/ETL solutions
Follow DevOps practices and make use of extensive automation and infrastructure as code approaches
Measure and evaluate platform and pipeline performance and contribute towards capacity planning
Support the business in the development and implementation of its Data Strategy, Data Governance program, Data Quality and Big Data Platform approaches and frameworks
You use…
Contemporary best practice Big Data principles, frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Industry standard ETL frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Agile development methodologies
DevOps approaches
You have…
A generative mindset. You come from a place of possibility, think on your feet and outside the square, and adapt well to change.
You are comfortable with ambiguity and are able to push forward with unproven ideas. You are a positive and supportive individual with a flexible, can-do attitude and the ability to see the bigger picture.
How to apply:
Please apply calling Ricky on 03 8506 6521 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
69,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Insight Timer,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are the world's largest meditation community of 18 million people, from 120 countries speaking 50+ languages. We publish 60,000 free guided meditations and music tracks by 8,000 meditation teachers and musicians from around the world.
We have been featured by TIME, Forbes, The New York Times and Vogue, and our apps have picked up the Editors Choice award by Google, and App of the Day by Apple on multiple occasions throughout the world.
The Role
More time is spent on Insight Timer than all other meditation apps combined. Data is one of our key competitive advantages as we have more variety and more depth than any other meditation app. This is a unique opportunity to be an integral part of building the nascent Data Science function at Insight Timer. We are hiring Machine Learning engineers, Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Research Scientists who are passionate about using data, ML and AI to better understand users and to offer new products and experiences that can help improve their lives.
As a Senior Machine Learning Engineer you will be owning our entire ML pipeline from ideation to final implementation via countless iterations and improvements. You will have the opportunity to develop a cutting-edge recommendation engine using deep neural networks and modern wide-and-deep recommendation frameworks. You will be supported by Data Engineers, Feature Engineers, and Data Scientists to ensure that your models are powered with high-impact, quick data.
The team includes ex-Google and ex-Atlassian employees and is advised by the former Head of Data Science at LinkedIn. You will work cross functionally and collaborate with Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers to bring your insights and ideas to life.
What you’ll do:
Implement cutting-edge ML technology to create the best recommendation system in the wellbeing/meditation space
Scope, design, create, deploy and tune ML models to improve key metrics that drive business value
Work closely with our Data Scientists to incorporate new features and insights that may improve our ML models
Own the end-to-end data pipeline with support from our data engineers and feature engineers to ensure seamless integration between our datasets, our ML models and the end-user APIs
Requirements
Graduate or Masters degree in Computer Science or similar technical field
Experience of managing a team of Data Scientists in a commercial setting
Experience with modern deep learning libraries (Tensorflow, Pytorch)
Experience with collaborative and content-based filtering in recommendation systems using modern popular recommendation system models (LFM, SLIM, GMF, MLP, NeuMF, FM, DeepFM)
Experience with big data frameworks (Hive, Hadoop, Spark)
Experience with data querying languages (SQL, BigQuery)
Commercial experience of working with big data
Benefits
Our team is a global bunch of conscious creators who are passionate about building products that make a difference. Like most of the world, we've transitioned to working from home and we’re working hard to keep our team connected. We host team meditations, focus on our wellbeing, incorporate flexibility into our work week and celebrate our successes along the way. If your application matches what we are looking for we will be in touch.
30+ days ago
Report job"
70,Deep Learning Engineer,Seer,"$110,000 - $140,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"About Us
Seer is developing technology to revolutionise the diagnosis and management of neurological conditions, with a special focus on epilepsy. Our mission is to deliver deep personalised clinical insights and advance patient experience with leading-edge technology.
Our technology consists of wearable devices, a cloud platform and machine learning systems. These systems are at the core of our at-home video-EEG-ECG monitoring and diagnostic service - the first of its kind. Seer has already made a big impact across Australia over the last three years and is now building for international expansion.
About The Role
We’re looking to hire at least one experienced Deep Learning Engineer / Python Developer / Data Scientist to join our team to help drive new innovations in the development of algorithms to reliably detect epileptic seizures using a world-class dataset gathered from wearable and implantable devices.
Responsibilities
Developing, testing and maintaining Python code in collaboration with the rest of the team, ensuring our software is stable, secure, resilient, documented, tested, and maintainable.
Building deep neural networks in Pytorch to detect abnormalities in EEG and ECG data and deploying models as production code.
Analysis and interpretation of large and complex datasets.
Applying best practice methods of analysis through statistics and modelling that assist in the detection of seizures.
Proactively raising issues or ideas for how our technology should be built or improved.
Being an active member of the team's development and learning.
About You
We are ideally looking for someone with a strong combination of skills and experience in Software Development using Python as well as in Data Science and in Deep Learning in particular. We are looking for people with some or all of the following attributes:
Multiple years of experience (in a professional capacity)
developing software in Python
using Python data manipulation libraries including Numpy and Pandas
using Python deep learning libraries (ideally PyTorch in particular)
Experience with statistical models and/or Digital Signal Processing (advantageous but not essential)
Experience and passion for software testing, security, code review, and documentation, using Git, CI/CD, and other modern development practices
Experience working with cloud-based infrastructure, especially AWS
Ability to work well in a diverse team with different backgrounds and experience levels
Ability to work collaboratively, independently, or under direction as the situation requires
While we are seeking someone with strong experience in all of these areas, we are willing to consider candidates with strong professional experience in Python and some knowledge of and interest in Deep Learning and Data Science.
What We Offer
An opportunity to work with the best of the best, solving life-changing problems in healthcare
Joining a dynamic company at a time of major growth and international expansion
Professional development and career growth
Working in an inclusive environment that promotes diversity
Competitive salary.
This is a great opportunity for a talented individual to use and develop their Deep Learning and Software Development skills in an exciting part of the industry, with the satisfaction of knowing your work is contributing to improving the lives of people around the world.
At Seer, we are committed to creating a diverse team whose members help each other to grow. For this reason, we encourage women and people from minority groups to apply for jobs with us.
30+ days ago
Report job"
71,"Senior Software Engineer (Machine Learning), Cash App",Cash App,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Company Description
Cash App is the fastest growing financial brand in the world. Initially built to take the pain out of peer-to-peer payments, Cash App has gone from a simple product with a single purpose to a dynamic app with over 24 million monthly active users. We are bringing a better way to send, spend, invest, and save to anyone who has ever sought an alternative to the traditional banking system.
Loved by customers and pop culture, we’ve consistently held the top spot for finance in the App Store for many years, seeing more engagement with millions of followers across social media in a day than most brands see in a year. We are building an ecosystem to redefine the world’s relationship with money by making it universally accessible.
We want to hire the best talent regardless of location. Our employment model is distributed, offering the opportunity to collaborate with teams across the world in San Francisco, New York, St. Louis, Portland, Toronto, Kitchener-Waterloo, Sydney, and Melbourne.
Interested in learning more?

Job Description
At Cash App we believe Machine Learning, especially Deep Learning powered Artificial Intelligence, is the future. Our mission is to make them available in the present. To achieve this we’re organised into three teams: ML Platform, Data Infrastructure & Risk.
We believe each Machine Learning Engineer has a diverse set of skills, regardless of what your strength is, we would love to talk to you! Cash App is always willing to teach you.
Problems you’d be solving:
Prototype new approaches and productionize solutions at scale for our 34+ millions of active users
Help execute our long-term Machine Learning strategy across Cash App
Create a world class platform for training, hosting and maintaining ML models '
Identify opportunities for platformization by communicating with our applied ML team
Balance the needs of Product, Data Scientists, User Research, and other engineers in a small team to develop machine learning approaches that advance our mission to detect fraud

Qualifications
You have:
7+ years industry experience
Demonstrated technical initiative and leadership on previous projects
Managed large projects from inception to execution
The ability to work in a fast paced, autonomous and unpredictable environment
Desire to mentor & grow other machine learning engineers across the org to further these efforts
A deep understanding of software that allows you make the right trade offs
Natural curiosity & eagerness to learn (we have one day a week dedicated to Passion Projects)
Technologies we use:
We’re agnostic to what you know walking in the door. You’ll need to be happy working with:
Kotlin, Java, Go & Python
AWS, Docker, Kubernetes
Kafka, Beam and Flink

Additional Information
Cash App treats all employees and job applicants equally. Every decision is based on merit, qualifications, and talent. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with each office’s corresponding local guidelines.
30+ days ago
Report job"
72,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA,Not shown,St Leonards NSW,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.
This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)
As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will conduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.
To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.
Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.
Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients
Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted
At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible – to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com.
30+ days ago
Report job"
73,"Senior Consultant/Manager or Senior Manager, Strategy, Customer and Marketing Analytics – Strategy and Transactions",EY,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Covid-19 pandemic is creating seismic challenges around the world. Our purpose, to build a better working world, has never been more important. Life at EY has been transformed dramatically but our strong culture of flexible and remote working has helped EY people navigate new ways of working and remain connected with each other and our clients.

A better working world truly starts with the people at EY who are building it every day. Now more than ever we need talented people from diverse backgrounds to help our clients navigate the complexities of this Transformative Age: people with the passion, curiosity and drive to make things better.

EY’s Strategy and Transactions (SaT) division offers corporate, government and private equity clients’ professional transaction advice and services, from the strategic analysis phase of the transaction lifecycle, through to deal execution, and transaction integration. The goal is to help EY clients achieve their best capital performance, deliver value to their stakeholders and meet their strategic objectives.

The opportunity

We are looking for a Senior Consultant/Manager or a Senior Manager for our Decision Science & Analytics team based in our Sydney office.

With a focus on Customer and Strategy analytics, you will be a vital member of the team where you will be working on the most complex and high-profile global transactions, across a broad portfolio of clients and industry sectors. As a team, we are a group of experienced industry professionals with a background in strategy, customer, marketing and sales advanced who are strategic transaction advisers, enabling us to bring a wealth of deep sector and functional knowledge to our clients.

Your key responsibilities
Manage and supervise a team of analytics professionals through all phases of the engagement lifecycle, including requirements definition, design, development, testing and post-delivery support
Team with client and our Strategy practice to design and implement innovative solutions
Lead and collaborate to plan engagement objectives and a strategy that addresses client needs
Manage expectations of service delivery; monitor progress, manage risk and ensure key stakeholders are kept informed about progress and expected outcomes
Identify issues and propose both strategies and technical approaches
You will also be focusing on business and practice development as well as developing team members to achieve their goals
Manage and execute strategy, customer, marketing and sales focused projects supported by advanced analytics and insights
Skills and attributes for success
A bachelor’s degree in statistics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, operations research, industrial/systems engineering, business analytics or related data science
Experience using data, programming and mathematical techniques to solve business issues by using Customer or Strategy Analytics
Prior experience with one of more advanced data mining tools (e.g. Microsoft Azure, SQL, Hadoop, Alteryx), programming language (e.g. Python, R, Java), visualization application (e.g. Tableau, Spotfire, Power BI), and decision modelling tool (e.g. SC Guru, JDA, SASS, AIMMS, GAMS, Arena)
Working knowledge of data management, data structures and analytic models
Experience leading and managing in complex business environments
The ability to prioritize effectively on projects and the skills to adapt quickly to new challenges and concepts
Excellent negotiation and influencing skills, and the ability to develop long-lasting relationships both internally and externally
Experience in strategy, customer, marketing, sales analytics roles
PC proficiency including MS Word, Access, PowerPoint, VBA and MS Excel
Must be willing and able to travel up to 50% on short notice
Ideally, you’ll also have
Prior consulting industry experience preferred
Established networking skills in a relevant industry

What working at EY offers

We offer a competitive remuneration package where you’ll be rewarded for your performance. In addition, our comprehensive Total Rewards package can be tailored to your individual needs, to give you the freedom to manage your role in a way that’s right for you. This includes;
a variety of flexible working and leave arrangements
personalised career development including coaching and support to help you build your career and access to formal learning so you can develop the skills you’ll need to thrive in the future
a range of tools and benefits to guide and support your health and wellbeing throughout your entire EY career
About EY

At EY, we hold a collective commitment to foster an environment where all differences are valued and respected, practices are equitable and everyone experiences a sense of belonging. Through our inclusive leadership behaviours, a variety of internal networks, flexible working and mentoring programs, you will have the support and flexibility to build an exceptional career.
EY is committed to removing barriers and improving the employment prospects of people with disability. If you require any adjustments to the recruitment process in order to equitably participate, we encourage you to advise us at the time of application via contactrecruitment@au.ey.com or phone +61 3 8650 7788.

We understand the importance of social distancing at this time so our recruitment and onboarding process will be managed virtually so we can continue to prioritise the safety and wellbeing of EY people, clients, guests and the broader public.
The exceptional EY experience. It’s yours to build.
Apply now.

The preferred applicant will be subject to employment screening by EY or by their external third party provider.
© 2020 Ernst & Young Australia. All Rights Reserved. Liability limited by a scheme approved under Professional Standards Legislation.
30+ days ago
Report job"
74,"Strategy Manager / Senior Manager – Data Science, Economics, Public Policy",Accenture,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Strategy Manager / Senior Manager – Data Science, Economics, Public Policy
AlphaBeta Australia, now part of Accenture Strategy, is a leading strategy consultancy with offices in Sydney, Melbourne and Canberra.
We specialise in combining strategy consulting, data science and economics to solve issues that matter – such as the future of work, social services, economic recovery and climate change. Our projects help reshape industries, government policies and public thinking.
We’re seeking talented and driven leaders with significant public sector consulting experience to help us grow in Canberra.
Do you excel at providing insightful analysis in complex environments?
Do you enjoy crafting future-proof policies and procedures?
Do you apply quantitative skills and tools to enable effective decision making?
Are you Canberra based, or willing to relocate for the opportunity to work with a passionate group of professionals who support each other to succeed?
For more information about the firm, please visit www.alphabeta.com.
The role
AlphaBeta Managers are adept problem-solvers. They are the day-to-day lead on projects. They form strong working relationships with clients, coach teams, guide and review analysis and problem-solving on the project, and manage project delivery.
As members of our leadership team, Managers are also expected to mentor junior consultants, role model our values and reinforce positive behaviour within the firm.
This role would be ideal for candidates who want to engage and add value within the most interesting challenges facing the public sector.
What we are looking for
Significant consulting experience
Strong skills in data analysis and interpretation, data science, statistics and / or economics
A flair and passion for problem solving and interest in public policy, economics and social impact problems
Excellent project management and delivery skills
Ability to work strategically with strong business acumen
Strong interpersonal skills (written and verbal)
Previous experience in leading, coaching and developing teams
Experience in client or stakeholder management (public and/ or private sector)
Canberra based applicants, or applicants willing to move for the opportunity to work with a team of bright and passionate professionals
Complimenting your experience, you will ideally hold a Bachelor degree. Post-graduate qualification (e.g., MBA/ Masters/ PhD) would be highly regarded, although not essential.
Application process
The application process comprises your initial application and a formal interview process involving case studies. Your initial application should include:
1 page covering letter addressing your interest in the firm and responses to the essential skills
Short resume (maximum of 2 pages)

About Accenture
Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.
At Accenture, our philosophy is anchored in recognising that our people are multi-dimensional. We take an intersectional human approach to create a work environment where all people feel like they can bring their authentic selves to work, every day.
We believe that equality drives innovation. Our commitment to accelerating equality starts at the top with our board and CEO and extends across every part of the company. This comes to life when our people own the equality agenda, making it part of their jobs – every decision, every day – and feel free to speak up and to act.
We do not tolerate discrimination because of differences, such as age, ability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity or expression, religion, or sexual orientation. We want a workplace that is inclusive and diverse to that end we are setting bold goals and taking comprehensive action. To achieve these goals, we collect infomation that allows us to track the effectiveness of our Inclusion and Diversity programs.
Learn how Accenture protects your personal data and know your rights in relation to your personal data. Read more about our Privacy Statement.
Lama Makkouk is the Recruiter managing this role. As the team experience high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a fair and timely process.
30+ days ago
Report job"
75,Senior Big Data Engineer,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Senior Big Data Engineer (Senior-Midlevel; 0-4 positions)
06 Months Contract on a view to extend
Large Insurance Client
Melbourne CBD
Adaps has been scouted to source Senior Big Data Engineer for one of our Large Insurance clients at Mel CBD
Overview:
Data Engineer is responsible for the design, build and run of data pipelines to efficiently and reliably move data (both operational structured and behavioral unstructured, and in both batch and real-time modes) from primary source systems to various reporting and analytical data platforms; the configuration, customisation and integration of data components to deliver and operationally run the data platforms; and, the operationalization of predictive models/ machine learning algorithms in the data platforms.
As a Data Engineer
Are an analytic and strategic thinker: You take ownership and think creatively to solve complex problems, situations or opportunities.
Are planned and organised: You set clearly defined objectives, plan activities and projects well in advance and take account of possible changing circumstances. You manage time effectively and monitor performance against deadlines and milestones.
Have the ability to manage conflicting priorities: You effectively multi-task and work successfully either autonomously or in a collaborative environment.
Are comfortable with ambiguity: You are able to push forward with ideas that are a workin-progress.
Are a team player: You are able to read situations and adapt accordingly, you have a supportive and participative style.
Are action oriented: You are decisive whilst balancing risks, you show initiative and take accountability for your actions and projects.
Are innovative and proactively facilitate change: Thinking creatively for ‘out-of-the-box’ solutions comes naturally to you and you thrive on challenges requiring innovative solutions whilst being an ambassador for change.
Are dedicated to your craft: You have pride in your work as craft, and are always seeking to improve your craftmanship through practice of your skills, self-learning and exploration.
You have…
Proficiency in data management with proven experience developing DW and ETL solutions
Exposure to, or demonstrable selflearning of contemporary Big Data Platforms, Lambda Architecture and distributed computing principles * Experience with Hadoop and related technologies, on premise or in the cloud
Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Azure’s services (or transferable AWS experience)
Experience building data processing pipelines using Kafka/Storm/Spark
Expert level SQL skills, with additional experience in Python, and Java or Scala (Bonus) Experience with NoSQL databases, such as Mongo, Elastic, Cassandra or Hbase
You…
Develop, maintain, test and evaluate data pipelines and solutions
Assess, select and integrate any data tools, components, and frameworks
Support the data science and advanced analytics pipelines and teams
Support and modernise heritage DW/ETL solutions
Follow DevOps practices and make use of extensive automation and infrastructure as code approaches
Measure and evaluate platform and pipeline performance and contribute towards capacity planning
Support the business in the development and implementation of its Data Strategy, Data Governance program, Data Quality and Big Data Platform approaches and frameworks
You use…
Contemporary best practice Big Data principles, frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Industry standard ETL frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Agile development methodologies
DevOps approaches
You have…
A generative mindset. You come from a place of possibility, think on your feet and outside the square, and adapt well to change.
You are comfortable with ambiguity and are able to push forward with unproven ideas. You are a positive and supportive individual with a flexible, can-do attitude and the ability to see the bigger picture.
How to apply:
Please apply calling Ricky on 03 8506 6521 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
76,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Insight Timer,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are the world's largest meditation community of 18 million people, from 120 countries speaking 50+ languages. We publish 60,000 free guided meditations and music tracks by 8,000 meditation teachers and musicians from around the world.
We have been featured by TIME, Forbes, The New York Times and Vogue, and our apps have picked up the Editors Choice award by Google, and App of the Day by Apple on multiple occasions throughout the world.
The Role
More time is spent on Insight Timer than all other meditation apps combined. Data is one of our key competitive advantages as we have more variety and more depth than any other meditation app. This is a unique opportunity to be an integral part of building the nascent Data Science function at Insight Timer. We are hiring Machine Learning engineers, Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Research Scientists who are passionate about using data, ML and AI to better understand users and to offer new products and experiences that can help improve their lives.
As a Senior Machine Learning Engineer you will be owning our entire ML pipeline from ideation to final implementation via countless iterations and improvements. You will have the opportunity to develop a cutting-edge recommendation engine using deep neural networks and modern wide-and-deep recommendation frameworks. You will be supported by Data Engineers, Feature Engineers, and Data Scientists to ensure that your models are powered with high-impact, quick data.
The team includes ex-Google and ex-Atlassian employees and is advised by the former Head of Data Science at LinkedIn. You will work cross functionally and collaborate with Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers to bring your insights and ideas to life.
What you’ll do:
Implement cutting-edge ML technology to create the best recommendation system in the wellbeing/meditation space
Scope, design, create, deploy and tune ML models to improve key metrics that drive business value
Work closely with our Data Scientists to incorporate new features and insights that may improve our ML models
Own the end-to-end data pipeline with support from our data engineers and feature engineers to ensure seamless integration between our datasets, our ML models and the end-user APIs
Requirements
Graduate or Masters degree in Computer Science or similar technical field
Experience of managing a team of Data Scientists in a commercial setting
Experience with modern deep learning libraries (Tensorflow, Pytorch)
Experience with collaborative and content-based filtering in recommendation systems using modern popular recommendation system models (LFM, SLIM, GMF, MLP, NeuMF, FM, DeepFM)
Experience with big data frameworks (Hive, Hadoop, Spark)
Experience with data querying languages (SQL, BigQuery)
Commercial experience of working with big data
Benefits
Our team is a global bunch of conscious creators who are passionate about building products that make a difference. Like most of the world, we've transitioned to working from home and we’re working hard to keep our team connected. We host team meditations, focus on our wellbeing, incorporate flexibility into our work week and celebrate our successes along the way. If your application matches what we are looking for we will be in touch.
30+ days ago
Report job"
77,"Senior Consultant, Advanced Analytics Research & Development",Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Senior Consultant, Advanced Analytics Research & Development
Permanent opportunity
Tier 1 bank in Melbourne
Purpose:
This role exists to ensure that client capitalizes on & makes effective use of its strategic data investments, driving & establishing innovative solutions in analytics & data, translating insights into action.
Collaborate & support the One client Plan & the Data and Analytics Strategy in enabling the Data & Analytics Agenda.
Accountabilities:
Complete research on market trends and advancements in analytics, machine learning, AI and associated technologies, strategies, laws and policies.
Provide thought leadership and help develop and evolve the analytics strategy for the analytics across the Enterprise.
Ensure testing and learning and adoption of emerging industry advancements in analytics & artificial intelligence; driving competitive advantage, particularly in relation to processing of complex business events; unstructured & semi structured data sets and cloud technologies.
Drive, design, develop, maintain & set the vision & respective capability & services for analytics & innovation.
Envisioning, designing & delivering the future state for analytics, including strategies to; grow active utilization across the enterprise, deliver new capabilities & tools to ensure client is at the forefront of analytics & big data, and has a competitive edge.
Adopt & leverage emerging market capability to drive a competitive advantage. To positively influence our data and information culture, raise maturity and stay abreast of emerging, global best practice.
Complete benchmarking across technology, fin techs, startups and other financial institutions.
Undertake a maturity assessment of current analytics/data science capability e.g. strategy, practices, methodologies & standards, key processes, service dependency, technology, presentation services, etc.
Proactively manage, coordinate and monitor risk, security, privacy, ethical and legal requirements as related to new capabilities, testing or implementation requirements within agreed Risk Appetite and managing non-compliance in a timely manner.
Looking For:
A passion for advanced analytics and research
Sound knowledge of the Analytics and the Technology environment.
Proven experience research and implementation of research findings in industry
You will be delivery focused
Well-developed communication skills, both written and oral, and high-level interpersonal skills.
Proven high-level attention to detail and follow through with the ability to exercise initiative.
Post Graduate degree in Data Science, Analytics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering Economics, or similar industry experience
PhD or Post Doc highly desirable
Keen passion for research and collaboration
How to apply:
Please apply calling Sanky on 03 8506 6541 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
78,Senior ML Engineer,Wyn&Co,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Due to continued success my client a household name across Australia is looking to bring on a Senior ML Engineer with strong experience across GCP, ML pipelines & Computer Vision.

You will be responsible for design & implementation of ML pipelines,
Working closely with the Big Data team to make predictions on Realtime streaming data.

Requirements
Strong programming skills with Python/C/Java/SQL
Experience with DevOps tools and techniques, particularly GCP and Docker Experience with designing and building infrastructure
Experience implementing continuous integration, deployment and monitoring for ML models.
Developing ML models across CV & NLP
Designing and automating ML pipelines.
Strong communication skills & stakeholder management
Streaming Predictions
Experience with Big Data tools
This is a great opportunity to join an industry leader & work with some of the best ML Engineers & Cloud Engineers across the GCP platform.

Please apply with an up to date CV
14 days ago
Report job"
79,Customer Analytics Manager,Technology Recruiting Solutions,"$180,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Full Time
Melbourne
Salary – Excellent salary package of up to $180,000 + benefits/Reference – JD1856
Role Description:
Exciting opportunity for an experienced Analytics Manager to join an existing team within the Customer Analytics department for this diverse Top ASX Listed Organisation in the Melbourne CBD. The Analytics Manager will be responsible for a team of Data Scientists and Data Analysts developing predictive modelling to help create personalised customer experiences. The perfect candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field, will have experience manage a team of data professionals with large data stores and will have some experience as an individual technical contributor within data science or machine learning.
Key responsibilities:
Drive key analytics projects including forecasting and testing, funnel optimization, response and propensity modeling, advanced customer segmentation using advanced statistical techniques.
Responsible for a team of Data Scientists and Data Analysts developing predictive modelling to help create personalised customer experiences
Manage development of data resources, gather requirements, organize sources, and support product launches
Contribute new ideas and analysis to the Customer Analytics department on mathematical and statistical concepts to create value or solve problems for the business
Engage with, educate and influence internal business stakeholders (at multiple levels in the business), to understand business priorities and business requirements
Work with business units to deliver the personalisation and modelling roadmap
In order to be considered for this role, you must have:
5 years + Managing a team of Advanced Analytics consultants and at least 3 years’ experience as an individual technical contributor within data science or machine learning
Extensive knowledge of varied machine learning models and analytical techniques
Proven experience in a data or statistical analysis roles
Statistical modelling in a major package such as SAS, SPSS and knowledge with SQ, Python and R
Understand key behaviours that drive consumer acquisition, retention, and engagement to enable decision making about product strategy and features, marketing tools and campaigns
Experience managing complex projects, in alignment with corporate data governance activities
Excellent stakeholder engagement skills
Degree or PHD in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field such as Physics, Economics or Operations Research.
To apply for this position and to send your CV click on the email below:
cv@technologyrecruiting.com.au
30+ days ago
Report job"
80,Marketing Analytics Lead,Bluefin Resources,"$150,000 - $160,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Melbourne Based
Measure and Optimise Ecommerce and Paid Marketing Channels
SQL Programming
The Role
A new opportunity in a newly established and fast-growing team within FMCG. This is a fantastic opportunity to lead the delivery of analytics to measure and optimise the ecommerce and paid marketing channels, with a clear focus on providing customers with the best experience.
As the Marketing Analytics Lead, you will be responsible for providing though leadership on industry best practices, lead and grow a team of analysts, identify current and future opportunities, and establish credible relationships with business stakeholders.
Key Responsibilities
Be part of a broad function to facilitate business outcomes
Work with the wider Data & Analytics community to create improvements
Grow the analytics team capability through ongoing development
Identify current and future opportunities
Lead and a grow the team of high-performing analysts
Set team norms, standards and procedures
Skills Required
Must have proven experience in developing measurement and optimisation of ecommerce and paid marketing campaigns in a commercial environment
Tertiary Qualification in relevant discipline (Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Applied/Computer Science)
Strong analytical skills
Experience with SQL is essential
Proven commercial experience in marketing analytics
If this sounds like the perfect opportunity for you, please click 'apply' or contact Corrin Pal at Bluefin Resources for further information.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.
http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy

BBBH42582_161179273901613
18 days ago
Report job"
81,"Analytics, Technical Training Facilitator",Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Analytics, Technical Training Facilitator
6 months contract on a view to extend
Tier 1 bank in Melbourne
Purpose:
We are looking for talented technical subject matter experts to join our team to provide advanced technical training to our data science and analytics community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Accountabilities:
Develop, curate, and deliver technical training to the Client data analytics and data science community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Engage stakeholders to understand learning capabilities and tailor training content accordingly.
Develop and implement technical training roadmap for different capabilities/roles/levels across the analytics community
Develop and implement metrics to measure and track technical capability uplift and feedback
Produce and deliver engaging and effective communications to support training
Support the delivery of Training Needs Analysis and implementation of learning and development materials, e.g. FAQs, Reference Guides, Aids and Supporting Documentation, training manuals
Identify and train [in-house] technical experts to become future trainers.
Looking For:
At least 5 years of experience in training or learning and development role
At least 3 years in a business environment
Ability to develop and deliver training via multiple channels e.g. face2face, online, VC, etc.
Effective interpersonal skills, with the ability to work in a cross-functional team
Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to build strong relationships and advocate for new and emerging skills, tools and platforms
A self-motivated approach and comfort with working in a fast-growing, dynamic and ambiguous environment
BA/BS/BComm degree or equivalent qualification
In depth experience both using and teaching some of the below;
Open Source tools
R
Python
SQL
SPARK
Shiny
Scala
Artificial intelligence
Advance Machine Learning
Visualization
Analytics and Modelling Best Practice
Model interpretation and validation techniques
Deep Learning
NLP
Time-series forecasting
Adversarial machine learning
A/B Testing
Graph Theory
Experience with advanced analytics tools and required
How to apply:
Please apply calling Sanky on 03 8506 6541 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
82,Senior Data Scientist,TheDriveGroup,"$140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Join a High Performing Passionate Team
Recieve Constant Training & Development from Industry Leaders
Work on Greenfiled Big Data Projects

Senior Data Scientist / Data Analyst

This is an amazing opportunity to join an Australian owned Software Engineering company with a global reach that builds cutting-edge big data products for companies for analytics and consumer insights.

You will be joining a passionate team of high-performance big data engineers, data scientists, product managers, and software engineers giving you the opportunity to develop your skills and have exposure to multiple technologies and methodologies helping you become an expert in your area.

As Data Scientist, you will have the opportunity to work alongside the Software Engineer team and provide valuable insights during the process. You will be dealing with large Datasets on a regular basis, meaning you will need to have experience with some leading Big Data technologies (Scala being one of the leading technologies that we work with). You will also work with Spark and Redshift, and we want you to be adaptable to learning new technologies that will be implemented in the future through our technical roadmap. The role will also involve working with our NoSQL Databases (MongoDB), as you will be working with Petabyte datasets.

You will also have the opportunity to visit clients sites and gain valuable insights into the whole process of the development of new products getting and end to end picture. The visits will involve engaging the clients wants and needs, and they will set deliverables for the projects they want completed. Other visits will involve updates, issues and successes of the project(s) you are working on.

Key Skills Required
Commercial experience as Data Scientist
Experience with Machine Learning
Big Data - Scala (preferred), Spark, Kafka, Redshift
Experience with R, Python or Scala is Desirable
Strong Business Awareness
Positive Approach
Extremely passionate about solving problem
Experience writing Algorithms
Deep Learning
Stakeholder Engagement
Strong Communication skills
IT'S NICE TO HAVE
Statistical Analysis
Master's or PhD in relevant subjects
Culture & Benefits:
Opportunity to develop a career in Data Science
Real Career Progression & Certifications
Exposure to senior stakeholders at all levels of the business
This is an amazing opportunity for an aspiring Junior Data Scientist to join a team who are working on high profile projects with the latest technology. You will have constant training and development as you progress through the ranks to becoming a Senior Data Scientist. This is an immediate need and they offer a quick interview process.
30+ days ago
Report job"
83,Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP,Oracle,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP-20000SHH

Applicants are required to read, write, and speak the following languages: English
Preferred Qualifications

Principal Member of Technical Staff - Digital Assistant and Bots Platform Team

We are a newly formed group within Oracle creating innovative products that leverage the power of AI and Machine Learning to bring world-class speech, vision and natural language capabilities to Oracle’s Digital Assistant platform. We are like a start-up inside a large company with a big charter and a lot of creative freedom. We have assembled some of the smartest people in the industry and are growing this team.
If you are looking for an exciting new opportunity as a data scientist to help solve difficult problems, be creative, create success for customers, and engage with the product team to do some innovative research and development, please review our profile.

We are looking for someone who is:

Experienced with Machine Learning and AI especially deep learning models.
Experienced with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch.
Experienced with Conversational AI / Chatbots and/or Digital Assistants, including having developed a Chatbot or similar Digital Assistant is a plus.
Ph.D. degree in computer science on natural language processing, speech processing, computer vision is preferred but not a must. A strong publication record is a plus.
Possesses excellent communication skills with an ability to explain and write specifications that embody complex concepts to stakeholders within the team.
Eager to work on a highly sellable, performance optimized infrastructure which elastically handles customer needs.
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment and can quickly adjust to changing priorities.
Detail oriented with a focus on quality of the product, data, and code.
An experienced engineer with 3+ years of professional development in Java, C#, C++ or Python. Java and Python preferred. JavaScript, Node.js, HTML/CSS and Mobile development on Android/iOS is a plus.

DUTIES:

Keep track of and experiment with state of the art dialog systems both from academia and industry to keep pushing the market competitiveness of ODA.
Involve in all steps of software life cycle such as planning, coding, testing and maintenance to productize developed models.
Involve in planning and budgeting product roadmap.
Write papers/reports and communicate results to stakeholders and customers.
Require to communicate and coordinate with ODA head office (California) and European team as necessary which may include travel and after-hour participation.
Detailed Description and Job Requirements
Design, develop, troubleshoot and debug software programs for databases, applications, tools, networks etc.

As a member of the software engineering division, you will take an active role in the definition and evolution of standard practices and procedures. You will be responsible for defining and developing software for tasks associated with the developing, designing and debugging of software applications or operating systems.

Work is non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in area of specialization. Leading contributor individually and as a team member, providing direction and mentoring to others. BS or MS degree or equivalent experience relevant to functional area. 7 years of software engineering or related experience.
Job: Product Development
Location: AU-AU,Australia-Melbourne
Job Type: Regular Employee Hire
Organization: Oracle
30+ days ago
Report job"
84,"Senior Consultant, Advanced Analytics Research & Development",Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Senior Consultant, Advanced Analytics Research & Development
Permanent opportunity
Tier 1 bank in Melbourne
Purpose:
This role exists to ensure that client capitalizes on & makes effective use of its strategic data investments, driving & establishing innovative solutions in analytics & data, translating insights into action.
Collaborate & support the One client Plan & the Data and Analytics Strategy in enabling the Data & Analytics Agenda.
Accountabilities:
Complete research on market trends and advancements in analytics, machine learning, AI and associated technologies, strategies, laws and policies.
Provide thought leadership and help develop and evolve the analytics strategy for the analytics across the Enterprise.
Ensure testing and learning and adoption of emerging industry advancements in analytics & artificial intelligence; driving competitive advantage, particularly in relation to processing of complex business events; unstructured & semi structured data sets and cloud technologies.
Drive, design, develop, maintain & set the vision & respective capability & services for analytics & innovation.
Envisioning, designing & delivering the future state for analytics, including strategies to; grow active utilization across the enterprise, deliver new capabilities & tools to ensure client is at the forefront of analytics & big data, and has a competitive edge.
Adopt & leverage emerging market capability to drive a competitive advantage. To positively influence our data and information culture, raise maturity and stay abreast of emerging, global best practice.
Complete benchmarking across technology, fin techs, startups and other financial institutions.
Undertake a maturity assessment of current analytics/data science capability e.g. strategy, practices, methodologies & standards, key processes, service dependency, technology, presentation services, etc.
Proactively manage, coordinate and monitor risk, security, privacy, ethical and legal requirements as related to new capabilities, testing or implementation requirements within agreed Risk Appetite and managing non-compliance in a timely manner.
Looking For:
A passion for advanced analytics and research
Sound knowledge of the Analytics and the Technology environment.
Proven experience research and implementation of research findings in industry
You will be delivery focused
Well-developed communication skills, both written and oral, and high-level interpersonal skills.
Proven high-level attention to detail and follow through with the ability to exercise initiative.
Post Graduate degree in Data Science, Analytics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering Economics, or similar industry experience
PhD or Post Doc highly desirable
Keen passion for research and collaboration
How to apply:
Please apply calling Sanky on 03 8506 6541 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
85,Solution Architect - Data and Analytics,Embedded Search and Selection,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Data and Technology design
Cloud Based, data and Analytical platform
Leading Edge Technology

About The Company

One of Australia's iconic retail brands is looking for an experienced Solutions Architect - Data and Analytics to be responsible for data and technology design

About The Role

The Solution Architect (Data & Analytics) is responsible for the data and technology design of the Data & Analytics landscape for the whole organisation.

This role will maintain an overarching view of the end to end data environment while designing solution components, data models & structures, ingestion methods, warehouse designs and data lakes.

The aim is to build out a Cloud based, Data & Analytics platform, to deliver a step change in decision making capability to the business.

Responsibilities
Design, develop, maintain and enhance the Data Architecture domain to ensure that the Data technology roadmap is aligned with both the IS and Group strategy.
Design of the Cloud based Data & Analytics platform to support a fast pace and fast changing retail environment
Develop and maintain domain architectures including business systems roadmaps, patterns and standards, utilising both business and technical knowledge
Provide Data Architecture expertise / guidance to other IS colleagues and to project teams
Own overall design of data solutions that strike the right balance between functionality, maintainability and cost effectiveness
Develop and implement the strategic response to changing business requirements to enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the Data & Analytics landscape
Build and maintain effective partnerships with internal and external stakeholders in order to achieve business priorities
Experience
A high level of proficiency in AWS with a focus on data, warehousing & analytics
Strong data modelling, data warehousing, and analytical skills
Problem-solving skills including ability to focus on details while maintaining “big picture” view
Knowledge of Cloud based data warehousing solutions such as Snowflake
Knowledge of other cloud platforms Azure/Google
Architecture Experience (either enterprise or solution) including understanding of architecture standards and methodologies
Considerable experience in data modelling and data science concepts
Design of technology solution in a Cloud environment using modern data architecture concepts

How to Apply
If this is you, please apply below with your up-to-date CV (in Word format). All suitable applicants will be contacted for a discussion; please ensure you have relevant visa’s to work in Australia. For a confidential discussion, please contact Paul Thomson on 0415 176 085.

#LI-PT

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our PRIVACY POLICY.
4 days ago
Report job"
86,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA,Not shown,St Leonards NSW,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.
This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)
As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will conduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.
To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.
Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.
Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients
Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted
At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible – to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com.
30+ days ago
Report job"
87,Sr Statistical Programmer,IQVIA - Australia,Not shown,South Australia,"IQVIAs Biotech Delivery Unit (BDU) is searching for a Sr Statistical Programmer to join its growing team across Australia.

This role can be based in Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Adelaide or Brisbane (working from home is available to suitable candidates)

As a Sr Statistical Programmer you will co nduct statistical analyses for client reports and publications, performs advanced statistical programming and biostatistical analyses and utilizes findings, and insights for practical application to further business operations, come across innovative findings and discoveries for solution and product development.

To succeed in this position, candidates should have exceptional communication, computer, and problem-solving skills. You should be resourceful, analytical, adaptable, and organized with an ability to build rapport with peers and clients.

Key Responsibilities Include:
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the following for complex clinical studies: (i) the programming, testing, and documentation of statistical programs for use in creating statistical tables, figures, and listing summaries and (ii) the programming of analysis databases (derived datasets) and transfers of data for internal and external clients. May perform and plan the programming of database quality control checks.
Program and plan the integration of databases from multiple studies or sources.
Develop and co-ordinate programming documentation including plans and specifications, as appropriate, for complex studies.
Provide advanced technical expertise in conjunction with internal and external clients, and independently bring project solutions to teams and department, for complex studies.
Perform, plan and co-ordinate the development, implementation and validation of new process technologies, macros and applications.
Fulfill project responsibilities at the level of statistical team lead for single complex studies or group of studies.
Understand the Scope of Work, budget and quote assumptions, estimate the work completed, manage Out of Scope and resource forecasts for single studies. May manage project budget and resource requirements, and provide revenue forecasts for single studies
Provide training and guidance to lower level staff.



Skills and experience required:
Masters / Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field is required
A minimum of 3 - 5 years prior relevant experience as a Statistical Programmer with a CRO and/or Pharmaceutical is required
Strong knowledge of statistics, programming and/or clinical drug development process is required
Advanced knowledge of computing applications such as Base SAS, SAS Graph and SAS Macro Language is required
Good organizational, interpersonal, leadership and communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple tasks and projects
Excellent accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clients



Please note only candidates who meet the above criteria will be contacted

At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible - to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com .
PharmiWeb.jobs
Today
Report job"
88,Analytics Consultant,Onset,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Having recently secured VC investment to further support their international expansion, this Australian first Health-tech SaaS pioneer is looking for a Data Science Consultant to support the interrogation of large data sets to provide impactful outcomes to patients.
As a key member of the Analytics team you will be tasked with large scale modelling and manipulation along with key stakeholder management with end user clients and internal product teams.
You'll analyse and interpret large data sets to solve a range of client challenges both simple and complex. This will entail gathering data, formulating hypotheses, testing analytic models and communicating recommendations to stakeholders.
The key components and responsibilities of this role include:
Stakeholder management, both internal and external
Advanced problem solving capabilities
Direct consultation with end users regarding requirements
Managing large data sets
Data cleansing
Data analysis and visualisation of end product outcomes
What you'll bring
Bachelors, Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or Health Science related field
3-5 years related Data Science experience
A proven record in delivering on-time analytic outputs in a project context
Communicate insights from data from a commercial or clinical environment in a compelling way
Curiosity and a desire to dig deeper to solve a challenge/problem
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Technically advanced across SQL, Python, ML etc
Strong team player who wants to work with the smartest data minds in Health
What's in it for you?
This mature startup takes a fluid approach to managing workload. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with some of the smartest data professionals in the healthcare space across various areas of the business and develop a range of technical and business related skills.
You'll have access to flexible working arrangements and will be part of a growing team with a fantastic culture.
For a more detailed overview of the role, team, company and responsibilities please contact Greg Perl on 0487848404 or drop me an email (greg@theonset.com.au).
30+ days ago
Report job"
89,Deep Learning Engineer,Seer,"$110,000 - $140,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"About Us
Seer is developing technology to revolutionise the diagnosis and management of neurological conditions, with a special focus on epilepsy. Our mission is to deliver deep personalised clinical insights and advance patient experience with leading-edge technology.
Our technology consists of wearable devices, a cloud platform and machine learning systems. These systems are at the core of our at-home video-EEG-ECG monitoring and diagnostic service - the first of its kind. Seer has already made a big impact across Australia over the last three years and is now building for international expansion.
About The Role
We’re looking to hire at least one experienced Deep Learning Engineer / Python Developer / Data Scientist to join our team to help drive new innovations in the development of algorithms to reliably detect epileptic seizures using a world-class dataset gathered from wearable and implantable devices.
Responsibilities
Developing, testing and maintaining Python code in collaboration with the rest of the team, ensuring our software is stable, secure, resilient, documented, tested, and maintainable.
Building deep neural networks in Pytorch to detect abnormalities in EEG and ECG data and deploying models as production code.
Analysis and interpretation of large and complex datasets.
Applying best practice methods of analysis through statistics and modelling that assist in the detection of seizures.
Proactively raising issues or ideas for how our technology should be built or improved.
Being an active member of the team's development and learning.
About You
We are ideally looking for someone with a strong combination of skills and experience in Software Development using Python as well as in Data Science and in Deep Learning in particular. We are looking for people with some or all of the following attributes:
Multiple years of experience (in a professional capacity)
developing software in Python
using Python data manipulation libraries including Numpy and Pandas
using Python deep learning libraries (ideally PyTorch in particular)
Experience with statistical models and/or Digital Signal Processing (advantageous but not essential)
Experience and passion for software testing, security, code review, and documentation, using Git, CI/CD, and other modern development practices
Experience working with cloud-based infrastructure, especially AWS
Ability to work well in a diverse team with different backgrounds and experience levels
Ability to work collaboratively, independently, or under direction as the situation requires
While we are seeking someone with strong experience in all of these areas, we are willing to consider candidates with strong professional experience in Python and some knowledge of and interest in Deep Learning and Data Science.
What We Offer
An opportunity to work with the best of the best, solving life-changing problems in healthcare
Joining a dynamic company at a time of major growth and international expansion
Professional development and career growth
Working in an inclusive environment that promotes diversity
Competitive salary.
This is a great opportunity for a talented individual to use and develop their Deep Learning and Software Development skills in an exciting part of the industry, with the satisfaction of knowing your work is contributing to improving the lives of people around the world.
At Seer, we are committed to creating a diverse team whose members help each other to grow. For this reason, we encourage women and people from minority groups to apply for jobs with us.
30+ days ago
Report job"
90,"Analytics, Technical Training Facilitator",Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Analytics, Technical Training Facilitator
6 months contract on a view to extend
Tier 1 bank in Melbourne
Purpose:
We are looking for talented technical subject matter experts to join our team to provide advanced technical training to our data science and analytics community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Accountabilities:
Develop, curate, and deliver technical training to the Client data analytics and data science community both in Melbourne and Sydney.
Engage stakeholders to understand learning capabilities and tailor training content accordingly.
Develop and implement technical training roadmap for different capabilities/roles/levels across the analytics community
Develop and implement metrics to measure and track technical capability uplift and feedback
Produce and deliver engaging and effective communications to support training
Support the delivery of Training Needs Analysis and implementation of learning and development materials, e.g. FAQs, Reference Guides, Aids and Supporting Documentation, training manuals
Identify and train [in-house] technical experts to become future trainers.
Looking For:
At least 5 years of experience in training or learning and development role
At least 3 years in a business environment
Ability to develop and deliver training via multiple channels e.g. face2face, online, VC, etc.
Effective interpersonal skills, with the ability to work in a cross-functional team
Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to build strong relationships and advocate for new and emerging skills, tools and platforms
A self-motivated approach and comfort with working in a fast-growing, dynamic and ambiguous environment
BA/BS/BComm degree or equivalent qualification
In depth experience both using and teaching some of the below;
Open Source tools
R
Python
SQL
SPARK
Shiny
Scala
Artificial intelligence
Advance Machine Learning
Visualization
Analytics and Modelling Best Practice
Model interpretation and validation techniques
Deep Learning
NLP
Time-series forecasting
Adversarial machine learning
A/B Testing
Graph Theory
Experience with advanced analytics tools and required
How to apply:
Please apply calling Sanky on 03 8506 6541 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
91,Senior Big Data Engineer,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Senior Big Data Engineer (Senior-Midlevel; 0-4 positions)
06 Months Contract on a view to extend
Large Insurance Client
Melbourne CBD
Adaps has been scouted to source Senior Big Data Engineer for one of our Large Insurance clients at Mel CBD
Overview:
Data Engineer is responsible for the design, build and run of data pipelines to efficiently and reliably move data (both operational structured and behavioral unstructured, and in both batch and real-time modes) from primary source systems to various reporting and analytical data platforms; the configuration, customisation and integration of data components to deliver and operationally run the data platforms; and, the operationalization of predictive models/ machine learning algorithms in the data platforms.
As a Data Engineer
Are an analytic and strategic thinker: You take ownership and think creatively to solve complex problems, situations or opportunities.
Are planned and organised: You set clearly defined objectives, plan activities and projects well in advance and take account of possible changing circumstances. You manage time effectively and monitor performance against deadlines and milestones.
Have the ability to manage conflicting priorities: You effectively multi-task and work successfully either autonomously or in a collaborative environment.
Are comfortable with ambiguity: You are able to push forward with ideas that are a workin-progress.
Are a team player: You are able to read situations and adapt accordingly, you have a supportive and participative style.
Are action oriented: You are decisive whilst balancing risks, you show initiative and take accountability for your actions and projects.
Are innovative and proactively facilitate change: Thinking creatively for ‘out-of-the-box’ solutions comes naturally to you and you thrive on challenges requiring innovative solutions whilst being an ambassador for change.
Are dedicated to your craft: You have pride in your work as craft, and are always seeking to improve your craftmanship through practice of your skills, self-learning and exploration.
You have…
Proficiency in data management with proven experience developing DW and ETL solutions
Exposure to, or demonstrable selflearning of contemporary Big Data Platforms, Lambda Architecture and distributed computing principles * Experience with Hadoop and related technologies, on premise or in the cloud
Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Azure’s services (or transferable AWS experience)
Experience building data processing pipelines using Kafka/Storm/Spark
Expert level SQL skills, with additional experience in Python, and Java or Scala (Bonus) Experience with NoSQL databases, such as Mongo, Elastic, Cassandra or Hbase
You…
Develop, maintain, test and evaluate data pipelines and solutions
Assess, select and integrate any data tools, components, and frameworks
Support the data science and advanced analytics pipelines and teams
Support and modernise heritage DW/ETL solutions
Follow DevOps practices and make use of extensive automation and infrastructure as code approaches
Measure and evaluate platform and pipeline performance and contribute towards capacity planning
Support the business in the development and implementation of its Data Strategy, Data Governance program, Data Quality and Big Data Platform approaches and frameworks
You use…
Contemporary best practice Big Data principles, frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Industry standard ETL frameworks, approaches, technologies and tools
Agile development methodologies
DevOps approaches
You have…
A generative mindset. You come from a place of possibility, think on your feet and outside the square, and adapt well to change.
You are comfortable with ambiguity and are able to push forward with unproven ideas. You are a positive and supportive individual with a flexible, can-do attitude and the ability to see the bigger picture.
How to apply:
Please apply calling Ricky on 03 8506 6521 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
92,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Insight Timer,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are the world's largest meditation community of 18 million people, from 120 countries speaking 50+ languages. We publish 60,000 free guided meditations and music tracks by 8,000 meditation teachers and musicians from around the world.
We have been featured by TIME, Forbes, The New York Times and Vogue, and our apps have picked up the Editors Choice award by Google, and App of the Day by Apple on multiple occasions throughout the world.
The Role
More time is spent on Insight Timer than all other meditation apps combined. Data is one of our key competitive advantages as we have more variety and more depth than any other meditation app. This is a unique opportunity to be an integral part of building the nascent Data Science function at Insight Timer. We are hiring Machine Learning engineers, Data Scientists, Data Engineers and Research Scientists who are passionate about using data, ML and AI to better understand users and to offer new products and experiences that can help improve their lives.
As a Senior Machine Learning Engineer you will be owning our entire ML pipeline from ideation to final implementation via countless iterations and improvements. You will have the opportunity to develop a cutting-edge recommendation engine using deep neural networks and modern wide-and-deep recommendation frameworks. You will be supported by Data Engineers, Feature Engineers, and Data Scientists to ensure that your models are powered with high-impact, quick data.
The team includes ex-Google and ex-Atlassian employees and is advised by the former Head of Data Science at LinkedIn. You will work cross functionally and collaborate with Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers to bring your insights and ideas to life.
What you’ll do:
Implement cutting-edge ML technology to create the best recommendation system in the wellbeing/meditation space
Scope, design, create, deploy and tune ML models to improve key metrics that drive business value
Work closely with our Data Scientists to incorporate new features and insights that may improve our ML models
Own the end-to-end data pipeline with support from our data engineers and feature engineers to ensure seamless integration between our datasets, our ML models and the end-user APIs
Requirements
Graduate or Masters degree in Computer Science or similar technical field
Experience of managing a team of Data Scientists in a commercial setting
Experience with modern deep learning libraries (Tensorflow, Pytorch)
Experience with collaborative and content-based filtering in recommendation systems using modern popular recommendation system models (LFM, SLIM, GMF, MLP, NeuMF, FM, DeepFM)
Experience with big data frameworks (Hive, Hadoop, Spark)
Experience with data querying languages (SQL, BigQuery)
Commercial experience of working with big data
Benefits
Our team is a global bunch of conscious creators who are passionate about building products that make a difference. Like most of the world, we've transitioned to working from home and we’re working hard to keep our team connected. We host team meditations, focus on our wellbeing, incorporate flexibility into our work week and celebrate our successes along the way. If your application matches what we are looking for we will be in touch.
30+ days ago
Report job"
93,Senior ML Engineer,Wyn&Co,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Due to continued success my client a household name across Australia is looking to bring on a Senior ML Engineer with strong experience across GCP, ML pipelines & Computer Vision.

You will be responsible for design & implementation of ML pipelines,
Working closely with the Big Data team to make predictions on Realtime streaming data.

Requirements
Strong programming skills with Python/C/Java/SQL
Experience with DevOps tools and techniques, particularly GCP and Docker Experience with designing and building infrastructure
Experience implementing continuous integration, deployment and monitoring for ML models.
Developing ML models across CV & NLP
Designing and automating ML pipelines.
Strong communication skills & stakeholder management
Streaming Predictions
Experience with Big Data tools
This is a great opportunity to join an industry leader & work with some of the best ML Engineers & Cloud Engineers across the GCP platform.

Please apply with an up to date CV
14 days ago
Report job"
94,"Senior Software Engineer (Machine Learning), Cash App",Cash App,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Company Description
Cash App is the fastest growing financial brand in the world. Initially built to take the pain out of peer-to-peer payments, Cash App has gone from a simple product with a single purpose to a dynamic app with over 24 million monthly active users. We are bringing a better way to send, spend, invest, and save to anyone who has ever sought an alternative to the traditional banking system.
Loved by customers and pop culture, we’ve consistently held the top spot for finance in the App Store for many years, seeing more engagement with millions of followers across social media in a day than most brands see in a year. We are building an ecosystem to redefine the world’s relationship with money by making it universally accessible.
We want to hire the best talent regardless of location. Our employment model is distributed, offering the opportunity to collaborate with teams across the world in San Francisco, New York, St. Louis, Portland, Toronto, Kitchener-Waterloo, Sydney, and Melbourne.
Interested in learning more?

Job Description
At Cash App we believe Machine Learning, especially Deep Learning powered Artificial Intelligence, is the future. Our mission is to make them available in the present. To achieve this we’re organised into three teams: ML Platform, Data Infrastructure & Risk.
We believe each Machine Learning Engineer has a diverse set of skills, regardless of what your strength is, we would love to talk to you! Cash App is always willing to teach you.
Problems you’d be solving:
Prototype new approaches and productionize solutions at scale for our 34+ millions of active users
Help execute our long-term Machine Learning strategy across Cash App
Create a world class platform for training, hosting and maintaining ML models '
Identify opportunities for platformization by communicating with our applied ML team
Balance the needs of Product, Data Scientists, User Research, and other engineers in a small team to develop machine learning approaches that advance our mission to detect fraud

Qualifications
You have:
7+ years industry experience
Demonstrated technical initiative and leadership on previous projects
Managed large projects from inception to execution
The ability to work in a fast paced, autonomous and unpredictable environment
Desire to mentor & grow other machine learning engineers across the org to further these efforts
A deep understanding of software that allows you make the right trade offs
Natural curiosity & eagerness to learn (we have one day a week dedicated to Passion Projects)
Technologies we use:
We’re agnostic to what you know walking in the door. You’ll need to be happy working with:
Kotlin, Java, Go & Python
AWS, Docker, Kubernetes
Kafka, Beam and Flink

Additional Information
Cash App treats all employees and job applicants equally. Every decision is based on merit, qualifications, and talent. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with each office’s corresponding local guidelines.
30+ days ago
Report job"
95,Customer Analytics Manager,Technology Recruiting Solutions,"$180,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Full Time
Melbourne
Salary – Excellent salary package of up to $180,000 + benefits/Reference – JD1856
Role Description:
Exciting opportunity for an experienced Analytics Manager to join an existing team within the Customer Analytics department for this diverse Top ASX Listed Organisation in the Melbourne CBD. The Analytics Manager will be responsible for a team of Data Scientists and Data Analysts developing predictive modelling to help create personalised customer experiences. The perfect candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field, will have experience manage a team of data professionals with large data stores and will have some experience as an individual technical contributor within data science or machine learning.
Key responsibilities:
Drive key analytics projects including forecasting and testing, funnel optimization, response and propensity modeling, advanced customer segmentation using advanced statistical techniques.
Responsible for a team of Data Scientists and Data Analysts developing predictive modelling to help create personalised customer experiences
Manage development of data resources, gather requirements, organize sources, and support product launches
Contribute new ideas and analysis to the Customer Analytics department on mathematical and statistical concepts to create value or solve problems for the business
Engage with, educate and influence internal business stakeholders (at multiple levels in the business), to understand business priorities and business requirements
Work with business units to deliver the personalisation and modelling roadmap
In order to be considered for this role, you must have:
5 years + Managing a team of Advanced Analytics consultants and at least 3 years’ experience as an individual technical contributor within data science or machine learning
Extensive knowledge of varied machine learning models and analytical techniques
Proven experience in a data or statistical analysis roles
Statistical modelling in a major package such as SAS, SPSS and knowledge with SQ, Python and R
Understand key behaviours that drive consumer acquisition, retention, and engagement to enable decision making about product strategy and features, marketing tools and campaigns
Experience managing complex projects, in alignment with corporate data governance activities
Excellent stakeholder engagement skills
Degree or PHD in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field such as Physics, Economics or Operations Research.
To apply for this position and to send your CV click on the email below:
cv@technologyrecruiting.com.au
30+ days ago
Report job"
96,Marketing Analytics Lead,Bluefin Resources,"$150,000 - $160,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Melbourne Based
Measure and Optimise Ecommerce and Paid Marketing Channels
SQL Programming
The Role
A new opportunity in a newly established and fast-growing team within FMCG. This is a fantastic opportunity to lead the delivery of analytics to measure and optimise the ecommerce and paid marketing channels, with a clear focus on providing customers with the best experience.
As the Marketing Analytics Lead, you will be responsible for providing though leadership on industry best practices, lead and grow a team of analysts, identify current and future opportunities, and establish credible relationships with business stakeholders.
Key Responsibilities
Be part of a broad function to facilitate business outcomes
Work with the wider Data & Analytics community to create improvements
Grow the analytics team capability through ongoing development
Identify current and future opportunities
Lead and a grow the team of high-performing analysts
Set team norms, standards and procedures
Skills Required
Must have proven experience in developing measurement and optimisation of ecommerce and paid marketing campaigns in a commercial environment
Tertiary Qualification in relevant discipline (Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Applied/Computer Science)
Strong analytical skills
Experience with SQL is essential
Proven commercial experience in marketing analytics
If this sounds like the perfect opportunity for you, please click 'apply' or contact Corrin Pal at Bluefin Resources for further information.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.
http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy

BBBH42582_161179273901613
18 days ago
Report job"
97,Data Scientist,Elula,"$70,000 - $90,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"About Elula and our team
Elula is an exciting artificial intelligence and machine learning software start-up. Our suite of business ready AI products allow our enterprise customers to realise the benefits of applying Machine Learning algorithms to some of the biggest and most challenging problems facing today’s industries including Customer Engagement and Retention, Dynamic Pricing, and Optimisation.
We have a vibrant culture with an emphasis on teamwork, action, learning, creativity and a can-do attitude. We recruit only the best talent in order to join our multi-disciplinary, collaborative, high-performing team.
It is fast paced but a fun and supportive environment. At Elula you’ll always be pushed to be the best version of you and will get to work in an exceptional team at the forefront of AI product development.
You can find out more about us at https://elula.ai/team/.
About the opportunity
We are looking for talented individuals with a variety of skills and diverse interests, backgrounds and experiences.
Your main responsibilities will include developing and deploying production-level machine learning and optimisation models, and coach and uplift the capability of the team. In this role, you will focus on using best-practices to deliver commercial value and drive projects to completion with end to end ownership.
You’ll work closely with our existing Data Science team and have the opportunity to learn, as well as apply your strong data science skills to accelerate our AI products. We are looking for talented data scientists – those who back their theoretical knowledge with a practical application of machine learning.
Your talents
We are looking for people with the ability to apply their existing skills in different areas to solve new and interesting problems while expanding their technical capabilities.
Please don't undercut yourself if you don't feel you shine in each of these areas - yet. We want to be surrounded by people who are always willing to grow and learn. If you are committed to personal growth, have a do-whatever-it-takes attitude, and excited by our aspirations, we will help develop you to be the best you can be.
Skills we’re looking for in a perfect candidate:
Commercial experience in building, tuning and deploying machine learning using Spark, scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Keras or other similar tools
Strong track record in applying novel data science approaches to solve complex problems
Experience building production-level machine learning and optimisation models
Solid programming skills with at least one language: Python, R, Scala or Tableau
Exposure to machine learning development and deployment at scale on cloud big data platforms, preferably AWS
Good working knowledge and commercial exposure to DevOps, and CI/CD principles
Exposure to data visualisation development tools such as Shiny, Plotly or Tableau
Ability to coach and guide team members to uplift team capability
Ability to communicate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders and team members
Collaborative approach and willingness embrace a start-up mindset
Creative flair coupled with a passion for AI and analytics
Appetite to personally develop alongside our experienced team of data scientists and engineers
University degree in analytics, mathematics, statistics, computer science, or other quantitative disciplines; PhD or postgraduate level preferred
Interested?
If you're excited about working with a close-knit team of highly motivated people, that are focused on delivering world class solutions, please click apply to submit your CV and cover letter that tells us what you could bring to and learn from this role. Our ideal candidate is someone who is always striving to improve themselves and the way that we operate at Elula.
Flexible work arrangements are available.
Application Deadline: 07/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $90,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
9 days ago
Report job"
98,Entry level Data Scientist / Risk Analyst opportunities,Commonwealth Bank,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"About Elula and our team
Elula is an exciting artificial intelligence and machine learning software start-up. Our suite of business ready AI products allow our enterprise customers to realise the benefits of applying Machine Learning algorithms to some of the biggest and most challenging problems facing today’s industries including Customer Engagement and Retention, Dynamic Pricing, and Optimisation.
We have a vibrant culture with an emphasis on teamwork, action, learning, creativity and a can-do attitude. We recruit only the best talent in order to join our multi-disciplinary, collaborative, high-performing team.
It is fast paced but a fun and supportive environment. At Elula you’ll always be pushed to be the best version of you and will get to work in an exceptional team at the forefront of AI product development.
You can find out more about us at https://elula.ai/team/.
About the opportunity
We are looking for talented individuals with a variety of skills and diverse interests, backgrounds and experiences.
Your main responsibilities will include developing and deploying production-level machine learning and optimisation models, and coach and uplift the capability of the team. In this role, you will focus on using best-practices to deliver commercial value and drive projects to completion with end to end ownership.
You’ll work closely with our existing Data Science team and have the opportunity to learn, as well as apply your strong data science skills to accelerate our AI products. We are looking for talented data scientists – those who back their theoretical knowledge with a practical application of machine learning.
Your talents
We are looking for people with the ability to apply their existing skills in different areas to solve new and interesting problems while expanding their technical capabilities.
Please don't undercut yourself if you don't feel you shine in each of these areas - yet. We want to be surrounded by people who are always willing to grow and learn. If you are committed to personal growth, have a do-whatever-it-takes attitude, and excited by our aspirations, we will help develop you to be the best you can be.
Skills we’re looking for in a perfect candidate:
Commercial experience in building, tuning and deploying machine learning using Spark, scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Keras or other similar tools
Strong track record in applying novel data science approaches to solve complex problems
Experience building production-level machine learning and optimisation models
Solid programming skills with at least one language: Python, R, Scala or Tableau
Exposure to machine learning development and deployment at scale on cloud big data platforms, preferably AWS
Good working knowledge and commercial exposure to DevOps, and CI/CD principles
Exposure to data visualisation development tools such as Shiny, Plotly or Tableau
Ability to coach and guide team members to uplift team capability
Ability to communicate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders and team members
Collaborative approach and willingness embrace a start-up mindset
Creative flair coupled with a passion for AI and analytics
Appetite to personally develop alongside our experienced team of data scientists and engineers
University degree in analytics, mathematics, statistics, computer science, or other quantitative disciplines; PhD or postgraduate level preferred
Interested?
If you're excited about working with a close-knit team of highly motivated people, that are focused on delivering world class solutions, please click apply to submit your CV and cover letter that tells us what you could bring to and learn from this role. Our ideal candidate is someone who is always striving to improve themselves and the way that we operate at Elula.
Flexible work arrangements are available.
Application Deadline: 07/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $90,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
9 days ago
Report job"
99,Data Scientist,Genworth,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Summary
The Advanced Analytics team is responsible for utilising mathematics and machine learning methodologies to solve business problems, explore new opportunities and generate insights in collaboration with business units. Team members are data scientists of varying experience with knowledge in one or more domain areas of data science, all of whom have a passion for using empirical research to solve complex problems and an ability to translate analytical insights into actionable recommendations for the business.
Responsibilities
The main responsibilities include:
Champion the use of advanced analytics across the organisation through knowledge sharing and socialisation of advanced analytics techniques;
Adopt an iterative approach to initiatives, developing prototype solutions in Proof of Concepts (POCs) to test hypotheses, and embracing a fail-fast experimentation approach to solving complex problems;
Develop predictive models using Generalised Linear Models, Markov chains and other advanced algorithms such as decision trees, random forests and neural networks;
Utlise mathematical, statistical and machine learning techniques to solve business problems, explore new opportunities and generate insights from data;
Become AWS Cloud Solution Architect certified and take responsibility for progressing the advanced analytics platform on AWS;
Deployment of real-time statistical models and machine learning algorithms into a production operational environment using containerization;
Leverage business and data knowledge to proactively pitch and discuss new ideas for generating data-driven insights with stakeholders and team members;
Involvement in all phases of the solution lifecycle including ideation, problem formulation, analysis, feature selection, model development, testing, documentation, deployment, presentation and story-telling of results and translation of insights into actionable recommendations for the business;
Communicate regularly and effectively with stakeholders throughout the entire solution lifecycle;
Ensure all development follows the established advanced analytics standards, including Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), model governance policies and audit requirements;
Adhere to the compliance obligations relevant to the position; perform duties in an ethical, lawful and safe manner; undertake training as directed by the Compliance Leader; report and escalate compliance concerns, issues and failures; and disclose potential conflicts of interest.
Most Frequent Contacts
The Advanced Analytics team is an enterprise function, providing mathematical and machine learning expertise to solve business problems collaboratively with the following business units:
Finance & Actuarial;
Risk;
Operations;
Information Technology (IT);
Commercial.
This role will communicate regularly with stakeholders from these business units throughout initiatives and proactively engage in discussions to pitch new ideas for insights.
Qualifications – Required
Degree in Data Science/Mathematics/Statistics or equivalent;
3+ years in a data science role using at least one analytical software such as R, Python or SAS;
Passion for using mathematics to solve complex business problems;
Knowledge of foundational statistical analysis such as sampling, distributions, feature selection techniques and significance testing;
Experience in a previous role of fitting at least one of Generalied Linear Models (GLMs), decision trees, random forests or neural networks;
Ability to manipulate and analyse complex, high volume, high dimensionality data from varying sources;
Excellent communication and stakeholder management skills;
Clear report writing and presentation skills with an ability to communicate complex ideas in a creative, understandable manner that engages senior management;
Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills.
Qualifications - Preferred
Experience of writing SQL queries to extract/interrogate relational databases;
Experience in using AWS Cloud machine learning services – AWS Cloud Solution Architect certification would be advantageous;
Understanding of data warehousing concepts and methodologies;
Knowledge of deploying statistical models and machine learning algorithms into a production operational environment or AWS Sagemaker using containerization;
Ability to develop visualisations using Tableau software;
Experience from a previous role in the insurance industry;
Econometric and/or housing and mortgage market knowledge.
27 days ago
Report job"
100,"Professional, Data Scientist",CoreLogic,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job Summary
Join the team that powers the global real estate economy - CoreLogic is an innovative, future focused company whose vision is to deliver unique property-level insights that power the global real estate economy.
We are a $1.95 billion in sales company with more than 6,000 employees globally serving the financial services and insurance industries. We are evolving at a rapid pace and the clients we serve are challenged from every direction, which means we are growing and innovating to help drive their success. Working together, and differentiated by our superior data, analytics and data-enabled solutions, we empower our clients to make smarter business decisions through data-driven insights. We take initiative, are fully accountable, build respect and trust, make transparency a must—and engage, include and collaborate at every turn.
We take pride in our work and believe in cultivating a work environment that supports and values our greatest asset: our talented employees.
Job Description:
The Analytics Data Scientist/Engineer will contribute to the growth and success of CoreLogic business by supporting the Data and Analytics business unit contribution to business solutions and decisions for both internal teams and external clients.
The Analytics Data Scientist/Engineer will develop or build solutions which may consist of (but are not limited to), batch computing, APIs - which are stand alone or support the wider Data and Analytics team environments, data transformation, extraction, enhancements, reporting and analytical insights. In some instances, the Analytics Data Engineer will also help deliver the solution as part of a greater project team.
Job Qualification:
Key Responsibilities of the role
Creation of solutions using AWS services, Python and SQL to enable the effective collection, cleansing, loading, querying and reporting of large data sets
Support & monitoring of existing ETL processes, batch computing (ML) processes and APIs
Ensure documentation of all data processes and assets is kept up to date and is coherent
Give support to internal and external customers integrating with our products
Provide thought leadership on new engineering technologies and their application in analytics
Key Requirements
To be successful in this role the key competencies required include:
Capability to logically select the optimal solution when presented with multiple options, examine situations and test multiple outcomes.
Ability to effectively explain design solutions, business rules and data interactions
Experience in a fast-paced, software or data driven commercial environment
Understanding of commonly used architectural frameworks
Understanding and analysing of datasets and how these datasets interact with solutions architecture
Experience in presenting and explaining complex solutions to a business audience
Strong technical skills in cloud based technologies/architectures
Ability to work well as part of a team
Experience and Education Required
Bachelors (or higher) degree in computing, mathematics or statistics related disciplines
Advanced knowledge of SQL and ETL concepts
Minimum of 2 year commercial experience using relevant software tools, e.g. Python, SQL or R in a Linux environment
Comfortable working in Linux and Unix environments
Experience with AWS or equivalent other cloud environments - any or all of EC2, S3, RDS, Athena, Dynamo DB, AWS lambda, API Gateway
Experience in API development, server less architectures, containerization & CI/CD
CoreLogic's Diversity Commitment:
CoreLogic is fully committed to employing a diverse workforce and creating an inclusive work environment that embraces everyone’s unique contributions, experiences and values. We offer an empowered work environment that encourages creativity, initiative and professional growth and provides a competitive salary and benefits package. We are better together when we support and recognize our differences.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability:
CoreLogic is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer committed to attracting and retaining the best-qualified people available, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability or status as a veteran of the Armed Forces, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law. CoreLogic maintains a Drug-Free Workplace.
Please apply on our website for consideration.
Privacy Policy - http://www.corelogic.com/privacy.aspx
Connect with us on social media! Click on the quicklinks below to find out more about our company and associates.
Today
Report job"
101,Position – Data Scientist,Robonomics AI,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Location – Sydney and Digital / Remote
Experience – Minimum 8 years
We are looking for a candidate with good command over R / Python and in-depth knowledge and experience in Machine Learning, deep learning methods, algorithm design, analysis, development, and performance improvement. Strong understanding of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering, classification, regression techniques, recommendation (collaborative filtering) algorithms and Time series analysis.

We are eager to hear from you if you have one of the below mentioned skills. Send us your resume at careers@robonomics.ai
2 days ago
Report job"
102,Data Scientist Consultant,The Future Society,Not shown,Remote,"The Future Society is an independent 501(c)(3) nonprofit think-and-do tank. We advance the global governance of artificial intelligence (AI) and other emerging technologies for the benefit of humanity. We help society govern AI, seizing the opportunities it presents while mitigating its risks. The Future Society is adding an element of applied AI research to its agenda, starting by looking into how AI can be used for reading and benchmarking businesses’ statements on Modern Slavery. We are looking for one Data Scientist to join our team and support our Project AIMS (AI against Modern Slavery).
Years after the adoption and implementation of the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act in 2010 and the UK Modern Slavery Act (MSA) in 2015, little is known about businesses’ compliance and what they have been reporting. It is imperative to innovate the process of report analysis in order to boost compliance and help combat Modern Slavery. We are looking into automating the analysis and benchmarking of existing statements.
In April 2020, The Future Society launched Project AIMS in partnership with Walk Free. Project AIMS builds upon the BHRRC Modern Slavery Registry to develop an AI algorithm to ‘read’ the statements produced by companies under the Modern Slavery Act. This algorithm will use metrics designed by Walk Free in line with the UK Government guidance. The new tool will be integrated with the WikiRate platform to enable ongoing human verification of the automated data collection. For more details see our GitHub.
Duration: To be determined
Location: Remote-based, flexible location, UTC+ preferred, please apply even if outside of Australia
Application deadline: February 19th or until filled (please apply at earliest convenience)
Starting date: March 1st or when position filled
Employment Type: Full time, paid.
Seniority level: Min 3-5 years experience
Recruitment process: Fill in the following form: https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSfLXa_J9ermuz4_66QmO_idhMZMq3LskjKtbF-nOVvVTF6NCg/viewform?usp=sf_link
If you are pre-selected, this stage will be followed by a technical test and three interviews with our team.
1. Tasks
Coordinate with TFS staff, partners, and advisors in designing the project’s technical structure
Design and set the short and long term steps for the project in collaboration with the TFS staff, partners, and advisors
Monitor and support the meeting of the project’s deliverable
Lead and implement the data science and engineering requirements of the project
Design and implement the data pipeline for the project
Research, design and deploy machine learning models for the metrics, in collaboration with TFS advisors
Assist in the design and implementation of the integration process of the Project AIMS’ tool with the WikiRate platform
Delegate tasks to junior data scientists to realize the successful completion of the project
Monitor the performance of junior data scientists and provide them with practical guidance, as needed
Write clear and concise text reports summarising progress and results for both technical and non-technical audiences
Keep clear documentation of the project and contribute to the writing of the Project Handbook and publications
Support and participate in relevant events
2. Required skills & traits
Bachelors or Advanced degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or similar
Extensive experience as a Data Scientist (Minimum 3-5 years)
Demonstrable history of devising and overseeing data-centered projects
Proficiency in Python
Proficiency in English
Experience working with Docker Containers
Experience with deploying ML and DL models
Experience in designing and building APIs
Hands-on experience with one of the major cloud platforms (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Competent in machine learning/deep learning principles and techniques, especially NLP
Able to use standard collaboration tools such as Git
Ability to relay insights in layman’s terms, such that these can be used to write the Project Handbook as well as inform business decisions
Ability to supervise and mentor junior data scientists
Capacity to foster a collaborative, stimulating work environment that frequently harnesses teamwork
Compliance with prevailing ethical standards
Ability to work independently
Detail-oriented, organized, conscientious, diligent
3. Bonus skills & traits (not required)
General software engineering knowledge and skills
Experience working in small organizations, similar to The Future Society
Any extra Computer Science, Data Science, and Machine learning (ML) experience and skills
Web scraping
In-depth understanding of SQL
Great team spirit
4. What you can get from this role
Help eradicate modern slavery
Lead the technical development of an internationally recognized ‘AI for Good’ project
Directly shape AI developments, leading the development of an AI solution for something that does not exist yet
Help in automating manual and time-consuming work
Take part in a great data challenge & opportunity
Be part of an agile, small, global team
Interact with a high-level global network of experts in AI and leaders in AI policy, including international organizations such as the World Bank and UNESCO, AI Labs such as Mila, Australian Institute of Machine Learning, or scientists from BNP Paribas or namR, etc.
Work with geographic flexibility
Gain professional development & networking opportunity
Gain experience working in a dynamic, diverse, growing, and international think-tank that participates in leading AI policy events around the world
The Future Society is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, age, membership in an employee organization, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.
Application Deadline: 19/02/2021
Expected Start Date: 01/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract
Schedule:
Flexible hours
Experience:
Data Science: 3 years (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work Remotely:
Yes
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Remote interview process
6 days ago
Report job"
103,Data Scientist,Cover Genius,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Company

Cover Genius are a global Insurtech disruptor. We distribute insurance products to the largest e-commerce sites globally via a B2B platform. Our first product to market, RentalCover.com, has been an outstanding B2B and B2C success within the travel vertical. Following this success we released XCover, a multi-line distribution platform for global eCommerce partners. We’re winning awards all over the place for the work our team (read family) are doing towards tackling a previously un-tacklable industry.

Our People are
Bold, Authentic, Purposeful and Inspired

Our People are not
Perfect, Traditional, Complacent or Cautious

What are we looking for?

A Data Scientist (pricing and recommendation) to help us take our BrightWrite product to the next level. BrightWrite is the brain behind all CoverGenius' products, it is the powerhouse behind our experimentations, pricing optimisations and product recommendations. BrightWrite is used both internally and by our external partners.

As a Data Scientist, you should be comfortable talking about probability distributions, you ""probably"" have a strong opinion on the Frequentists vs. Bayesian debate. You have a few years of experience working with Machine Learning systems and understand the ins and outs of the algorithm (not just how to use the tools). You will use SQL to find insights from our dataset and form hypotheses as well as design and explore different algorithms and pricing strategies to better optimise yield.

Want to know more about our tech stack? Check out what we have adopted, are trialling and assessing.
What the ideal profile looks like
Practical, hands-on experience with a variety of Machine Learning and statistical testing techniques
Master's or PhD in Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or other Quantitative fields
Production level experience with experiment design and A/B testing
5+ years of experience in manipulating data sets using Python & SQL and building statistical models
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product delivery
Great communication, be able to tailor explanations of statistical concepts to a variety of audiences
Quick learner, welcomes new challenges and is not afraid to push the boundaries.

Nice to have
Revenue Management methods in real applications
Deep knowledge of data warehousing and running ETL
Experience with Recommender systems
Experience with Deep Reinforcement learning
Why Cover Genius?

Cover Genius not only cares about being the best in our industry, we care about our team. We’re a business that understands life can be fluid and so we flex to ensure we provide the environment to suit that. What does that mean?

Flexible Work Environment - we are outcome focussed and understand that for our people to perform at their best flexibility is critical. Soon after the declaration of the COVID-19 global pandemic the entire CG team was granted an extra 15 days of Wellness Leave to take throughout 2020.
Employee Stock Options - we want our people to share in our success, we reward them with ownership for their contribution in creating a world-class company.

Work with like-minded people who are passionate about both the work we're doing and giving back. Our CG Gives programs enables us to all become philanthropists through our peer recognition and rewards system.
Social Initiatives - pictures speak a thousand words!

Sound interesting? If you think you have the best composition of the above, send us your resume and let's chat!
25 days ago
Report job"
104,Machine Learning Data Scientist,Susquehanna International Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Once in the team you will bring your machine learning expertise to bear on all aspects of the trade pipeline. You must have the ability to build models for high-frequency asset price prediction, to analyse the resulting trades, and to build models for better understanding of latency implications, etc. You must be able to explain clearly your ideas and results to the rest of the team.

In the role you will:

Contribute techniques from machine learning towards improved automated trading systems.
Work with traders, quants, software developers in a highly focused team building, deploying and improving automated trading systems.
Research, implement, test, deploy and monitor proprietary systems trading across multiple markets and financial products. We work at all levels of the problem domain from market data handlers through trade monitoring.
Work with python systems to extract the data you will require; (Preferable C++ but not a must)

What we're looking for

Ph.D. in Computer Science/ Quantitative subject (statistics, math, engineering, physics).
Comfortable programming python in a Linux environment.
You have developed real-world ML applications and have a strong interest in finance and trading.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to liaise with senior/executive trading staff.
Ability to work autonomously and as a member of inter-departmental teams.

We don’t post salary ranges externally so any salary estimate you see listed on a third party website was not provided by SIG and may not be accurate.

SIG is not accepting unsolicited resumes from search firms. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at SIG via-email, the Internet or directly without a valid written search agreement will be deemed the sole property of SIG, and no fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by SIG.
30+ days ago
Report job"
105,Data Scientist,KBR,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Title:
Data Scientist
At KBR we are paving the way in how we do things. Creativity, collaboration and excellence is what KBR’s core is made up of. Does this resonate with you?
We value an inclusive and diverse work environment and are working together to build a culture that embraces each other’s unique strengths and experiences.
Our people are important to us and are what makes our business successful. Therefore, we realise it is important to nurture a culture of trust giving you the freedom to step up and take opportunities that challenge you and push your career to the next level. We will encourage you to work in a way that suits you and look forward to discussing what you need to be successful.
The Opportunity
KBR’s Infrastructure Services Business is reimagining how we deliver and transforming into a digitally enabled business. Our strategy focuses on data-driven solutions, using cloud-based data analytics to provide improved outcomes for our clients and our business. The Data Scientist will work within the Program Management Office working with complex data sets from multiple sources and providing specialist advice and best practice solutions to internal and external stakeholders. The role will use both technology and support from those with domain expertise to identify trends based on industry knowledge and contextual understanding. They will support the development of tools for the analysis of strategic data, allowing the business to interrogate and report on data trends that further improve its decision making and performance.
Who are you?
If you are a recent graduate with qualifications in Computer Science, Data Science or Information Systems with 2 to 7 years experience in a similar role we would love to hear from you. We are seeking a technically savvy candidate, with competency and enthusiasm in data management and mathematics, able to problem solve and create innovative analytical solutions. Previous experience setting up and working with portfolio management tools such as MS PPM would be advantageous as would competency with Power BI, DAX & M, and Azure/AWS Analytics. Inter-industry experience is often valuable, however relevance and applicability needs to be clearly communicated in your application.
About Us
KBR have been established for over 100 years and we pride ourselves on being an innovative and forward-thinking company with a reputation for delivering on some of the most challenging and complex engineering projects in the world.
So how do I apply?
If what you've read resonates with your values, experience and career aspiration then we want to hear from you! Just click apply and upload your resume and cover letter.
KBR values an inclusive and diverse work environment and we encourage candidates from all backgrounds to apply. Our hiring decisions are based on the key requirements of each role and candidates are selected based on their unique strengths and experiences.
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
26 days ago
Report job"
106,Graduate Data Scientist/Technologist,Mining Plus,Not shown,Perth WA,"GRADUATE DATA SCIENTIST/TECHNOLOGIST

Mining Plus are looking for a Graduate Data Scientist/Technologist to assist with research, innovation and technology activities across our global business on a 1-year fixed term contract. Previous mining experience is not required, however some prior knowledge and interest in the resources industry would be highly beneficial.

We here at Mining Plus think that Mining is Awesome! We have a passion for our great industry, the inspiring people within it and the amazing projects we get to work on. Our Vision is to develop a high-performance culture and be known as the best professional mining experts on the planet.

We are +100 full time expert mining professionals with 9 offices in 4 countries operating as One Team. Corporately we are a part of the Byrnecut Group who are specialist underground mining contractors employing more than 4,000 people globally.

Our customers range from services, exploration and mining companies on a global scale. Our core capability centres on Geology, Geotechnical Engineering and Mining Engineering, covering all hard rock mineral commodities across the project value chain which are enhanced by strategic alliances in other core disciplines.

The perfect scenario is for us to go from project conceptual stage (Define - Corporate), right through feasibility study work (Plan – Consulting) to project delivery (Operate – Contracting). We have a unique ability to integrate seamlessly with customer’s project teams to deliver results with the flexibility of working remotely or mobilising to site.

This role is focussed on research, innovation and technology and will include:
Focus on digitalisation and automation innovation trends in the mining industry
Data science projects with a focus on emerging Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Machine Learning (ML) applications in the minerals industry
Being a key interface with the emerging Mining Equipment, Technology and Services (METS) sector
Defining and maintaining a “living” METS Engagement Roadmap across the entire Mining Value Chain
Prospecting and identifying collaboration opportunities
Remaining up-to-date with emerging mining industry technology trends
Populating and managing an internal knowledge base and communicating this knowledge base to the Mining Plus Global Team
Assisting in building new capabilities around technology scoping, design, implementation, deployment and ongoing engagement
Assisting with proposals, projects and technical studies
Assisting with the weekly Innovation Showcase
Interfacing with METS start-ups and incubators

To be successful in this role you will need to demonstrate the following character traits:
Highly motivated and a self-starter to succeed in working autonomously
Excellent communication skills and open to cold-calling and networking with a large variety of stakeholders
Willingness to bring ideas and raise issues
Advanced analytical and problem-solving skills
Abstract thinking, outside the box, as well as critical thinking and the ability to challenge the status quo
Innovating for the future
Pride in “getting it right the first time”
25 days ago
Report job"
107,Data Scientist - Senior,HAYS,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Data specialist with data science capabilities and experience within finance.

Your new company
This organisation is one of the largest and well known in the ANZ market; offering a fantastic opportunity for you to join the business and create change in their data process

Your new role
You will be working closely with the business to create and define strategy across automation, analytics and reporting. You will work closely with the business to drive actionable insights based on the data . Working closely with the development team and none technical stakeholders to develop data assets and reporting solutions within this area of the bank.

What you'll need to succeed
Experience in Programming languages such as C/ C++, R or Python
Experience with data visualization tools such as Power BI
Proven experience working at a senior level within data within the banking sector.
Ability to create and build business strategy from data insights
Proven experience updating process efficiencies using data science techniques and tools



What you'll get in return
The chance to build and progress your career working within a highly engaged an successful team whilst making a tangible difference to the data landscape of the bank

What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or call us now.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

LHS 297508 #2460313
27 days ago
Report job"
108,"Data Scientist, Scaled Sales",Uber,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About the Role
A deep, data driven understanding of our restaurant segment is core to enabling the scaled sales & success team to understand our opportunities for growth, deliver high impact, targeted campaigns, and understand our performance from restaurant acquisition to lifecycle & commercial restaurant success. The Scaled Sales Analytics Manager will provide this key analytical function to the team, owning our segmentation, identifying growth opportunities, and assessing our performance. You'll know where the opportunities for growth lie, and provide structured and insightful recommendations which direct & enable the team to empower merchant partners with maximum impact.
What You'll Do
Build, own and maintain a restaurant partner segmentation model, to enable a deep understanding of merchant partner performance
Frequently deep dive into specific metrics, eg churn, menu conversion performance or early lifecycle performance, to drive insights
Provide analysis & recommend segmentations for where opportunities for commercial growth exist in the scaled segment
Own in-depth commercial performance reporting to the Scaled team weekly. Provide recommendations to all team members for improvements
Tell stories with data - we'll be looking for strong recommendations from insights, not just reporting
Based on your recommendations and prioritised team KPIs, develop audiences for campaigns and complete cohorting to assist with campaign execution
Design & run experiments relating to all team activity
Track campaigns post-launch & provide campaign & channel level reporting for all activity undertaken by the scaled sales team
Back-up support for our automation roadmap, either assisting with delivery, or serving as a back-up escalation point for failures
Complete comparable dataset analysis to deliver deep, commercial insights internally and to partners
What You'll Need
This is an analytical role at its core, but the candidate will need to bring a strong commercial mind-set to ensure high impact
Bachelors degree (or higher) in Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, or other relevant quantitative fields
3+ years experience as a dedicated analyst / data scientist, delivering high impact insights & recommendations
Intermediate to advanced programming skills - well versed in Python/R, SQL at a minimum
Able to create data tables, write complex queries, with the ability to join tables etc in SQL
Experience in big data sets - developing & maintaining data pipelines and/or data integration solutions
Data delivery automation
Problem solving - the ability to seek out the root cause of issues and recommend structured solutions
Able to deliver aggregate data (eg by sector) and deliver commercially astute visualisations, showing a range of metrics from commercial performance, to product engagement, to churn propensity, and use data to drive recommendations
The ability to design campaign structures which use testing techniques (A|B testing or hold outs), execute the technical elements of campaigns, and deliver campaign wraps & learnings which assess performance against key campaign metrics, and recommend next steps to drive further impact
You're a superb team player. We're building something new here, and we will drive and share our successes as a team
About the Team
**
**With Uber Eats, we're building Uber's newest and fastest growing business, spanning 180+ cities across all six continents in two years. Today, Uber Eats is available across many parts of APAC including Mumbai, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Auckland, Sydney and Melbourne - and we're just getting started.
The Sales & Success team at Uber Eats is the growth engine responsible for the acquisition, retention, and development of restaurant partners, ensuring their ongoing success on the Uber Eats platform. The scaled team is newly formed, and will be building great restaurant experiences across the entire restaurant lifecycle, targeted at SMBs and utilising scaled channels.
At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 600 cities around the world.
We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have the curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.
At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 10,000 cities around the world.
We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have the curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.
5 days ago
Report job"
109,"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics",Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How will I help?
As the Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics in Group Strategy, your role is to support the team to make informed decisions through the application of data mining, predictive analytics and machine learning techniques. You will work closely with business partners to understand the business objectives and challenges to design analytical solutions to meet business goals.
What's in it for you?
You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years. You'll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working (open to candidates-based interstate). Along with competitive salary, you'll receive Westpac’s generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts.
What do I need?
We'd expect you to have a minimum of 3 years' experience in statistical modelling in a big data environment (Hadoop/Spark/R/Python) in Financial Services/Banking or similar industry and excellent proficiency in translating and analysing data. You will also be experienced with selecting features, building, and optimising classifiers using machine learning techniques and have worked with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes. Additionally you will need to have knowledge of a variety of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, statistical tests and proper usage, random forest, clustering, decision tree learning, deep learning text mining etc.) Tertiary education in the Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics disciplines will be highly regarded.
What is it like to work there?
We aim to provide one big, supportive team to help us reach our vision to become one of the world's great service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we're proud to have created a culture and work environment that values diversity and flexibility – and champions inclusion.
The health and wellbeing of our employees is our priority and we will ensure that physical distancing requirements are met in all our workplaces as long as required.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Branch Sales and Service
Primary Location : AU-NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : Crystal Chan
Posting Date : 08/02/2021, 4:26:45 PM
Closing Date : 23/02/2021, 6:59:00 AM
7 days ago
Report job"
110,2021/2022 Summer Internship Program - Analytics / Data Science,Atlassian,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Atlassian is continuing to hire with all interviewing and on-boarding done virtually due to COVID-19. All new and existing Atlassians will continue to work from home until it’s safe to return to our offices.

Does the thought of uncovering the next big 'aha!' insight excite you? Do you love solving tough problems, and flourish with variety? Come join Atlassian's growing Analytics & Data Science team for the summer and use your skills to influence millions of teams around the world!

Applicants must have Australian citizenship, Australian Permanent Residency or NZ citizenship at time of application.
In the Analytics and Data Science team, you'll have the opportunity to:
Play with our seriously large volume of data to discover insightful trends, and then collaborate with other Atlassians to turn your insights to actions, drive smarter product decisions and ultimately, delight our customers
Measure the impact our product strategy; designing and analysing experiments and product launches
Share your high-quality insights and recommendations to peers and leadership in order to influence or drive critical business decisions
Super-launch your career through our experienced analyst mentoring while gaining invaluable exposure to the role of analytics and data science at a fast growing global technology giant
On your first day, we'll expect you to:
Be able to commit to a 12 week full-time (38hrs / week) internship from late November 2021 until late February 2022). We may be able to flex on this slightly if your course timetable does not allow for a 12 week placement during this timeframe.
Be currently enrolled in a Bachelors, Masters, or PhD in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, mathematics, physics, econometrics, or computer science) and be graduating by January 2023
Have experience manipulating data using one of SQL, R, Python (or other languages)
Demonstrate the ability to translate business questions into technical solutions, and communicate analytical results broad audiences
Have a passion for collaborating with cross-functional team members, like engineers, product managers, designers and other analysts
More about Atlassian

Creating software that empowers everyone from small startups to the who’s who of tech is why we’re here. We build tools like Jira, Confluence, Bitbucket, and Trello to help teams across the world become more nimble, creative, and aligned—collaboration is the heart of every product we dream of at Atlassian. From Amsterdam and Austin, to Sydney and San Francisco, we’re looking for people who want to write the future and who believe that we can accomplish so much more together than apart. At Atlassian, we’re committed to an environment where everyone has the autonomy and freedom to thrive, as well as the support of like-minded colleagues who are motivated by a common goal to: Unleash the potential of every team.

Additional Information

We believe that the unique contributions of all Atlassians is the driver of our success. To make sure that our products and culture continue to incorporate everyone's perspectives and experience we never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Learn more about Atlassian’s culture, interviewing flow, and hiring process by checking out our Candidate Resource Hub.
Today
Report job"
111,Data Scientist,C3 AI,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"C3.ai, Inc. (NYSE:AI) is a leading provider of Enterprise AI software for accelerating digital transformation. C3 AI delivers a family of fully integrated products: C3 AI® Suite, an end-to-end platform for developing, deploying, and operating large-scale AI applications; C3 AI Applications, a portfolio of industry-specific SaaS AI applications; C3 AI CRM, a suite of industry-specific CRM applications designed for AI and machine learning; and C3 AI Ex Machina, a no-code AI solution to apply data science to everyday business problems. The core of the C3 AI offering is an open, model-driven AI architecture that dramatically simplifies data science and application development. Learn more at: www.c3.ai

In this capacity, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating IoT. In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning, AI, and specifically deep learning algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.
Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying deep learning algorithms on industrial IoT applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R.
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3 AI provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3 AI is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.
27 days ago
Report job"
112,Data Scientist,Elula,"$70,000 - $90,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"About Elula and our team
Elula is an exciting artificial intelligence and machine learning software start-up. Our suite of business ready AI products allow our enterprise customers to realise the benefits of applying Machine Learning algorithms to some of the biggest and most challenging problems facing today’s industries including Customer Engagement and Retention, Dynamic Pricing, and Optimisation.
We have a vibrant culture with an emphasis on teamwork, action, learning, creativity and a can-do attitude. We recruit only the best talent in order to join our multi-disciplinary, collaborative, high-performing team.
It is fast paced but a fun and supportive environment. At Elula you’ll always be pushed to be the best version of you and will get to work in an exceptional team at the forefront of AI product development.
You can find out more about us at https://elula.ai/team/.
About the opportunity
We are looking for talented individuals with a variety of skills and diverse interests, backgrounds and experiences.
Your main responsibilities will include developing and deploying production-level machine learning and optimisation models, and coach and uplift the capability of the team. In this role, you will focus on using best-practices to deliver commercial value and drive projects to completion with end to end ownership.
You’ll work closely with our existing Data Science team and have the opportunity to learn, as well as apply your strong data science skills to accelerate our AI products. We are looking for talented data scientists – those who back their theoretical knowledge with a practical application of machine learning.
Your talents
We are looking for people with the ability to apply their existing skills in different areas to solve new and interesting problems while expanding their technical capabilities.
Please don't undercut yourself if you don't feel you shine in each of these areas - yet. We want to be surrounded by people who are always willing to grow and learn. If you are committed to personal growth, have a do-whatever-it-takes attitude, and excited by our aspirations, we will help develop you to be the best you can be.
Skills we’re looking for in a perfect candidate:
Commercial experience in building, tuning and deploying machine learning using Spark, scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Keras or other similar tools
Strong track record in applying novel data science approaches to solve complex problems
Experience building production-level machine learning and optimisation models
Solid programming skills with at least one language: Python, R, Scala or Tableau
Exposure to machine learning development and deployment at scale on cloud big data platforms, preferably AWS
Good working knowledge and commercial exposure to DevOps, and CI/CD principles
Exposure to data visualisation development tools such as Shiny, Plotly or Tableau
Ability to coach and guide team members to uplift team capability
Ability to communicate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders and team members
Collaborative approach and willingness embrace a start-up mindset
Creative flair coupled with a passion for AI and analytics
Appetite to personally develop alongside our experienced team of data scientists and engineers
University degree in analytics, mathematics, statistics, computer science, or other quantitative disciplines; PhD or postgraduate level preferred
Interested?
If you're excited about working with a close-knit team of highly motivated people, that are focused on delivering world class solutions, please click apply to submit your CV and cover letter that tells us what you could bring to and learn from this role. Our ideal candidate is someone who is always striving to improve themselves and the way that we operate at Elula.
Flexible work arrangements are available.
Application Deadline: 07/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $90,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
9 days ago
Report job"
113,Entry level Data Scientist / Risk Analyst opportunities,Commonwealth Bank,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"About Elula and our team
Elula is an exciting artificial intelligence and machine learning software start-up. Our suite of business ready AI products allow our enterprise customers to realise the benefits of applying Machine Learning algorithms to some of the biggest and most challenging problems facing today’s industries including Customer Engagement and Retention, Dynamic Pricing, and Optimisation.
We have a vibrant culture with an emphasis on teamwork, action, learning, creativity and a can-do attitude. We recruit only the best talent in order to join our multi-disciplinary, collaborative, high-performing team.
It is fast paced but a fun and supportive environment. At Elula you’ll always be pushed to be the best version of you and will get to work in an exceptional team at the forefront of AI product development.
You can find out more about us at https://elula.ai/team/.
About the opportunity
We are looking for talented individuals with a variety of skills and diverse interests, backgrounds and experiences.
Your main responsibilities will include developing and deploying production-level machine learning and optimisation models, and coach and uplift the capability of the team. In this role, you will focus on using best-practices to deliver commercial value and drive projects to completion with end to end ownership.
You’ll work closely with our existing Data Science team and have the opportunity to learn, as well as apply your strong data science skills to accelerate our AI products. We are looking for talented data scientists – those who back their theoretical knowledge with a practical application of machine learning.
Your talents
We are looking for people with the ability to apply their existing skills in different areas to solve new and interesting problems while expanding their technical capabilities.
Please don't undercut yourself if you don't feel you shine in each of these areas - yet. We want to be surrounded by people who are always willing to grow and learn. If you are committed to personal growth, have a do-whatever-it-takes attitude, and excited by our aspirations, we will help develop you to be the best you can be.
Skills we’re looking for in a perfect candidate:
Commercial experience in building, tuning and deploying machine learning using Spark, scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Keras or other similar tools
Strong track record in applying novel data science approaches to solve complex problems
Experience building production-level machine learning and optimisation models
Solid programming skills with at least one language: Python, R, Scala or Tableau
Exposure to machine learning development and deployment at scale on cloud big data platforms, preferably AWS
Good working knowledge and commercial exposure to DevOps, and CI/CD principles
Exposure to data visualisation development tools such as Shiny, Plotly or Tableau
Ability to coach and guide team members to uplift team capability
Ability to communicate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders and team members
Collaborative approach and willingness embrace a start-up mindset
Creative flair coupled with a passion for AI and analytics
Appetite to personally develop alongside our experienced team of data scientists and engineers
University degree in analytics, mathematics, statistics, computer science, or other quantitative disciplines; PhD or postgraduate level preferred
Interested?
If you're excited about working with a close-knit team of highly motivated people, that are focused on delivering world class solutions, please click apply to submit your CV and cover letter that tells us what you could bring to and learn from this role. Our ideal candidate is someone who is always striving to improve themselves and the way that we operate at Elula.
Flexible work arrangements are available.
Application Deadline: 07/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $90,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
9 days ago
Report job"
114,Data Scientist,Genworth,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Summary
The Advanced Analytics team is responsible for utilising mathematics and machine learning methodologies to solve business problems, explore new opportunities and generate insights in collaboration with business units. Team members are data scientists of varying experience with knowledge in one or more domain areas of data science, all of whom have a passion for using empirical research to solve complex problems and an ability to translate analytical insights into actionable recommendations for the business.
Responsibilities
The main responsibilities include:
Champion the use of advanced analytics across the organisation through knowledge sharing and socialisation of advanced analytics techniques;
Adopt an iterative approach to initiatives, developing prototype solutions in Proof of Concepts (POCs) to test hypotheses, and embracing a fail-fast experimentation approach to solving complex problems;
Develop predictive models using Generalised Linear Models, Markov chains and other advanced algorithms such as decision trees, random forests and neural networks;
Utlise mathematical, statistical and machine learning techniques to solve business problems, explore new opportunities and generate insights from data;
Become AWS Cloud Solution Architect certified and take responsibility for progressing the advanced analytics platform on AWS;
Deployment of real-time statistical models and machine learning algorithms into a production operational environment using containerization;
Leverage business and data knowledge to proactively pitch and discuss new ideas for generating data-driven insights with stakeholders and team members;
Involvement in all phases of the solution lifecycle including ideation, problem formulation, analysis, feature selection, model development, testing, documentation, deployment, presentation and story-telling of results and translation of insights into actionable recommendations for the business;
Communicate regularly and effectively with stakeholders throughout the entire solution lifecycle;
Ensure all development follows the established advanced analytics standards, including Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), model governance policies and audit requirements;
Adhere to the compliance obligations relevant to the position; perform duties in an ethical, lawful and safe manner; undertake training as directed by the Compliance Leader; report and escalate compliance concerns, issues and failures; and disclose potential conflicts of interest.
Most Frequent Contacts
The Advanced Analytics team is an enterprise function, providing mathematical and machine learning expertise to solve business problems collaboratively with the following business units:
Finance & Actuarial;
Risk;
Operations;
Information Technology (IT);
Commercial.
This role will communicate regularly with stakeholders from these business units throughout initiatives and proactively engage in discussions to pitch new ideas for insights.
Qualifications – Required
Degree in Data Science/Mathematics/Statistics or equivalent;
3+ years in a data science role using at least one analytical software such as R, Python or SAS;
Passion for using mathematics to solve complex business problems;
Knowledge of foundational statistical analysis such as sampling, distributions, feature selection techniques and significance testing;
Experience in a previous role of fitting at least one of Generalied Linear Models (GLMs), decision trees, random forests or neural networks;
Ability to manipulate and analyse complex, high volume, high dimensionality data from varying sources;
Excellent communication and stakeholder management skills;
Clear report writing and presentation skills with an ability to communicate complex ideas in a creative, understandable manner that engages senior management;
Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills.
Qualifications - Preferred
Experience of writing SQL queries to extract/interrogate relational databases;
Experience in using AWS Cloud machine learning services – AWS Cloud Solution Architect certification would be advantageous;
Understanding of data warehousing concepts and methodologies;
Knowledge of deploying statistical models and machine learning algorithms into a production operational environment or AWS Sagemaker using containerization;
Ability to develop visualisations using Tableau software;
Experience from a previous role in the insurance industry;
Econometric and/or housing and mortgage market knowledge.
27 days ago
Report job"
115,"Professional, Data Scientist",CoreLogic,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job Summary
Join the team that powers the global real estate economy - CoreLogic is an innovative, future focused company whose vision is to deliver unique property-level insights that power the global real estate economy.
We are a $1.95 billion in sales company with more than 6,000 employees globally serving the financial services and insurance industries. We are evolving at a rapid pace and the clients we serve are challenged from every direction, which means we are growing and innovating to help drive their success. Working together, and differentiated by our superior data, analytics and data-enabled solutions, we empower our clients to make smarter business decisions through data-driven insights. We take initiative, are fully accountable, build respect and trust, make transparency a must—and engage, include and collaborate at every turn.
We take pride in our work and believe in cultivating a work environment that supports and values our greatest asset: our talented employees.
Job Description:
The Analytics Data Scientist/Engineer will contribute to the growth and success of CoreLogic business by supporting the Data and Analytics business unit contribution to business solutions and decisions for both internal teams and external clients.
The Analytics Data Scientist/Engineer will develop or build solutions which may consist of (but are not limited to), batch computing, APIs - which are stand alone or support the wider Data and Analytics team environments, data transformation, extraction, enhancements, reporting and analytical insights. In some instances, the Analytics Data Engineer will also help deliver the solution as part of a greater project team.
Job Qualification:
Key Responsibilities of the role
Creation of solutions using AWS services, Python and SQL to enable the effective collection, cleansing, loading, querying and reporting of large data sets
Support & monitoring of existing ETL processes, batch computing (ML) processes and APIs
Ensure documentation of all data processes and assets is kept up to date and is coherent
Give support to internal and external customers integrating with our products
Provide thought leadership on new engineering technologies and their application in analytics
Key Requirements
To be successful in this role the key competencies required include:
Capability to logically select the optimal solution when presented with multiple options, examine situations and test multiple outcomes.
Ability to effectively explain design solutions, business rules and data interactions
Experience in a fast-paced, software or data driven commercial environment
Understanding of commonly used architectural frameworks
Understanding and analysing of datasets and how these datasets interact with solutions architecture
Experience in presenting and explaining complex solutions to a business audience
Strong technical skills in cloud based technologies/architectures
Ability to work well as part of a team
Experience and Education Required
Bachelors (or higher) degree in computing, mathematics or statistics related disciplines
Advanced knowledge of SQL and ETL concepts
Minimum of 2 year commercial experience using relevant software tools, e.g. Python, SQL or R in a Linux environment
Comfortable working in Linux and Unix environments
Experience with AWS or equivalent other cloud environments - any or all of EC2, S3, RDS, Athena, Dynamo DB, AWS lambda, API Gateway
Experience in API development, server less architectures, containerization & CI/CD
CoreLogic's Diversity Commitment:
CoreLogic is fully committed to employing a diverse workforce and creating an inclusive work environment that embraces everyone’s unique contributions, experiences and values. We offer an empowered work environment that encourages creativity, initiative and professional growth and provides a competitive salary and benefits package. We are better together when we support and recognize our differences.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability:
CoreLogic is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer committed to attracting and retaining the best-qualified people available, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability or status as a veteran of the Armed Forces, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law. CoreLogic maintains a Drug-Free Workplace.
Please apply on our website for consideration.
Privacy Policy - http://www.corelogic.com/privacy.aspx
Connect with us on social media! Click on the quicklinks below to find out more about our company and associates.
Today
Report job"
116,Position – Data Scientist,Robonomics AI,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Location – Sydney and Digital / Remote
Experience – Minimum 8 years
We are looking for a candidate with good command over R / Python and in-depth knowledge and experience in Machine Learning, deep learning methods, algorithm design, analysis, development, and performance improvement. Strong understanding of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering, classification, regression techniques, recommendation (collaborative filtering) algorithms and Time series analysis.

We are eager to hear from you if you have one of the below mentioned skills. Send us your resume at careers@robonomics.ai
2 days ago
Report job"
117,Data Scientist Consultant,The Future Society,Not shown,Remote,"The Future Society is an independent 501(c)(3) nonprofit think-and-do tank. We advance the global governance of artificial intelligence (AI) and other emerging technologies for the benefit of humanity. We help society govern AI, seizing the opportunities it presents while mitigating its risks. The Future Society is adding an element of applied AI research to its agenda, starting by looking into how AI can be used for reading and benchmarking businesses’ statements on Modern Slavery. We are looking for one Data Scientist to join our team and support our Project AIMS (AI against Modern Slavery).
Years after the adoption and implementation of the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act in 2010 and the UK Modern Slavery Act (MSA) in 2015, little is known about businesses’ compliance and what they have been reporting. It is imperative to innovate the process of report analysis in order to boost compliance and help combat Modern Slavery. We are looking into automating the analysis and benchmarking of existing statements.
In April 2020, The Future Society launched Project AIMS in partnership with Walk Free. Project AIMS builds upon the BHRRC Modern Slavery Registry to develop an AI algorithm to ‘read’ the statements produced by companies under the Modern Slavery Act. This algorithm will use metrics designed by Walk Free in line with the UK Government guidance. The new tool will be integrated with the WikiRate platform to enable ongoing human verification of the automated data collection. For more details see our GitHub.
Duration: To be determined
Location: Remote-based, flexible location, UTC+ preferred, please apply even if outside of Australia
Application deadline: February 19th or until filled (please apply at earliest convenience)
Starting date: March 1st or when position filled
Employment Type: Full time, paid.
Seniority level: Min 3-5 years experience
Recruitment process: Fill in the following form: https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSfLXa_J9ermuz4_66QmO_idhMZMq3LskjKtbF-nOVvVTF6NCg/viewform?usp=sf_link
If you are pre-selected, this stage will be followed by a technical test and three interviews with our team.
1. Tasks
Coordinate with TFS staff, partners, and advisors in designing the project’s technical structure
Design and set the short and long term steps for the project in collaboration with the TFS staff, partners, and advisors
Monitor and support the meeting of the project’s deliverable
Lead and implement the data science and engineering requirements of the project
Design and implement the data pipeline for the project
Research, design and deploy machine learning models for the metrics, in collaboration with TFS advisors
Assist in the design and implementation of the integration process of the Project AIMS’ tool with the WikiRate platform
Delegate tasks to junior data scientists to realize the successful completion of the project
Monitor the performance of junior data scientists and provide them with practical guidance, as needed
Write clear and concise text reports summarising progress and results for both technical and non-technical audiences
Keep clear documentation of the project and contribute to the writing of the Project Handbook and publications
Support and participate in relevant events
2. Required skills & traits
Bachelors or Advanced degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or similar
Extensive experience as a Data Scientist (Minimum 3-5 years)
Demonstrable history of devising and overseeing data-centered projects
Proficiency in Python
Proficiency in English
Experience working with Docker Containers
Experience with deploying ML and DL models
Experience in designing and building APIs
Hands-on experience with one of the major cloud platforms (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Competent in machine learning/deep learning principles and techniques, especially NLP
Able to use standard collaboration tools such as Git
Ability to relay insights in layman’s terms, such that these can be used to write the Project Handbook as well as inform business decisions
Ability to supervise and mentor junior data scientists
Capacity to foster a collaborative, stimulating work environment that frequently harnesses teamwork
Compliance with prevailing ethical standards
Ability to work independently
Detail-oriented, organized, conscientious, diligent
3. Bonus skills & traits (not required)
General software engineering knowledge and skills
Experience working in small organizations, similar to The Future Society
Any extra Computer Science, Data Science, and Machine learning (ML) experience and skills
Web scraping
In-depth understanding of SQL
Great team spirit
4. What you can get from this role
Help eradicate modern slavery
Lead the technical development of an internationally recognized ‘AI for Good’ project
Directly shape AI developments, leading the development of an AI solution for something that does not exist yet
Help in automating manual and time-consuming work
Take part in a great data challenge & opportunity
Be part of an agile, small, global team
Interact with a high-level global network of experts in AI and leaders in AI policy, including international organizations such as the World Bank and UNESCO, AI Labs such as Mila, Australian Institute of Machine Learning, or scientists from BNP Paribas or namR, etc.
Work with geographic flexibility
Gain professional development & networking opportunity
Gain experience working in a dynamic, diverse, growing, and international think-tank that participates in leading AI policy events around the world
The Future Society is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, age, membership in an employee organization, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.
Application Deadline: 19/02/2021
Expected Start Date: 01/03/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract
Schedule:
Flexible hours
Experience:
Data Science: 3 years (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work Remotely:
Yes
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Remote interview process
6 days ago
Report job"
118,Data Scientist,Cover Genius,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Company

Cover Genius are a global Insurtech disruptor. We distribute insurance products to the largest e-commerce sites globally via a B2B platform. Our first product to market, RentalCover.com, has been an outstanding B2B and B2C success within the travel vertical. Following this success we released XCover, a multi-line distribution platform for global eCommerce partners. We’re winning awards all over the place for the work our team (read family) are doing towards tackling a previously un-tacklable industry.

Our People are
Bold, Authentic, Purposeful and Inspired

Our People are not
Perfect, Traditional, Complacent or Cautious

What are we looking for?

A Data Scientist (pricing and recommendation) to help us take our BrightWrite product to the next level. BrightWrite is the brain behind all CoverGenius' products, it is the powerhouse behind our experimentations, pricing optimisations and product recommendations. BrightWrite is used both internally and by our external partners.

As a Data Scientist, you should be comfortable talking about probability distributions, you ""probably"" have a strong opinion on the Frequentists vs. Bayesian debate. You have a few years of experience working with Machine Learning systems and understand the ins and outs of the algorithm (not just how to use the tools). You will use SQL to find insights from our dataset and form hypotheses as well as design and explore different algorithms and pricing strategies to better optimise yield.

Want to know more about our tech stack? Check out what we have adopted, are trialling and assessing.
What the ideal profile looks like
Practical, hands-on experience with a variety of Machine Learning and statistical testing techniques
Master's or PhD in Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or other Quantitative fields
Production level experience with experiment design and A/B testing
5+ years of experience in manipulating data sets using Python & SQL and building statistical models
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product delivery
Great communication, be able to tailor explanations of statistical concepts to a variety of audiences
Quick learner, welcomes new challenges and is not afraid to push the boundaries.

Nice to have
Revenue Management methods in real applications
Deep knowledge of data warehousing and running ETL
Experience with Recommender systems
Experience with Deep Reinforcement learning
Why Cover Genius?

Cover Genius not only cares about being the best in our industry, we care about our team. We’re a business that understands life can be fluid and so we flex to ensure we provide the environment to suit that. What does that mean?

Flexible Work Environment - we are outcome focussed and understand that for our people to perform at their best flexibility is critical. Soon after the declaration of the COVID-19 global pandemic the entire CG team was granted an extra 15 days of Wellness Leave to take throughout 2020.
Employee Stock Options - we want our people to share in our success, we reward them with ownership for their contribution in creating a world-class company.

Work with like-minded people who are passionate about both the work we're doing and giving back. Our CG Gives programs enables us to all become philanthropists through our peer recognition and rewards system.
Social Initiatives - pictures speak a thousand words!

Sound interesting? If you think you have the best composition of the above, send us your resume and let's chat!
25 days ago
Report job"
119,Machine Learning Data Scientist,Susquehanna International Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Once in the team you will bring your machine learning expertise to bear on all aspects of the trade pipeline. You must have the ability to build models for high-frequency asset price prediction, to analyse the resulting trades, and to build models for better understanding of latency implications, etc. You must be able to explain clearly your ideas and results to the rest of the team.

In the role you will:

Contribute techniques from machine learning towards improved automated trading systems.
Work with traders, quants, software developers in a highly focused team building, deploying and improving automated trading systems.
Research, implement, test, deploy and monitor proprietary systems trading across multiple markets and financial products. We work at all levels of the problem domain from market data handlers through trade monitoring.
Work with python systems to extract the data you will require; (Preferable C++ but not a must)

What we're looking for

Ph.D. in Computer Science/ Quantitative subject (statistics, math, engineering, physics).
Comfortable programming python in a Linux environment.
You have developed real-world ML applications and have a strong interest in finance and trading.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to liaise with senior/executive trading staff.
Ability to work autonomously and as a member of inter-departmental teams.

We don’t post salary ranges externally so any salary estimate you see listed on a third party website was not provided by SIG and may not be accurate.

SIG is not accepting unsolicited resumes from search firms. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at SIG via-email, the Internet or directly without a valid written search agreement will be deemed the sole property of SIG, and no fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by SIG.
30+ days ago
Report job"
120,Data Scientist,KBR,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Title:
Data Scientist
At KBR we are paving the way in how we do things. Creativity, collaboration and excellence is what KBR’s core is made up of. Does this resonate with you?
We value an inclusive and diverse work environment and are working together to build a culture that embraces each other’s unique strengths and experiences.
Our people are important to us and are what makes our business successful. Therefore, we realise it is important to nurture a culture of trust giving you the freedom to step up and take opportunities that challenge you and push your career to the next level. We will encourage you to work in a way that suits you and look forward to discussing what you need to be successful.
The Opportunity
KBR’s Infrastructure Services Business is reimagining how we deliver and transforming into a digitally enabled business. Our strategy focuses on data-driven solutions, using cloud-based data analytics to provide improved outcomes for our clients and our business. The Data Scientist will work within the Program Management Office working with complex data sets from multiple sources and providing specialist advice and best practice solutions to internal and external stakeholders. The role will use both technology and support from those with domain expertise to identify trends based on industry knowledge and contextual understanding. They will support the development of tools for the analysis of strategic data, allowing the business to interrogate and report on data trends that further improve its decision making and performance.
Who are you?
If you are a recent graduate with qualifications in Computer Science, Data Science or Information Systems with 2 to 7 years experience in a similar role we would love to hear from you. We are seeking a technically savvy candidate, with competency and enthusiasm in data management and mathematics, able to problem solve and create innovative analytical solutions. Previous experience setting up and working with portfolio management tools such as MS PPM would be advantageous as would competency with Power BI, DAX & M, and Azure/AWS Analytics. Inter-industry experience is often valuable, however relevance and applicability needs to be clearly communicated in your application.
About Us
KBR have been established for over 100 years and we pride ourselves on being an innovative and forward-thinking company with a reputation for delivering on some of the most challenging and complex engineering projects in the world.
So how do I apply?
If what you've read resonates with your values, experience and career aspiration then we want to hear from you! Just click apply and upload your resume and cover letter.
KBR values an inclusive and diverse work environment and we encourage candidates from all backgrounds to apply. Our hiring decisions are based on the key requirements of each role and candidates are selected based on their unique strengths and experiences.
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
26 days ago
Report job"
121,Graduate Data Scientist/Technologist,Mining Plus,Not shown,Perth WA,"GRADUATE DATA SCIENTIST/TECHNOLOGIST

Mining Plus are looking for a Graduate Data Scientist/Technologist to assist with research, innovation and technology activities across our global business on a 1-year fixed term contract. Previous mining experience is not required, however some prior knowledge and interest in the resources industry would be highly beneficial.

We here at Mining Plus think that Mining is Awesome! We have a passion for our great industry, the inspiring people within it and the amazing projects we get to work on. Our Vision is to develop a high-performance culture and be known as the best professional mining experts on the planet.

We are +100 full time expert mining professionals with 9 offices in 4 countries operating as One Team. Corporately we are a part of the Byrnecut Group who are specialist underground mining contractors employing more than 4,000 people globally.

Our customers range from services, exploration and mining companies on a global scale. Our core capability centres on Geology, Geotechnical Engineering and Mining Engineering, covering all hard rock mineral commodities across the project value chain which are enhanced by strategic alliances in other core disciplines.

The perfect scenario is for us to go from project conceptual stage (Define - Corporate), right through feasibility study work (Plan – Consulting) to project delivery (Operate – Contracting). We have a unique ability to integrate seamlessly with customer’s project teams to deliver results with the flexibility of working remotely or mobilising to site.

This role is focussed on research, innovation and technology and will include:
Focus on digitalisation and automation innovation trends in the mining industry
Data science projects with a focus on emerging Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Machine Learning (ML) applications in the minerals industry
Being a key interface with the emerging Mining Equipment, Technology and Services (METS) sector
Defining and maintaining a “living” METS Engagement Roadmap across the entire Mining Value Chain
Prospecting and identifying collaboration opportunities
Remaining up-to-date with emerging mining industry technology trends
Populating and managing an internal knowledge base and communicating this knowledge base to the Mining Plus Global Team
Assisting in building new capabilities around technology scoping, design, implementation, deployment and ongoing engagement
Assisting with proposals, projects and technical studies
Assisting with the weekly Innovation Showcase
Interfacing with METS start-ups and incubators

To be successful in this role you will need to demonstrate the following character traits:
Highly motivated and a self-starter to succeed in working autonomously
Excellent communication skills and open to cold-calling and networking with a large variety of stakeholders
Willingness to bring ideas and raise issues
Advanced analytical and problem-solving skills
Abstract thinking, outside the box, as well as critical thinking and the ability to challenge the status quo
Innovating for the future
Pride in “getting it right the first time”
25 days ago
Report job"
122,"Data Scientist, Scaled Sales",Uber,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About the Role
A deep, data driven understanding of our restaurant segment is core to enabling the scaled sales & success team to understand our opportunities for growth, deliver high impact, targeted campaigns, and understand our performance from restaurant acquisition to lifecycle & commercial restaurant success. The Scaled Sales Analytics Manager will provide this key analytical function to the team, owning our segmentation, identifying growth opportunities, and assessing our performance. You'll know where the opportunities for growth lie, and provide structured and insightful recommendations which direct & enable the team to empower merchant partners with maximum impact.
What You'll Do
Build, own and maintain a restaurant partner segmentation model, to enable a deep understanding of merchant partner performance
Frequently deep dive into specific metrics, eg churn, menu conversion performance or early lifecycle performance, to drive insights
Provide analysis & recommend segmentations for where opportunities for commercial growth exist in the scaled segment
Own in-depth commercial performance reporting to the Scaled team weekly. Provide recommendations to all team members for improvements
Tell stories with data - we'll be looking for strong recommendations from insights, not just reporting
Based on your recommendations and prioritised team KPIs, develop audiences for campaigns and complete cohorting to assist with campaign execution
Design & run experiments relating to all team activity
Track campaigns post-launch & provide campaign & channel level reporting for all activity undertaken by the scaled sales team
Back-up support for our automation roadmap, either assisting with delivery, or serving as a back-up escalation point for failures
Complete comparable dataset analysis to deliver deep, commercial insights internally and to partners
What You'll Need
This is an analytical role at its core, but the candidate will need to bring a strong commercial mind-set to ensure high impact
Bachelors degree (or higher) in Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, or other relevant quantitative fields
3+ years experience as a dedicated analyst / data scientist, delivering high impact insights & recommendations
Intermediate to advanced programming skills - well versed in Python/R, SQL at a minimum
Able to create data tables, write complex queries, with the ability to join tables etc in SQL
Experience in big data sets - developing & maintaining data pipelines and/or data integration solutions
Data delivery automation
Problem solving - the ability to seek out the root cause of issues and recommend structured solutions
Able to deliver aggregate data (eg by sector) and deliver commercially astute visualisations, showing a range of metrics from commercial performance, to product engagement, to churn propensity, and use data to drive recommendations
The ability to design campaign structures which use testing techniques (A|B testing or hold outs), execute the technical elements of campaigns, and deliver campaign wraps & learnings which assess performance against key campaign metrics, and recommend next steps to drive further impact
You're a superb team player. We're building something new here, and we will drive and share our successes as a team
About the Team
**
**With Uber Eats, we're building Uber's newest and fastest growing business, spanning 180+ cities across all six continents in two years. Today, Uber Eats is available across many parts of APAC including Mumbai, Tokyo, Hong Kong, Auckland, Sydney and Melbourne - and we're just getting started.
The Sales & Success team at Uber Eats is the growth engine responsible for the acquisition, retention, and development of restaurant partners, ensuring their ongoing success on the Uber Eats platform. The scaled team is newly formed, and will be building great restaurant experiences across the entire restaurant lifecycle, targeted at SMBs and utilising scaled channels.
At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 600 cities around the world.
We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have the curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.
At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 10,000 cities around the world.
We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have the curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.
5 days ago
Report job"
123,"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics",Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How will I help?
As the Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics in Group Strategy, your role is to support the team to make informed decisions through the application of data mining, predictive analytics and machine learning techniques. You will work closely with business partners to understand the business objectives and challenges to design analytical solutions to meet business goals.
What's in it for you?
You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years. You'll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working (open to candidates-based interstate). Along with competitive salary, you'll receive Westpac’s generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts.
What do I need?
We'd expect you to have a minimum of 3 years' experience in statistical modelling in a big data environment (Hadoop/Spark/R/Python) in Financial Services/Banking or similar industry and excellent proficiency in translating and analysing data. You will also be experienced with selecting features, building, and optimising classifiers using machine learning techniques and have worked with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes. Additionally you will need to have knowledge of a variety of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, statistical tests and proper usage, random forest, clustering, decision tree learning, deep learning text mining etc.) Tertiary education in the Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics disciplines will be highly regarded.
What is it like to work there?
We aim to provide one big, supportive team to help us reach our vision to become one of the world's great service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we're proud to have created a culture and work environment that values diversity and flexibility – and champions inclusion.
The health and wellbeing of our employees is our priority and we will ensure that physical distancing requirements are met in all our workplaces as long as required.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Branch Sales and Service
Primary Location : AU-NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : Crystal Chan
Posting Date : 08/02/2021, 4:26:45 PM
Closing Date : 23/02/2021, 6:59:00 AM
7 days ago
Report job"
124,2021/2022 Summer Internship Program - Analytics / Data Science,Atlassian,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Atlassian is continuing to hire with all interviewing and on-boarding done virtually due to COVID-19. All new and existing Atlassians will continue to work from home until it’s safe to return to our offices.

Does the thought of uncovering the next big 'aha!' insight excite you? Do you love solving tough problems, and flourish with variety? Come join Atlassian's growing Analytics & Data Science team for the summer and use your skills to influence millions of teams around the world!

Applicants must have Australian citizenship, Australian Permanent Residency or NZ citizenship at time of application.
In the Analytics and Data Science team, you'll have the opportunity to:
Play with our seriously large volume of data to discover insightful trends, and then collaborate with other Atlassians to turn your insights to actions, drive smarter product decisions and ultimately, delight our customers
Measure the impact our product strategy; designing and analysing experiments and product launches
Share your high-quality insights and recommendations to peers and leadership in order to influence or drive critical business decisions
Super-launch your career through our experienced analyst mentoring while gaining invaluable exposure to the role of analytics and data science at a fast growing global technology giant
On your first day, we'll expect you to:
Be able to commit to a 12 week full-time (38hrs / week) internship from late November 2021 until late February 2022). We may be able to flex on this slightly if your course timetable does not allow for a 12 week placement during this timeframe.
Be currently enrolled in a Bachelors, Masters, or PhD in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, mathematics, physics, econometrics, or computer science) and be graduating by January 2023
Have experience manipulating data using one of SQL, R, Python (or other languages)
Demonstrate the ability to translate business questions into technical solutions, and communicate analytical results broad audiences
Have a passion for collaborating with cross-functional team members, like engineers, product managers, designers and other analysts
More about Atlassian

Creating software that empowers everyone from small startups to the who’s who of tech is why we’re here. We build tools like Jira, Confluence, Bitbucket, and Trello to help teams across the world become more nimble, creative, and aligned—collaboration is the heart of every product we dream of at Atlassian. From Amsterdam and Austin, to Sydney and San Francisco, we’re looking for people who want to write the future and who believe that we can accomplish so much more together than apart. At Atlassian, we’re committed to an environment where everyone has the autonomy and freedom to thrive, as well as the support of like-minded colleagues who are motivated by a common goal to: Unleash the potential of every team.

Additional Information

We believe that the unique contributions of all Atlassians is the driver of our success. To make sure that our products and culture continue to incorporate everyone's perspectives and experience we never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Learn more about Atlassian’s culture, interviewing flow, and hiring process by checking out our Candidate Resource Hub.
Today
Report job"
125,Data Scientist,C3 AI,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"C3.ai, Inc. (NYSE:AI) is a leading provider of Enterprise AI software for accelerating digital transformation. C3 AI delivers a family of fully integrated products: C3 AI® Suite, an end-to-end platform for developing, deploying, and operating large-scale AI applications; C3 AI Applications, a portfolio of industry-specific SaaS AI applications; C3 AI CRM, a suite of industry-specific CRM applications designed for AI and machine learning; and C3 AI Ex Machina, a no-code AI solution to apply data science to everyday business problems. The core of the C3 AI offering is an open, model-driven AI architecture that dramatically simplifies data science and application development. Learn more at: www.c3.ai

In this capacity, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating IoT. In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning, AI, and specifically deep learning algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.
Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying deep learning algorithms on industrial IoT applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R.
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3 AI provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3 AI is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.
27 days ago
Report job"
126,Data Scientist - Senior,HAYS,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Data specialist with data science capabilities and experience within finance.

Your new company
This organisation is one of the largest and well known in the ANZ market; offering a fantastic opportunity for you to join the business and create change in their data process

Your new role
You will be working closely with the business to create and define strategy across automation, analytics and reporting. You will work closely with the business to drive actionable insights based on the data . Working closely with the development team and none technical stakeholders to develop data assets and reporting solutions within this area of the bank.

What you'll need to succeed
Experience in Programming languages such as C/ C++, R or Python
Experience with data visualization tools such as Power BI
Proven experience working at a senior level within data within the banking sector.
Ability to create and build business strategy from data insights
Proven experience updating process efficiencies using data science techniques and tools



What you'll get in return
The chance to build and progress your career working within a highly engaged an successful team whilst making a tangible difference to the data landscape of the bank

What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or call us now.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

LHS 297508 #2460313
27 days ago
Report job"
127,Cartrack SG - Data Scientist (Maintenance),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Data Scientist (Maintenance)
Job description
Cartrack is looking for passionate data science and engineering candidates that can join a growing team that is responsible for the intelligence and efficiency solution provision to over a million subscribers, many of whom are large fleets. We are in the midst of creating revolutionary platforms that will change the way that people interact with their vehicles.
You will have the opportunity to work with the very brightest global subject matter experts that are transforming the automotive industry across Fleet Management, Asset Management and Insurance Telematics solutions.
Get to know the role:
Conceptualize and develop machine and deep learning models to model usage of vehicle and asset components as well as energy consumption.
Developing prediction models for component failure, with little to no prior information, imputing all the necessary requirements from other sensors.
Develop differentiated capabilities in spatial and temporal data management (e.g. Location Intelligence, Mobile data analytics, spatial data cleaning, visualisation and interactive queries) to establish competitive edge.
Test and put algorithms into a production ready state the models that have been developed.
Constructing solution concepts from insights using familiar or unfamiliar data sources or complete or partial data.
The day-to-day activities:
Deep dive into big data to conduct advanced statistical analyses
Signal Processing
Design and build machine learning and optimisation algorithms efficiently
Integrate, simulate and test impact of algorithms and features on the overall system
Develop and execute necessary analyses, simulations or A/B tests to validate models and identify improvement opportunities
Store, retrieve and visualise results in a manner that facilitates required analyses
Effectively conceptualize analyses to business/product stakeholders
Requirements
Essential:
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience in one or more of the following: Developing machine learning models for component longevity in an machinery environment; Signal processing and time series analysis; Developing large-scale complex stochastic-event simulation models
Ph.D., Master’s or an outstanding Bachelors in Computer Science, Electrical/Computer Engineering, Mathematics/Statistics, Operations Research, Industrial & Systems Engineering, or related technical disciplines.
Strong fundamentals in at least one of the following: ML, optimization or simulation, signal processing with familiarity of the others.
Proficient in statistical programming in languages such as Python and R; and strong working knowledge in RDBMS such as PostgresQL or NoSQL
Efficient and detail-oriented time manager who thrives in a dynamic and fast-paced working environment
Desired
Experience in working with vehicle imagery.
Familiar with Linux/Unix and shell scripting, experience in cloud computing is a plus.
30+ days ago
Report job"
128,CarTrack SG - Data Scientist/Engineer (NLP and Chatbot),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Data Scientist/Engineer (NLP and Chatbot)
Job description
Cartrack is looking for passionate data science and engineering candidates that can join a growing team that is responsible for the intelligence and efficiency solution provision to over a million subscribers, many of whom are large fleets. We are in the midst of creating revolutionary platforms that will change the way that people interact with their vehicles.
You will have the opportunity to work with the very brightest global subject matter experts that are transforming the automotive industry across Fleet Management, Asset Management and Insurance Telematics solutions.
Get to know the role:
Conceptualise and develop machine/Deep learning models to score calls between internal and external parties. For example, scoring sale call Centre agents for a variety of metrics.
Creation of call scripts for Sale Agents.
Development of Chat Bot technology.
Test and put algorithms into a production ready state.
Constructing solution concepts from insights using familiar or unfamiliar data sources or complete or partial data.
The day-to-day activities can include:
Speech to text conversion analysis
Developing signals for predictive lead management dialer, i.e. connecting the right lead to agent
Developing chat bot technology
Developing optimization algorithms determine optimal stopping times for leads.
Creating real time sales scripts.
Design and build machine/Deep learning and optimization algorithms efficiently
Integrate, simulate and test impact of algorithms and features on the overall system
Develop and execute necessary analyses, simulations or A/B tests to validate models and identify improvement opportunities
Store, retrieve and visualise results in a manner that facilitates required analyses
Effectively conceptualize analyses to business/product stakeholders
Requirements
Essential:
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience in one or more of the following: Developing machine/deep learning models for speech recognition and characterization; Developing Chat Bot technology
Ph.D., Master’s or an outstanding Bachelors in Computer Science, Electrical/Computer Engineering, Mathematics/Statistics, Operations Research, Industrial & Systems Engineering, or related technical disciplines.
Strong fundamentals in at least one of the following: ML, optimisation or simulation, with familiarity of the others.
Proficient in statistical programming in languages such as Python and R; and strong working knowledge in RDBMS such as PostgresQL or NoSQL
Strong programming skills in Java and Scala, experience in functional programming is preferred.
Self-motivated and independent learner who is willing to share knowledge with the team.
Efficient and detail-oriented time manager who thrives in a dynamic and fast-paced working environment
Desired
Experience in working with lead management and call centres
Familiar with Linux/Unix and shell scripting, experience in cloud computing is a plus.
30+ days ago
Report job"
129,Senior Data Scientist,Annalect,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Senior Data Scientist
Annalect is a global data, technology, and analytics consultancy, with offices based in Sydney, Melbourne, Brisbane and major global hubs. We create solutions across data, measurement, analytics, visualisation, and marketing technology to maximise the effectiveness of media and our client's media ROI.
When we launched Annalect globally in 2011, we dedicated ourselves to transforming the effects of data and analytics on media. Now we have learned to transform the entire marketing process.
Annalect is part of the Omnicom Media Group, and services hundreds of clients across OMD, PHD, Hearts & Science, Resolution Media, Foundation, and OMG United, in addition to working on our own portfolio of direct clients
Our work with PHD won B&T's 2019 award for Best Media Campaign for Children's Panadol, and our work with OMD won B&T's 2019 award for Data Driven Marketing for McDonald's Monopoly.
The role
As a Senior Data Scientist in the marketing science team, you will be responsible for helping some of Omnicom's leading clients make informed data driven marketing decisions.
Specifically, you will analyse large amounts of data to determine how customers interact with our clients' advertising across different channels and devices.
Your focus will be to develop custom attribution and predictive models for both online and offline media. Using these models, you will deliver actionable insights that will drive value to our clients and improve their ROI.
This role will allow you refine your work across a number of clients internally and externally. You will be responsible for evangelising the product across the agencies within Omnicom and really own the process that you will be responsible for creating.
Responsibilities
Your role will be to apply your broad skillset across data and analytics to understand business problems, create insights and envisage practical solutions in areas such as media measurement and customer insights
You will work
Build bespoke digital attribution models and improve our digital attribution product offering
Provide business solutions and optimisation through various statistical and quantitative methods.
Provide statistical models to support predictive analytics and deliver non-technical presentations to all levels of the business as well as technical documentation to the wider team.
Derive insights from data and communicate those insights to a non-technical audience through presentations and documentation
Build Annalect's experimentation/predictive modelling ecosystem
Build scalable backend solutions for automation of data processing
Analyse and mash-up massive amounts of data to mine useful business insights
What you'll need
A strong background in data science, analytics, or data engineering
Proficiency and experience in statistical modelling and machine learning techniques (feature engineering, regression, classification, segmentation, cross validation, bootstrapping, Bayesian techniques etc.)
A high level of proficiency with at least one programming languages used in data science (R/Python/SAS/Scala/MATLAB).
Excellent communication skills - being able to both interpret and convey information in a clear, concise way with people from technical and non-technical background and use data to tell a story
Strong understanding of media, and media data
Ability to work in a fast-paced growth environment
Nice to haves
Previous experience with Digital Attribution, Marketing Mix Modelling or Econometrics for a media related industry is highly desirable
Understanding of media technology (ad-servers, DMPs)
Experience with visualisation and dashboarding software (Tableau, Power BI)
Proficiency in dealing with large datasets (data mining etc.)
Proficiency with AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Redshift or other big data platforms
Benefits
Award winning culture that encourages innovation
Work within a diverse team, making positive & meaningful contributions.
Access to top tier clients and complex business challenges
Continuous development through our mixed learning approach.
Giving Back Opportunities
Pet-friendly oﬃce
Ski trips and much, much more!
For more information on this role or to start a conversation about your future, please don't hesitate to reach out directly at fraser.rix@omnicommediagroup.com
Omnicom Media Group
8 days ago
Report job"
130,Data Scientist,Saluda Medical,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead analysis projects to answer research or clinical questions based on patient and device-collected data. We need someone who can build up our data storage and processing infrastructure and uplift the information available across our business.

About you
You are someone with exceptional research and statistical skills. You are passionate about finding gems in mountains of neural responses and patient data. You know how to drive pragmatic therapy and product innovations that improve patient outcomes in a commercial environment. You enjoy the prospect of working for a company experiencing rapid growth, and you are comfortable with working in a dynamic changing environement.
About Saluda Medical
We are a medical device company developing advanced neuromodulation systems for the next generation of implantable stimulation devices. We are a cutting edge, progressive Australian based company with offices and employees based in Europe and the USA. We are at the forefront of spinal cord stimulation technologies for the management of chronic pain.

Our team is made up of world-class engineers, clinicians and seasoned professionals with experience in bringing medical technologies to life.

About the role
Liaise with Analytics, Engineering and Clinical teams to propose, plan, execute and communicate hypothesis-driven analytics projects leveraging Saluda’s massive amount of raw data.
Provide analytics insights and requirements towards potential therapeutic improvements, or product and service innovation.
Develop, deploy and maintain software code and pipelines for data mining and analysis.
Contribute to design, implementation and use of database / cloud storage platforms and visualisation tools for patient data, statistics and other information for reporting, trending and troubleshooting.
Supporting business needs for analysis and data visualisation as required.
Preparation of technical and research reports as required.
Performs duties in compliance with Saluda Medical’s Management System comprising the company policies regarding health, safety and environmental compliance.

Essential Requirements
At minimum, a technical bachelor’s degree in Biomedical Engineering/Biological Sciences/Software/Electrical/Mathematics or related discipline. Master’s degree or PhD highly regarded.
3+ years of commercial analytics or research experience.
A strong background in statistical and data mining methods, and a demonstrated ability to use them to answer research questions and drive outcomes. Strong proficiency in Python and SQL preferred.
Experience developing, and ideally deploying, analytics pipelines and/or software.
Good knowledge of data visualisation and dashboarding tools.
Experience working on a cloud-based data platform such as AWS, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure.
Some background in a relevant biological field such as biological signals / neuroscience / neurophysiology / clinical science.
Attention to detail balanced with pragmatism and project management skills to find practical and innovative solutions to complex and ambiguous problems.
Ability to produce top quality work in a team or with minimum supervision.
Demonstrated ability to communicate technical concepts to technical, business and lay audiences.
Insatiably curious and eager to continually develop new skills.

Desirable Requirements
Experience designing,managing and using databases and big data platforms and tools. Data engineering skills highly regarded.
Commercial experience using machine learning / predictive modelling techniques.
Experience in software architecture development and software design.
Experience with, and commitment to, systems development in a quality controlled environment.
Experience in medical device design, development and regulatory requirements.

You must have the legal right to work unrestricted in Australia, no visa or sponsorship support is available for this role.

Candidates may respond to this posting; we respectfully ask for no agency approaches.
30+ days ago
Report job"
131,Cartrack SG - Data Scientist/Engineer (Routing),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Data Scientist/Engineer (Routing)
Job description
Cartrack is looking for passionate data science and engineering candidates that can join a growing team that is responsible for the intelligence and efficiency solution provision to over a million subscribers, many of whom are large fleets. We are in the midst of creating revolutionary platforms that will change the way that people interact with their vehicles.
You will have the opportunity to work with the very brightest global subject matter experts that are transforming the automotive industry across Fleet Management, Asset Management and Insurance Telematics solutions.
Get to know the role:
Conceptualize and develop real time models determining estimated time of arrivals, estimated cost of trip, etc given stochastic input features.
Develop and implement optimisation algorithms for route management, given stochastic factor inputs.
Test and put algorithms into a production ready state.
Constructing solution concepts from insights using familiar or unfamiliar data sources or complete or partial data.
The day-to-day activities:
Developing route optimization algorithms given stochastic inputs, such as traffic and weather densities, and constraints, such as vehicle capacity; road restrictions; way points; e.t.c.
Deep dive into big data to conduct advanced data science models to predict certain metrics such as ETA.
Design and build machine learning and optimization algorithms efficiently
Integrate, simulate and test impact of algorithms and features on the overall system
Requirements
Essential:
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience in one or more of the following: Developing route optimization algorithms and software; Developing optimization algorithms to solve large-scale network flow/combinatorial/ stochastic problems.; Developing large-scale complex discrete-event/agent-based simulation models.
Ph.D., Master’s or an outstanding Bachelors in Operations Research, Computer Science, Electrical/Computer Engineering, Mathematics/Statistics, Industrial & Systems Engineering, or related technical disciplines.
Strong fundamentals in optimization with familiarity of the following: ML, simulation.
Proficient in statistical programming in languages such as Python and R; and strong working knowledge in RDBMS such as PostgresQL or NoSQL
Strong programming skills in Java and Scala, experience in functional programming is preferred.
Self-motivated and independent learner who is willing to share knowledge with the team.
Efficient and detail-oriented time manager who thrives in a dynamic and fast-paced working environment
Desired
Experience in working with mobility
Experience with PG Routing
Experience in parallel programming and multithreading
Familiar with Linux/Unix and shell scripting, experience in cloud computing is a plus.
30+ days ago
Report job"
132,Senior Data Scientist,New South Wales Institute of Sport,Not shown,Sydney Olympic Park NSW,"NSWIS aspires to be a leader in sport intelligence and technology and is offering an exciting opportunity to fill a Senior Data Scientist role until 31 December 2024.
The role will provide data science services and expertise to internal and external client groups by executing high value data science initiatives. A strong focus will be continuing to build and increase the data analytics capability within NSWIS and lead projects focused on organisational and athlete performance.
This role will play a significant part in the ongoing execution and development of the NSWIS data science road map ensuring NSWIS develops an international reputation as a progressive leader and provides our athletes with access to world class performance environments and services. Specifically, the role will deliver technical excellence in statistics and various data sources, platforms and software and deliver solution and insights.
This is a fulltime position with an immediate start, offering a competitive salary which will be negotiable based on the successful candidates experience and demonstrated competency.
This is an identified position requiring a Working with Children Check.
For further information about the role and the key accountabilities please see the .
Role Description

About you
You will have:
Experience in working in a challenging high-performance environment (preferably sport), and demonstrated capability to proficiently deliver solutions and insights.
Demonstrated ability to collaborate with a variety of stakeholders to ensure data science initiatives and projects align with NSWIS strategic objectives and business planning. This includes exploring data, developing code bases, building appropriate models, and discovering insights from findings to impact athlete and organisational performance.
Provide thought and expertise leadership to other members of the data science team, as well as internal and external client groups, to impact performance, encourage innovation, and drive evidence-based decision making.
Lead the provision and maintenance of adequate infrastructure and mechanisms for accurate reporting against selected key business metrics.
Establish, implement and maintain quality data capture, storage, analysis mechanisms, ensuring data is increasingly harvested and used in a meaningful way to inform decision making.
Support ongoing data stewardship including – ensuring the integrity and secruity of all data science systems and platforms and, by partnering with the NSWIS Information Technology team to ensure that a best practice approach is taken in relation to data governance and handling.
In conjunction with the Head of Sport Intelligence and Technology, provide mentorship to sport scientists on the use and implementation of appropriate data science systems, coding, models, and platforms to achieve daily training environment sport program objectives.
Increase operational efficiency and the reliability of data, ensuring that data collection is automated and centralised where possible.
When appropriate, lead and contribute to national high-performance data science/technology and innovation projects.

About us
The NSW Institute of Sport [NSWIS] is a high-performance sporting organisation that supports Australian athletes to become world’s best. We reach all regions of NSW with an Olympic and Paralympic training facility based at Sydney Olympic Park and high-performance hubs across NSW that provide world class daily training environments for our athletes and coaches. Our experts work in collaboration with partners within the national sporting system to create and deliver high performance support services and environments to prepare athletes and coaches for international competition.

Essential Requirements
University level qualifications in one of the following areas: Data Science, Mathematics, Information Technology, Epidemiology (with advanced data analysis), or Biostatistics
Fluent programming skills (Python, R, Java etc.)
Level 1 Anti-Doping Certificate
Working with Children Check
Current driver’s license

Applying for the role
To apply for this role please submit:
A cover letter outlining how you meet the requirements and focus capabilities for the role (maximum 1 page)
An up-to-date CV outlining experience, qualifications, and achievements (please include at least two referees)
A response to the pre-screening questions below
In no more than two pages please answer the below questions:
Provide a recent example of where you have undertaken data analysis to successfully inform organisational decision making by seamlessly combining disparate data sources.
Provide an example of when you have used regularly captured data (e.g., physical preparation and monitoring data) to establish meaningful databasing and longitudinal reporting to support performance outcomes.
If you would like to enquire about the role please contact Kirsten Thomson, Director, Corporate and Communications on 9763 0222.
To apply complete your application via the https://iworkfor.nsw.gov.au/ by midnight 21 February 2021. Only those applications which address the selection criteria and focus capabilities will be considered by the Selection Panel. Anticipated interviews will be conducted the week beginning 1st March 2021.
For more information about the NSW Institute of Sport please visit www.nswis.com.au.

Commitment to Diversity
The NSW Institute of Sport is committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workforce which reflects our community, sport partners and athletes. We encourage applications from suitable candidates including; of all ages, genders, Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, culturally and linguistically diverse groups, veterans, refugees, LGBTIQ+ community and people with disability.
10 days ago
Report job"
133,Applied Data Scientist,Reece Group,Not shown,Burwood VIC,"About the role
We're in a phase of growth – join our team and make a difference. You'll be more than ""just a number"". You'll be helping to position a multi-billion-dollar, multinational company for the future.
The Data & AI Team is a specialist practice within reecetech. Our mandate is to weave intelligent, responsible, and consistent data use to improve our customers and people's lives every day. We believe realising value from data requires multidisciplinary teams of data practitioners and a collaborative culture that truly seeks to embed and understand Reece's business and customers.
Applied Data Scientists bring a mix of technical skills to solve customer and business problems by using data. Adept at translating real-world problems into technical domains, they apply quantitative methods and emerging technologies to turn data into insight and value. As a valued member of our Applied Data Science function, the role is critical to developing and commercialising new analytical solutions, products, and services.
This is a newly created role. You will work with the Head of Data & AI and senior founding team in helping establish the function while working across a strategic, diverse portfolio. Our in-flight work programs include building extensible analytical data platforms, developing data products and services, and delivering best practice advisory. As part of multidisciplinary delivery teams, you will:
Work closely with the Principal, Applied Data Science in helping shape the Applied Data Science roadmap
Deliver on aspects of Data Science solutions, working on practising consistency and rigour in the application of quantitative methodologies to solving business problems
Contribute to Reece-wide Data & AI literacy, particularly around data and quantitative methods
Actively applying modern delivery frameworks that optimise our ability to deliver value
Collaboratively and actively participating in shaping Data Science coding standards to achieve a balance between modular, testable, reusable code while supporting flexibility and speed to value
Adopting a customer-centric mindset on all projects, upholding Reece's principles on using data responsibly
Assist with shaping the thinking on responsible and intelligent data use, particularly around best practice within Data Science.
Actively participate and engage in Reece's Data & AI community of practice
Spend time in our branches observing our staff, our customers, and understanding how our business works (all new starters will spend time serving customers in-branch as part of induction)
About You
You are a skilled, commercially astute analytical data professional. You recognise that the customer is at the heart of everything we do, and you thrive on making the lives of our customers and people better.
You appreciate a diverse environment with a flat hierarchy, a flexible workplace, logical and intuitive thinking styles, extrovert and introvert personalities.
You have sound technical expertise in machine learning or statistical learning methods and their applications, with experience with one or more of designing, implementing, training, evaluating, deploying and managing models (and analytical systems) at scale. Also, you:
Live out an ethos of authenticity, empathy, integrity, excellence and humility. We stand for a non-zero-sum culture, building each other up to achieve more than the sum of parts –– together.
Are tenacious, curious, bring a growth mindset and critical thinking to everything you do
Appreciate and embrace software engineering fundamentals and disciplines, including how to write modular, reusable and testable code
Are passionate and effective at contributing to ways of working, tooling, standards and core principles
Are experienced in programming languages such as Python, Scala, etc.
Are experienced in cloud technologies
Bring hands-on experience applying technical skills within a commercial setting with tangible outcomes
Can develop credibility with stakeholders and build trusted effective working relationships
Work collaboratively in multidisciplinary teams, with adopting sound delivery disciplines (e.g. leveraging Agile methodologies) to ensure successful execution
Demonstrate initiative staying up to date with advancements in Data Science and related disciplines, and proactively apply new learnings to improve problem-solving
Challenge established ways of doing business while influencing desired outcomes, prioritise competing business priorities, and meeting company vision and strategy
At reecetech and Reece Group, everyone is valued and recognised for their ability to collaborate, explore, experiment, reflect, learn, innovate, adjust, and share, to improve every day. If you want to work with great people in a supportive environment, put your career first – apply today! #LI_DNI
reecetech
reecetech is the technology division for the Reece Group. We're building a world-class engineering culture – designing and building products our customers and staff love, and solving hard problems using the latest technology.
We pride ourselves on being entrepreneurial, non-hierarchical, fast, and creating massive impact by powering the Reece Group.
We're proud to support our customers who provide essential services to keep the community safe, healthy, and well. Whether that's keeping the water running, the heating and cooling on, maintaining refrigeration, or supporting our infrastructure.
About Reece Group
The Reece Group is a purpose and values led organisation. With over 800 branches and 7,800 staff across Australia, New Zealand, and the US, the Group is a leading distributor of plumbing, waterworks, and HVAC-R products. We care about our customers, employees, and our community – we do this through The Reece Grant and our innovative CSR program, Reece Cares.
No agencies or unsolicited resumes
How can you build a career with Reece.
Reece is different. We're a successful company that doesn't like to make a fuss of our success. We're a big business that works hard to retain the great things from when we were a small business.
We value common sense as highly as a university degree. We encourage people to have a go and don't mind if they fail. We promote people based on performance, not age.
Reece is a place where people make a real difference. And that's the secret to our success - having the right people, with the right attitude in the right roles.
We're looking for the right people now. People who like people. People who like to talk but also like to listen. People who like to perform. People who can recognise an opportunity and seize it. People who are prepared to promote themselves.
Read on. You will quickly discover whether you might be the right person, and whether we might be the right place for your career.
If you like wild growth and working with happy, enthusiastic over-achievers, you'll enjoy your career with us!
8 days ago
Report job"
134,Lazada SG - Data Scientist (Campus Hiring),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Job Description
The Lazada Algorithm team is a young and enthusiastic team comprising of experienced data scientists and machine learning engineers. Leveraging data-driven insights and Alibaba's Research & Development platform, we provide intelligent recommendations and furnish business insights to tackle complex real-world business challenges.
As an Algorithm Engineer at Lazada, you will apply different techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, natural language processing and operational research to drive and equip Lazada with the right strategies to best position ourselves in the market and to enhance platform growth. You will work alongside various teams to understand their different strategies and requirements.
The ideal candidate will be very hands-on and will dive deep into the root causes of any issues and blockers. You will be and responsible for building algorithms specific to the domain that you will be assigned to.
1) Seller & Operation Business: including campaign product selection, pricing, product tagging, matching and recommendation, etc. to boost seller and platform growth.
2) Promotion Business: including the design, development and optimization of promotion scheme generation, promotion recommendation, promotion distribution, performance prediction and analysis.
3) Logistics Business: including smart routing, parcel volume prediction, manpower smart scheduling, and corresponding deep algorithm optimizations for first mile, last mile and long haul.

Other activities which you will be involved in include:
Keeping up to date with the state-of-the-art research and integrated applications on deep learning, recommendation, optimization, reinforcement learning, amongst others.
Continually improving algorithms to adapt to evolving business requirements, and ensuring high efficiency, scalability as well as good coding style.
Regular communication across teams/functions and updates to relevant stakeholders on progress of projects

Job Requirements
Graduated with PhD in Computer Science, Operations Research, Statistics, Mathematics, or equivalent fields.
Solid theoretical foundations in at least one of the following: machine learning, natural language processing, personalised search & recommendation, user/seller behaviour modelling, sales prediction, knowledge graph and representation, marketing algorithms or large-scale data analysis/platforms. Related project experiences in any of the above is a plus.
Fluent programming skills in at least one core programming language: SQL, Java or Python.
Demonstrate ability to generate new ideas and innovations
Good interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to describe the logic and implications of a complex model to stakeholders
30+ days ago
Report job"
135,Data Scientist - Digital Delta,KPMG,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Job no: 509783
Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: Canberra
Do you love solving complex problems, designing sophisticated solutions and building innovative technology?
Are you passionate about Digital Transformation?
Do you believe in creating powerful actionable insights from Data and Analytics?
Immerse yourself in our inclusive, diverse and supportive culture
KPMG is one of the most trusted and respected global professional services firms. Through depth of expertise, clarity of insight and strength of purpose we help our clients solve complex challenges, steer change, strengthen, transition and grow.
KPMG’s Digital Delta
We re-imagine and re-invent organisations to become world class digital enterprises using advanced technologies, data and human insights. We help organisations to embrace Digital Strategy, Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Cognitive, the Internet of Things (IoT), Data, Analytics & Modelling, Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI) and more.
We work with clients to:
Formulate strategies that re-imagine organisations
Harness innovation from the 4th industrial revolution
Actioning insights from trusted data to consistently and quickly make clear decisions
Build adaptive organisations
Thrive as a connected enterprise – front, middle and back office
Our Digital Delta team in Canberra work across multiple Government Departments and Agencies. Our engagements range from working with Services Australia and the Department of Health to deliver outcomes that benefit citizens of Australia through to working with Defence and National Security protecting Australia.
Government Departments have some of the most interesting and complex datasets along with some of the largest computing systems in Australia. Just like private industry Government is starting to use this data for analytics, legacy systems are being replaced with new cloud based technologies and paper forms and manual processed are being digitised – these are just some of the areas where our Digital Delta team has assisted our clients to solve problems that directly impact Australians.
This is how you’ll contribute:
We are looking for ambitious Data Scientists who are passionate about helping clients define bold ambitions and deliver on them. Joining our team will take you on a journey of personal and technical growth and provide the opportunity to inspire confidence and empower change.
As a Data Scientist you will design, develop and implement flexible and extensible analytic solutions that typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will work with business stakeholders on factual problem formation, data identification and deriving answers that can be operationalized to solve business issues.
Please note you should also be an Australian Citizen or have the ability to obtain a government security clearance.
The KPMG Difference
Our people are focused on creating a diverse and dynamic environment that embraces and values differences. We value the variety of unique experiences, qualities and characteristics our people possess and we share and learn from each other.
We are proud to be consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and for our achievements in LGBT+ workplace inclusion.
Our commitment to ‘Flexibility’ allows our people to manage the changing demands of work, personal or family life. Explore the links below to hear our people share their experience @ KPMG:
Flexibility empowers wellbeing
Flexibility enables contribution to the community
Flexibility inspires technology & innovation
Flexibility supports family

Make KPMG the clear choice for your career and be Extraordinary!

Advertised: 17 Aug 2020 AUS Eastern Standard Time
Applications close:
30+ days ago
Report job"
136,Data Scientist / Senior Analyst,Deloitte,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Date: 14-Jan-2021

Location:
Sydney, NSW, AU

Department:Description:
About our team

The A&A Analytic Solutions team is at the heart of the Audit & Assurance Digital Strategy across Deloitte Asia Pacific. Our team of data technologists (Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning / Deep Learning), designers, developers and management consultants coupled with our proprietary data platform powers the next generation offerings helping clients make better data-driven decisions. We're absolute data nerds and love working with numbers and large data sets (the more unstructured, the better). Data brings us together; our difference inspires creativity and our focus on culture is our adhesive!

We believe that success comes from fully understanding the impact of choices and using a data driven approach drives improved operational and strategic decision making. Our team brings diverse thinkers from multiple disciplines to work together in a dynamic, fast paced and creative environment. We thrive on challenges enabled by our diverse portfolio, promote curiosity and continuous learning, all whist providing a supportive and inclusive team culture.

What will your typical day look like?

Advising clients to help solve real-life business problems across diverse industries through use of data, cloud, analytics and AI technologies;
Performing “hands on” statistical and machine learning modelling, computations, and data engineering to deliver best-of-breed analytical solutions to meet the need of the problem space;
Aiding in solution development from design through to production;
Involvement in identifying trends and innovation in deep learning, machine learning and related technologies to inform the future development of solutions for our clients.

Enough about us let's talk about you. You’re someone with…

Strong track record in understanding business problems and implementing analytical solutions to solve them with extensive experience in explaining complex technical concepts in simple terms.
3 – 5 years relevant work experience with data analytics, feature engineering and model development using market leading machine learning and deep learning techniques. Client facing experience will be strongly valued.
Expertise in writing production code using Python, in particular Pytorch and Tensorflow.
Fluency in data querying and manipulation using cloud-based SQL and NoSQL database technologies.
Minimum of BA/BSc degree in a quantitative degree such as Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Epidemiology, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field. Advanced degree (MA/MSc, equivalent or higher) is an advantage.
Foundational understanding of statistical techniques like (generalised)linear regression, statistical inference, clustering, time series, etc
Experience in utilising modern MLOps/DevOps approaches to manage and deploy models at scale on Azure (preferred), AWS or GCP.
Ideally, experience or a strong interest in developing Cognitive analytics solutions including NLP, Voice and Video Analytics.
Experience with Big Data analytics, including Hadoop, Spark, graph analytics would be desirable..
Additional experience with other programming languages is ideal such as Scala, R, Julia, or other programming language for big data analysis would be valued.
Ideally experience in building ML solutions within the Finance Function on at least one of the following industries - Government, Financial Services, Insurance, and Consumer and Industrial Products.

Why Deloitte?
At Deloitte we create positively differentiated work experiences that enable our people to feel valued and achieve their full potential. We value difference and embrace people with diverse backgrounds and thinking styles. Knowing that people work best in different ways we are happy to discuss alternative arrangements if the working pattern you are looking for is not specifically indicated.
30+ days ago
Report job"
137,Data Scientist - Utilities,Ernst & Young,Not shown,Perth WA,"The Covid-19 pandemic is creating seismic challenges around the world. Our purpose, to build a better working world, has never been more important. Life at EY has been transformed dramatically but our strong culture of flexible and remote working has helped EY people navigate new ways of working and remain connected with each other and our clients.

A better working world truly starts with the people at EY who are building it every day. Now more than ever we need talented people from diverse backgrounds to help our clients navigate the complexities of this Transformative Age: people with the passion, curiosity and drive to make things better.
The opportunity

We are seeking a Data Scientist to join our Data and Analytics team in our Perth office. This role is offered on a flexible, full-time basis.

EY DnA is the data and advanced analytics capability within EY Asia-Pacific, with over 500 specialist employees working across multiple industry sectors.

We implement information-driven strategies and systems that help grow, optimize and protect client organisations. We go beyond strategy, and provide end to end implementation of real-life data environments and have some of the best architects, project managers, business analysts, data scientists, big data engineers, developers and consultants in the region.

In this role as a Data Scientist you will be part of a culture that focuses on delivering excellence for our clients, whilst using cutting edge technologies. Part of your role will be to translate analytical solution outcomes in the context of business impacts and benefits, whilst working with diverse stakeholders to identify their challenges with data.

Your key responsibilities
Determine the suitability and feasibility of an analytical solution for a given problem
Review existing data sources to assess their applicability to address the business problem, and/or propose additional sources required for a solution
Extract and manipulate data from a variety of sources and apply the appropriate pre-processing treatments for analysis
Support the selection and configuration of analytical tools and infrastructure appropriate to our clients’ objectives, current and target state analytic maturity
Design, develop and implement learning and/or optimisation solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels and networks, risk and portfolio analysis, supply chain management and marketing effectiveness
Design, develop and implement predictive models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure
Design, develop and implement approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths required to support back-testing/test-and-learn model validation
Apply visual analysis techniques and toolsets to extract patterns and meaning from data in a visual format
Be involved in all aspects of the Project life-cycle, including Strategy, Road-Mapping, Architecture, Implementation and Development in order to gain maximum exposure to set you up for a successful consulting career
Skills and attributes for success
Statistical analysis experience
Algorithm design, implementation and operationalisation experience
Development of statistical models, such as Bayesian, regression and linear optimisation models (ideally 5+ Years)
Development of machine learning models, including deep learning and graph applications (ideally 3+ Years)
Broad domain experience within utilities background (power, water, energy) with the ability to link the dots across industry data sets is essential
An eagerness to solve complex problems in environments that are often ambiguous, technologically challenged and require creative and lateral thinking
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests
An ability to work within a multidisciplinary team to seek requirements for analysis, output format and visualisation, and provide requirements to data engineers
Fluency in at least one of the following programming languages R, Python, Scala
Familiarity with the following data-related technologies Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala, SQL, Teradata, Oracle, SAS, MongoDB
High-level understanding of architecting cloud-based solutions with the following products AWS Redshift/RDS, S3, EC2, Lambda, EMR, SageMaker, DynamoDB, Cloudformation, Athena, Kinesis – or equivalents in Azure or Google Cloud Platform is desirable
Prior Big4 Consulting experience is highly desirable
Ideally, you’ll also have
Experience in engaging with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Strong consulting experience and background, including engaging directly with clients
Experience in a delivery role on Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing, Big Data or analytics projects
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with a knack for distilling complex and/or technical information for novice audiences
What working at EY offers

We offer a competitive remuneration package where you’ll be rewarded for your performance. In addition, our comprehensive Total Rewards package can be tailored to your individual needs, to give you the freedom to manage your role in a way that’s right for you. This includes;
a variety of flexible working and leave arrangements
personalised career development including coaching and support to help you build your career and access to formal learning so you can develop the skills you’ll need to thrive in the future
a range of tools and benefits to guide and support your health and wellbeing throughout your entire EY career
About EY

At EY, we hold a collective commitment to foster an environment where all differences are valued and respected, practices are equitable and everyone experiences a sense of belonging. Through our inclusive leadership behaviours, a variety of internal networks, flexible working and mentoring programs, you will have the support and flexibility to build an exceptional career.
EY is committed to making reasonable adjustments to provide a positive, barrier-free recruitment process for people with disability. If you require any adjustments to the recruitment process in order to equitably participate, we encourage you to advise us at the time of application via contactrecruitment@au.ey.com or phone +61 3 8650 7788.

We understand the importance of social distancing at this time so our recruitment and onboarding process will be managed virtually so we can continue to prioritise the safety and wellbeing of EY people, clients, guests and the broader public.
The exceptional EY experience. It’s yours to build.
Apply now.
#LI-ANALYTICS
#LI-EYAustralia

The preferred applicant will be subject to employment screening by EY or by their external third party provider.
© 2020 Ernst & Young Australia. All Rights Reserved. Liability limited by a scheme approved under Professional Standards Legislation.
25 days ago
Report job"
138,Consultant - Data Scientist,KPMG,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Job no: 510758
Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: Brisbane
Digital Delta Data Scientist
Do you love solving complex problems, designing sophisticated solutions and building innovative technology for Australia’s largest organisations?
Are you passionate about Digital Transformation?
Do you embrace digital disruption?
Are you convinced that the Fourth Industrial Revolution is fundamentally changing the way we live, work and relate to each other?
Do you aspire to create the best customer experiences across Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI)?
Do you believe in creating powerful actionable insights from Data and Analytics?
Do you want to work in a diverse and flexible working environment?

New digital technologies and disruptive business models mean many organisations are struggling to keep pace with the transformative changes required to drive growth and meet customer demands. KPMG Digital Delta provides end-to-end digital innovation and transformation services to help overcome this challenge.

By designing and implementing new fit-for-purpose operating models, KPMG Digital Delta helps organisations to reframe their business models, improve operational productivity, create the best customer experiences, and enhance employee collaboration. We bring together best practice knowledge and technology, along with deep expertise across all industries.

More specifically, we re-imagine and re-invent organisations to become world class digital enterprises using advanced technologies, data and human insights. We help organisations to embrace Digital Strategy, Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Cognitive, the Internet of Things (IoT), Data, Analytics & Modelling, Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI) and more.

We work with clients to:
Formulate strategies that re-imagine organisations
Harness innovation from the 4th industrial revolution
Actioning insights from trusted data to consistently and quickly make clear decisions
Build adaptive organisations
Thrive as a connected enterprise – front, middle and back office

Your new role

The Data Scientist designs, develops and implements practical and scalable analytic solutions. These typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will work with business stakeholders on factual problem formation, data identification and deriving answers that can be operationalized to solve business issues. You will work proactively to:

Determine the suitability and feasibility of an analytical solution for a given commercial problem
Review existing data sources to assess their applicability to address the business problem, and/or propose additional sources required for a solution
Extract and manipulate data from a variety of sources and apply the appropriate pre-processing treatments for analysis.
Support the selection and configuration of analytical tools and infrastructure appropriate to our clients’ objectives, current and target state analytic maturity.
Design, develop and implement learning and/or optimisation solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels and networks, risk and portfolio analysis, supply chain management and marketing effectiveness.
Design, develop and implement predictive models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure.
Design, develop and implement approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths required to support back-testing/test-and-learn model validation.
Apply visual analysis techniques and toolsets to extract patterns and meaning from data in a visual format.
Translate analytical solution outcomes in the context of business impacts and benefits.

In addition to your focus on client engagements, you will contribute to the definition and enhancement of analytics and experimental design disciplines within the practice.

You bring to the role

A proven ability to undertake the responsibilities and requirements of the role, as listed above.
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with a knack for distilling complex and/or technical information for novice audiences.
An eagerness to solve complex problems in environments that are often ambiguous, technologically challenged and require creative and lateral thinking.
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests.
An ability to work within a multidisciplinary team to seek requirements for analysis, output format and visualisation, and provide requirements to data engineers
Experience with the following technologies & languages
Fluency in at least one of the following programming languages: R, Python, Scala
Familiarity with the following data-related technologies: Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala, SQL, Teradata, Oracle, SAS, MongoDB
High-level understanding of architecting cloud-based solutions with the following products: AWS Redshift/RDS, S3, EC2, Lambda, EMR, SageMaker, DynamoDB, Cloudformation, Athena, Kinesis – or equivalents in Azure or Google Cloud Platform.

What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.

Please apply for this position by submitting your confidential application online.
Advertised: 15 Jan 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
Applications close: 26 Feb 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
30+ days ago
Report job"
139,Data and Image Processing Scientist,The University of Queensland,"$99,542 - $118,206 a year",St Lucia QLD,"The Centre for Microscopy and Microanalysis
The Centre for Microscopy and Microanalysis (CMM) is the University’s microscopy, characterisation and analysis core facility and part of the national grid of Microscopy Australia facilities. The platforms goal is to facilitate and provide research excellence through a focus on world-class facilities matched with staff expertise. It does this through a concept to user publication to meet the characterisation requirements of local and national researchers and industry, through excellence in consultation, training, measurement and finally analysis.
The CMM comprises 24 academic, research, technical and administrative staff supporting a diverse range of instrument platforms including electron microscopy and microanalysis, Xray diffraction and imaging mass spectrometry. The CMM operates on four main sites on the UQ St. Lucia campus.
Information about the CMM may be accessed on the Faculty’s web site at https://cmm.centre.uq.edu.au
About This Opportunity
We are currently searching for an experienced Data and Image Processing Scientist to join our team based at our St Lucia Campus. You will work collaboratively with the CMM team to provide data management, analysis and visualisation expertise to support research projects using CMM facilities.
This position will require leadership in data management, database and data processing pipelines and occur at a range of levels, including: providing advice and consulting; designing and delivering training modules; support via commercial software packages or collaboration in developing and implementing custom algorithms and workflows with UQ-IT expertise.
This position is located at our picturesque St Lucia campus, renowned as one of Australia’s most attractive university campuses, and located just 7km from Brisbane’s city centre. Bounded by the Brisbane River on three sides, and with outstanding public transport connections, our 114-hectare site provides a perfect work environment – you can enjoy the best of both worlds: a vibrant campus with the tradition of an established university.
Our Ideal Candidate
Our ideal candidate will have significant experience in image and data processing management, particularly with a focus on the implementation of data management, workflow processing, image processing, analysis and visualisation. You will also hold a PhD or equivalent relevant to data management, analysis and visualisation. It is essential you have experience dealing with big data and complex data sets, ideally gained with exposure to biological data sets.
You will demonstrate significant exposure to commercial visualisation tools such as Avizo, DM3 and relevant open source tools.
You must have ongoing unrestricted work rights in Australia to apply for this opportunity.
We value diversity and inclusion, and actively encourage applications from those who bring diversity to the University. Our Diversity and Inclusion webpage contains further information if you require additional support. Accessibility requirements and/or adjustments can be directed to recruitment@uq.edu.au.
What We Can Offer
This is a full-time, 3 year fixed term position at Academic Research Level B.
The full-time equivalent base salary will be in the range $99,542 - $118,206, plus super of up to 17%. The total FTE package will be in the range $116,464 - $138,301.
You will be able to take advantage of UQ Sport Facilities, recreation leave loading (of 17.5%), salary sacrificing options, on-campus childcare, discounted private health insurance, affordable parking, development programs and many other benefits.
For further information, please review The University of Queensland's Enterprise Bargaining Agreement 2018-2021.

Questions?
To discuss this role please contact Roger Wepf, Director Microscopy and Microanalysis: r.wepf@uq.edu.au
10 days ago
Report job"
140,Data Scientist,Templeton and Partners,Not shown,Sunbury VIC,"Job Type
Contract

Location
Sunbury

Area
UK

Sector
Internet of Things (IoT)

Salary
Market related

Start Date
ASAP

Job Ref
DATA20MAY19SUN

Description
Templeton & Partners is looking for a Data Scientist to start asap on project in London, Sunbury.
Location: London, Sunbury
Start date: asap
Duration: 6 months
Rate: £500 pd

Job description:
Collaborate with business users to identify, elaborate and prioritize Analytics Uses cases.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Apply analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced analytics techniques.
Presenting data insights using high impact visualization.
Must Have Skills
A demonstrated ability to solve challenging business problems using a data science approach by developing novel and/or adapting existing computational methods
Minimum 8 years of relevant experience in applying data mining, artificial intelligence, signal processing, machine learning, optimization etc. in business analytics or scientific/engineering settings
Experience with statistical software, scripting languages (Python/R)
Strong skills in communicating and presenting data-derived insights to non-technical audiences appropriately.
A Masters or Ph.D. in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Engineering Science.

Good to Have Skills
Data science experience in oil & gas industry will be an advantage
Experience in Azure services
Experience in Visualization tools like Tableau / PowerBI

We very much look forward to receiving your application, and will be in touch promptly to discuss in more detail.
30+ days ago
Report job"
141,Junior Data Scientist,Correlate Resources,"$100,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"DATA SCIENCE PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT: Machine Learning & Advanced Modelling Solution
CUSTOMER / MARKETING / LOYALTY USE CASES: Exciting pipeline of complex use cases
JUNIOR DATA SCIENTIST OPP: Massive opportunity for career development and growth

Our client is an Australian market leader in the financial services sector who boast some of the industry's largest and most complex data assets. Employing the industry's brightest analytical minds they offer a hot bed for innovation and offer unparalleled opportunities for career development and growth. Due to the ongoing success of the team a brand new position has been created for a Junior Data Scientist to join the Sydney based team. With the key focus on supporting the development of a cutting edge customer recommendation engines the responsibilities of this role will include:
Working under the supervision of a Lead Data Scientist to understand project requirements and best practice methodologies to be applied.
Managing, manipulating and automating production of complex data sets in a true big data environment leveraging skills in Hadoop, Spark, Scala, R, Python and SQL.
Deliver and automate a range of bespoke Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistical Modelling led projects leveraging techniques that may include; Gradient Boosting / XGBoost, Neural Networks, Recommendation / Decision / Scoring Engines, Predictive Modelling, Linear/Logistic Regression, Attribution Modelling, Customer Segmentation, Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, etc.
The successful applicant will come from a strong background working in a senior position of a high profile Customer Loyalty driven Data Science environment and will be able to demonstrate:
A strong academic background (Phd or Masters )in a highly relevant discipline Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Engineering etc.
Commercial exposure to working in Data Science building a range of complex models relating to customer marketing strategy (Acquisition, retention, growth, cross sell, churn), customer segmentation, next best action decision engines and campaign analytics.
Strong stakeholder engagement and relationship management skills.
Strong technical ability to manage, manipulate and automate production of complex data sets in a true big data environment, leveraging skills in Hadoop, Spark, Scala, R, Python/PySpark and SQL.
A strong appreciation of a range of Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistical Modelling techniques that may include; Gradient Boosting / XGBoost, Neural Networks, Recommendation / Decision / Scoring Engines, Predictive Modelling, Linear/Logistic Regression, Attribution Modelling, Customer Segmentation, Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, etc.
Enthusiastic Kaggle competitors will be looked upon favourably.
To apply for this position please click on the 'Apply' button below or you're resume and cover note to ben@correlateresources.com
15 days ago
Report job"
142,Consultant - Data Scientist,KPMG,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Job no: 510758
Work type: Permanent Full Time
Location: Brisbane
Digital Delta Data Scientist
Do you love solving complex problems, designing sophisticated solutions and building innovative technology for Australia’s largest organisations?
Are you passionate about Digital Transformation?
Do you embrace digital disruption?
Are you convinced that the Fourth Industrial Revolution is fundamentally changing the way we live, work and relate to each other?
Do you aspire to create the best customer experiences across Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI)?
Do you believe in creating powerful actionable insights from Data and Analytics?
Do you want to work in a diverse and flexible working environment?

New digital technologies and disruptive business models mean many organisations are struggling to keep pace with the transformative changes required to drive growth and meet customer demands. KPMG Digital Delta provides end-to-end digital innovation and transformation services to help overcome this challenge.

By designing and implementing new fit-for-purpose operating models, KPMG Digital Delta helps organisations to reframe their business models, improve operational productivity, create the best customer experiences, and enhance employee collaboration. We bring together best practice knowledge and technology, along with deep expertise across all industries.

More specifically, we re-imagine and re-invent organisations to become world class digital enterprises using advanced technologies, data and human insights. We help organisations to embrace Digital Strategy, Artificial Intelligence (AI) & Cognitive, the Internet of Things (IoT), Data, Analytics & Modelling, Mobile App & Web, and User Experience (UX) & User Interface (UI) and more.

We work with clients to:
Formulate strategies that re-imagine organisations
Harness innovation from the 4th industrial revolution
Actioning insights from trusted data to consistently and quickly make clear decisions
Build adaptive organisations
Thrive as a connected enterprise – front, middle and back office

Your new role

The Data Scientist designs, develops and implements practical and scalable analytic solutions. These typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will work with business stakeholders on factual problem formation, data identification and deriving answers that can be operationalized to solve business issues. You will work proactively to:

Determine the suitability and feasibility of an analytical solution for a given commercial problem
Review existing data sources to assess their applicability to address the business problem, and/or propose additional sources required for a solution
Extract and manipulate data from a variety of sources and apply the appropriate pre-processing treatments for analysis.
Support the selection and configuration of analytical tools and infrastructure appropriate to our clients’ objectives, current and target state analytic maturity.
Design, develop and implement learning and/or optimisation solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels and networks, risk and portfolio analysis, supply chain management and marketing effectiveness.
Design, develop and implement predictive models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure.
Design, develop and implement approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths required to support back-testing/test-and-learn model validation.
Apply visual analysis techniques and toolsets to extract patterns and meaning from data in a visual format.
Translate analytical solution outcomes in the context of business impacts and benefits.

In addition to your focus on client engagements, you will contribute to the definition and enhancement of analytics and experimental design disciplines within the practice.

You bring to the role

A proven ability to undertake the responsibilities and requirements of the role, as listed above.
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with a knack for distilling complex and/or technical information for novice audiences.
An eagerness to solve complex problems in environments that are often ambiguous, technologically challenged and require creative and lateral thinking.
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests.
An ability to work within a multidisciplinary team to seek requirements for analysis, output format and visualisation, and provide requirements to data engineers
Experience with the following technologies & languages
Fluency in at least one of the following programming languages: R, Python, Scala
Familiarity with the following data-related technologies: Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala, SQL, Teradata, Oracle, SAS, MongoDB
High-level understanding of architecting cloud-based solutions with the following products: AWS Redshift/RDS, S3, EC2, Lambda, EMR, SageMaker, DynamoDB, Cloudformation, Athena, Kinesis – or equivalents in Azure or Google Cloud Platform.

What we offer you
We offer rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship. We also believe that our business plays a distinct and vital role in helping solve important social and environmental issues; and use our unique skills and expertise to help create positive and lasting impacts for our communities.

We believe diversity of thought, background and experience strengthens relationships and delivers meaningful benefits to our people, our clients and communities. We are consistently recognised as an employer of choice for women, and our inclusive culture promotes the development of our people irrespective of gender, ethnicity, generation, flexible work status, family circumstances, sexual orientation or disability.

This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of KPMG and its ongoing success. So if you want a career where you can use your deep expertise to deliver real results, talk to us first.

Please apply for this position by submitting your confidential application online.
Advertised: 15 Jan 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
Applications close: 26 Feb 2021 E. Australia Standard Time
30+ days ago
Report job"
143,Data and Image Processing Scientist,The University of Queensland,"$99,542 - $118,206 a year",St Lucia QLD,"The Centre for Microscopy and Microanalysis
The Centre for Microscopy and Microanalysis (CMM) is the University’s microscopy, characterisation and analysis core facility and part of the national grid of Microscopy Australia facilities. The platforms goal is to facilitate and provide research excellence through a focus on world-class facilities matched with staff expertise. It does this through a concept to user publication to meet the characterisation requirements of local and national researchers and industry, through excellence in consultation, training, measurement and finally analysis.
The CMM comprises 24 academic, research, technical and administrative staff supporting a diverse range of instrument platforms including electron microscopy and microanalysis, Xray diffraction and imaging mass spectrometry. The CMM operates on four main sites on the UQ St. Lucia campus.
Information about the CMM may be accessed on the Faculty’s web site at https://cmm.centre.uq.edu.au
About This Opportunity
We are currently searching for an experienced Data and Image Processing Scientist to join our team based at our St Lucia Campus. You will work collaboratively with the CMM team to provide data management, analysis and visualisation expertise to support research projects using CMM facilities.
This position will require leadership in data management, database and data processing pipelines and occur at a range of levels, including: providing advice and consulting; designing and delivering training modules; support via commercial software packages or collaboration in developing and implementing custom algorithms and workflows with UQ-IT expertise.
This position is located at our picturesque St Lucia campus, renowned as one of Australia’s most attractive university campuses, and located just 7km from Brisbane’s city centre. Bounded by the Brisbane River on three sides, and with outstanding public transport connections, our 114-hectare site provides a perfect work environment – you can enjoy the best of both worlds: a vibrant campus with the tradition of an established university.
Our Ideal Candidate
Our ideal candidate will have significant experience in image and data processing management, particularly with a focus on the implementation of data management, workflow processing, image processing, analysis and visualisation. You will also hold a PhD or equivalent relevant to data management, analysis and visualisation. It is essential you have experience dealing with big data and complex data sets, ideally gained with exposure to biological data sets.
You will demonstrate significant exposure to commercial visualisation tools such as Avizo, DM3 and relevant open source tools.
You must have ongoing unrestricted work rights in Australia to apply for this opportunity.
We value diversity and inclusion, and actively encourage applications from those who bring diversity to the University. Our Diversity and Inclusion webpage contains further information if you require additional support. Accessibility requirements and/or adjustments can be directed to recruitment@uq.edu.au.
What We Can Offer
This is a full-time, 3 year fixed term position at Academic Research Level B.
The full-time equivalent base salary will be in the range $99,542 - $118,206, plus super of up to 17%. The total FTE package will be in the range $116,464 - $138,301.
You will be able to take advantage of UQ Sport Facilities, recreation leave loading (of 17.5%), salary sacrificing options, on-campus childcare, discounted private health insurance, affordable parking, development programs and many other benefits.
For further information, please review The University of Queensland's Enterprise Bargaining Agreement 2018-2021.

Questions?
To discuss this role please contact Roger Wepf, Director Microscopy and Microanalysis: r.wepf@uq.edu.au
10 days ago
Report job"
144,Data Scientist,Templeton and Partners,Not shown,Sunbury VIC,"Job Type
Contract

Location
Sunbury

Area
UK

Sector
Internet of Things (IoT)

Salary
Market related

Start Date
ASAP

Job Ref
DATA20MAY19SUN

Description
Templeton & Partners is looking for a Data Scientist to start asap on project in London, Sunbury.
Location: London, Sunbury
Start date: asap
Duration: 6 months
Rate: £500 pd

Job description:
Collaborate with business users to identify, elaborate and prioritize Analytics Uses cases.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Apply analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced analytics techniques.
Presenting data insights using high impact visualization.
Must Have Skills
A demonstrated ability to solve challenging business problems using a data science approach by developing novel and/or adapting existing computational methods
Minimum 8 years of relevant experience in applying data mining, artificial intelligence, signal processing, machine learning, optimization etc. in business analytics or scientific/engineering settings
Experience with statistical software, scripting languages (Python/R)
Strong skills in communicating and presenting data-derived insights to non-technical audiences appropriately.
A Masters or Ph.D. in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Engineering Science.

Good to Have Skills
Data science experience in oil & gas industry will be an advantage
Experience in Azure services
Experience in Visualization tools like Tableau / PowerBI

We very much look forward to receiving your application, and will be in touch promptly to discuss in more detail.
30+ days ago
Report job"
145,Amaris.AI SG - Senior Data Scientist (Image Processing),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Amaris.AI is an innovative artificial intelligence solutions provider in intelligent automation and cybersecurity. Our solutions are deployed in fintech, government, telecommunications and manufacturing enterprises. We aspire to advance the age of humanity with innovative applied artificial intelligence and cybersecurity solutions that solve complex problems in the world today.

Job Description
As an Amaris.AI Senior Data Scientist, you will be tasked to deliver outcomes as part of our business overall vision and objectives in a technical or managerial role. You will work closely with our CTO office to deliver cutting-edge image processing solutions for internal and external users.
Your primary focus is to oversee activities of junior data scientists, build products or deliver projects using cutting edge technology. You will apply state-of-the-art image processing solutions to solve complex problems that plague many industries such as healthcare, governments, fintech and many more. Your future progression has other career opportunities into strategic leadership in a technical or managerial role.
Responsibilities
Manage and guide junior data scientists to ensure proper execution of projects or research and development deliverables in line with business vision and objectives.
Provide analysis on research, design, implementation and deployment of artificial intelligence solutions to address client and internal business issues.
Develop, refine and implement state-of-the-art algorithms for product research and development or client solutions via ensemble or artificial intelligence model workflow.
Build APIs to host models as a microservice / container
Perform other duties as delegated by CTO Office.
Skills and Qualifications
Bachelors/Masters/PHD in Data Science/Computer Science/Computer Engineering
At least 5 years of experience in the Data Science Industry
Previous execution and delivery of Image Processing related projects such as Object Detection, Colourisation, Pose Estimation, Image or Video Search and Action Recognition
Strong understanding of traditional machine-learning techniques and data science toolkits (R, Numpy, Weka, Scikit-Learn, H20.AI, Data Robot)
Strong understanding of deep-learning image processing techniques and algorithms o Image: Colourisation, Image Processing, CNN Algorithms, GANS Algorithm, Graph Neural Networks
Experience working with image-related annotation, databases, datasets, big data, data mining or exact-transfer-load of streaming data.
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes and AI Software Delivery
Strong scripting and programming ability in Python or Java
Self-driven, ability to work independently and cross-functionally in teams.
Ability to apply data science in a business perspective
Strong communication Skills
Bonus
PHD / Academic Publications / Patents.
Participated in Kaggle Competitions / Hackathons / Data Science Competitions
Experience in Fintech/Insurance/Health industries
30+ days ago
Report job"
146,Data Scientist,FourQuarters,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Data Scientist - Trading

The Company

A growing investment firm that employs a small team of highly experienced and motivated market professionals. They develop and utilise sophisticated probability models that are universally scalable.

The Role

A newly created role within a growing organisation. You will utilise your exceptional data analysis skills and knowledge of the equities market to help build out a new asset class within our investment team.

You will work closely with the firm’s senior traders, portfolio managers, and developers.

Targeted Prerequisites
PhD/HRD degree in a highly relevant discipline such as Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Finance
Experience in quantitative or data driven research in financial markets,
Strong knowledge of the characteristics of equities, and global equities market,
proficient in managing and manipulating large sets of complex data, leveraging skills in applicable Data Science, Machine Learning and Statistical Modelling techniques
Experience with SQL, Python and/or C# are well regarded,
Curious, resourceful, diligent, with strong intellectual integrity,



Principal Responsibilities

You will work closely with the firm’s quants, portfolio managers and developers in the creation of advanced trading and risk-management systems. Principal responsibilities include:
Financial market-data gathering, preparation and analysis
Trading strategy back-testing, implementation, and optimisation,
Blue sky research projects focusing on the detection, modelling, and exploitation of significant behavioural, statistical, or seasonal patterns in the global financial markets.

Whats on offer
A culture valuing creativity and meritocracy that will see your ideas and input
A growing organisation with opportunities to:
initiate new projects,
gain experience in a variety of asset classes,
work closely with experienced investment professionals,
develop lateral career progression within the investment team
8 days ago
Report job"
147,Data Scientist,TROOCOO Pty Ltd,"$900 - $1,000 a day",Sydney NSW,"HIgh calibre team and outstanding working culture
Market leading ASX business
Visible and high profile position


About our client:


Our client is a prominent top 100 ASX listed company operating within the energy and infrastructure industry. A global presence with operations in Northern America, Asia, Australia and the Middle East, this organization is the market leader in its field.
With a reputation predicated on quality of service to clients and offering un-paralleled career opportunities to its employees, this company has become a destination of choice for the very best talent in Sydney.


The role:


As the Data Scientist you will have a strong background in data science, analytics or data engineering.
The main focus of the Data Scientist role is to provide advanced statistical analysis, machine learning and AI to our client's main business units and partners across the energy and resource sector.

Responsibilities will include by not be limited to:
Lead / execute analytical approaches, including developing / training / optimizing machine learning models, other forms of analytical modelling
Lead in house analytics projects and upskill people within the Data Science and Decision support team where appropriate.
Processing, cleansing, manipulating, and verifying the integrity of data used for analyses
The successful candidate:


Masters degree in highly quantitative field (mathematics, statistics, computer science, machine learning) or equivalent experience
Experience leveraging statistical programming languages (SAS, R and/or Python for analyses)
Experience with data visualization tools, preferably Power BI
Minimum of 8 years' experience with advanced statistical methods generally, and particularly in the areas of predictive modelling and machine learning


What's on offer?


What's on offer?


Based 5 minutes from Circular Quay, our client offers beautiful office space with harbour views and a plethora of cafes, gyms and restaurants near by.


The position will initially be a 6 month contract with a daily rate of c.$900-1000 a day + super. The intention is that the successful candidate will be moved to a permanent hire in the new financial year.


We guarantee that all candidates who apply for this role will receive a call from the Troocoo team if the following must haves are met:


1) Full working rights in Australia
2) Experience leveraging statistical programming languages (SAS, R and/or Python for analyses)
3) Minimum of 8 years' experience with advanced statistical methods
15 days ago
Report job"
148,Cartrack - Data Scientist/Engineer (Driver Behaviour),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Data Scientist/Engineer (Driver Behaviour)
Cartrack is looking for passionate data science and engineering candidates that can join a growing team that is responsible for the intelligence and efficiency solution provision to over a million subscribers, many of whom are large fleets. We are in the midst of creating revolutionary platforms that will change the way that people interact with their vehicles.
You will have the opportunity to work with the very brightest global subject matter experts that are transforming the automotive industry across Fleet Management, Asset Management and Insurance Telematics solutions.
Get to know the role:
Conceptualize and develop machine learning models to model driver behavior, actions and risks.
Develop and implement optimization algorithms for insurance metrics, driver education, driver safety, route management.
Develop differentiated capabilities in spatial and temporal data management (e.g. Location Intelligence, Mobile data analytics, spatial data cleaning, visualization and interactive queries) to establish competitive edge.
Test and put algorithms into a production ready state.
Constructing solution concepts from insights using familiar or unfamiliar data sources or complete or partial data.
The day-to-day activities:
Deep dive into big data to conduct advanced statistical analyses
Design and build machine learning and optimisation algorithms efficiently
Integrate, simulate and test impact of algorithms and features on the overall system
Develop and execute necessary analyses, simulations or A/B tests to validate models and identify improvement opportunities
Store, retrieve and visualise results in a manner that facilitates required analyses
Effectively conceptualize analyses to business/product stakeholders
Requirements
Essential:
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience in one or more of the following: Developing machine learning models for behaviour, preference or demand modelling; Signal processing and time series analysis; Developing optimization algorithms to solve large-scale network flow/ combinatorial/ stochastic problems; Developing large-scale complex discrete-event/agent-based simulation models
Ph.D., Master’s or an outstanding Bachelors in Computer Science, Electrical/Computer Engineering, Mathematics/Statistics, Operations Research, Industrial & Systems Engineering, or related technical disciplines.
Strong fundamentals in at least one of the following: ML, optimization or simulation, Signal Processing with familiarity of the others.
Proficient in statistical programming in languages such as Python and R; and strong working knowledge in RDBMS such as PostgresQL or NoSQL
Strong programming skills in Java and Scala, experience in functional programming is preferred.
Self-motivated and independent learner who is willing to share knowledge with the team.
Efficient and detail-oriented time manager who thrives in a dynamic and fast paced working environment
Desired
Experience in working with mobility, delivery data and use cases
Experience in parallel programming and multithreading
Familiar with Linux/Unix and shell scripting, experience in cloud computing is a plus.
30+ days ago
Report job"
149,Data Scientist,Bluefin Resources,"$120,000 - $140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Production of Machine Learning Models
Next Best Action Solutions
Global Services Firm
My client is a global services firm and is looking for a commercially focused Data Science for their growing team. Your role will be focused on developing recommendation models leveraging machine learning techniques, both supervised and unsupervised to model customer behaviour and preferences and contribute to the development of the next best action engine
The role
Development and production of machine learning models to drive commercial outcomes and customer engagement
Data mining , customer insights and deep dive analysis
Recommending next best action solutions
Working with large data sets in SQL and Python to produce meaningful insights and recommendations
Your background
A minimum of 4 years + experience in a data science role
Experienced in developing machine learning models in essential
Predictive modelling and customer analytics
Exposure to customer and marketing analytics environment highly desirable
Technical skills in both SQL and Python are essential
Consultative and commercial in your approach with strong stakeholder management skills
My client has the flexibility to complete the interview process before Christmas for suitable candidates. Please apply on line below or for more information contact Marie Thow at Bluefin Resources
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.
http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy

BBBH42215_161295284578822
5 days ago
Report job"
150,Data Scientist,Ingram Micro,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Description
We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist to develop statistical, machine learning, AI, economic, geographic, and applied mathematical models to address complex business problems in the tech and ecommerce space.
About us
Ingram Micro touches 80% of the technology you use every day with our focus on Technology Solutions, Cloud, and Commerce and Lifecycle Solutions. With $43 billion in revenue, we have become the world’s largest technology distributor with operations in 56 countries and more than 30,000 associates. We continue to strategically expand our global reach with 32 acquisitions since 2012.
What you’ll do
You will work with the growing Advanced Science and Innovation Lab, to build causal and predictive models, design and execute field experiments, model demand, perform supply chain optimization, design and conduct surveys, and develop state of the art machine learning and AI models.
The role will collaborate with a diverse team of highly talented Ph.D.s, M.A.s, data engineers, and industry experts to use advanced scientific techniques on a world class data infrastructure to develop large-scale models with immediate and long term relevance. You will focus on building a product portfolio, new product development, and owning sub-streams of projects that requires effective communication with cross-functional teams. As a Data Scientist you will build productionalized models, work with large granular data sets, communicate analysis to key internal and external stakeholders, and be positioned as a Subject Matter Expert.
What you’ll bring
D. (or technical Masters considered) in Statistics, Operations Research, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, Economics (applied micro, applied econometrics, empirical IO, labor, finance, behavioral, applied macro/time series), or related technical field
5+ years of quantitative experience (industry, consulting, government, academics, or post-doc work)
Ability to apply insights to high impact questions with immediate and long-term relevance
Perform econometric and statistical analysis on very large granular transaction level data sets
Develop causal models to derive insights about market behavior
Build predictive models to forecast upstream and downstream market activities
Experience with optimization techniques
Experience developing and implementing demand models
Design and execute field experiments to draw insights from market behavior
Experience with machine learning and AI models
Be familiar with and use modeling techniques such as
Time Series Modeling
Linear and Non-Linear Regression
Support Vector Machines
Features extraction, attributes selection
Clustering, decision and tree-based models
Numerical optimization (linear and nonlinear) with constraints
Experimental Design
Neural Network
Price optimization, price elasticity/demand modeling
Text mining on structured and unstructured data, sentiment analysis
Ability to work independently and in a highly engaged team environment
Experience cleaning, aggregating, and pre-processing large granular data from varied sources, including complex relational databases
Experience with tools such as R, Python, SQL, SAS, or STATA
Experience with docker and RESTful API is a plus
Effective verbal and written communication skills; the ability to collaborate with internal and external partners

For many transactions IM has end-to-end visibility across the supply chain: from upstream manufacturer, through distribution, to resellers, to final end users. This perspective provides opportunities to tackle the most challenging research and applied science questions with answers that drive strategic, operational, and tactical decisions with immediate and long-term relevance around the world.
Ingram Micro Inc. is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other protected category under applicable law.
ONLY applicants with current Australian Work Rights and onshore will be considered. Due to COVID 19 only applicants that are shortlisted will be contacted.
We believe our people are our most important asset which is why we endeavour to create a positive & rewarding environment for our teams.
WE will make YOUR career adventure OUR journey!
If this sounds like something you want to be a part of click “Apply”.
30+ days ago
Report job"
151,Senior Data Scientist,Bupa,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job Description:
As the Senior Data Scientist you will have a strong background in data science, analytics or data engineering. Day to day you will be responsible for providing hospital, medical and ancillary statistical analysis encompassing claims, modalities, providers, networks, product, and channels, at geographical, clinical group practice and provider levels.
The primary focus of this role is to provide advanced statistical analysis, machine learning and AI to hospital, medical and ancillary business problems. Targeting areas that will not only have an impact on benefits management but also on product design and fund rules.
How will I help?
Lead / execute analytical approaches, including developing / training / optimising machine learning models, other forms of analytical modelling
Lead in house analytics projects and upskill people within the Data Science and Decision support team where appropriate.
Collaborate with internal customers to identify their business problem and work with them to provide meaningful, actionable insights
Processing, cleansing, manipulating, and verifying the integrity of data used for analyses
Create training data sets and perform cross validation to test the efficiency of the resulting algorithms
What’s in it for me?
As well as a competitive salary, a range of Bupa benefits and flexible working/ work from home arrangements, you’ll be challenged and encouraged to innovate. You will collaborate strongly with colleagues who are committed to delivering exceptional experiences. We trust, respect and consider everyone, knowing your difference will make the difference.
What do I need?
Masters degree in highly quantitative field (mathematics, statistics, computer science, machine learning) or equivalent experience
Experience leveraging statistical programming languages (SAS, R and/or Python for analyses)
Experience with data visualization tools, preferably Power BI
Minimum of 5 years’ experience with advanced statistical methods generally, and particularly in the areas of predictive modelling and machine learning
Ideally 5 years experience in a private or public sector clinical setting, or equivalent experience in insurance and finance
Hands-on experience with SAS, SAS STAT and SAS Enterprise Miner
What is it like to work there?
Be at the heart of helping people live longer, healthier, happier lives. At Bupa, we employ more than 80,000 people globally who are making this a reality. One thing stands out about Bupa people -our customers are our passion; they’re at the heart of our culture of care. If you've got the belief, the drive and the talent to help us in our ambition then we’d like to hear from you.
Time Type:
Full time
Job Posting End Date
13 Jan 2021
30+ days ago
Report job"
152,IMDA - Data Scientist,TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Successful candidates would be given various use cases in the telco cybersecurity field, and should be able to appreciate and carry out minimally the analysts and data engineering roles and will be involved in the conceptualisation all the way to model deployment. Work areas include work streams across the spectrum of data science-related tasks, including data mining, engineering, statistical analysis , developing machine learning models and evaluating the outputs.
Requirements
Degree / Masters in Computer Science / Computer Engineering / Mathematics / Statistics / Data Science and Analytics.
At least 2 years of experience in quantitative data analytic or machine learning model development for cybersecurity or network infrastructure use cases using big data.
Good understanding of programming languages including Python, R, Golang and Java/C/C++, ETL frameworks, and able to develop programming scripts minimally in Python or R.
Experience in using databases for big data analytics such as Hadoop / Hive / HBase frameworks, and able to write complex SQL queries.
Familiarity with big data streaming tools, database frameworks and visualisation tools such as Apache NiFi, Storm, Spark, Hadoop, Airflow, Kibana, Tableau and their areas of applicability.
Domain knowledge and experience in Computer networking, Network security, or System security is preferred.
30+ days ago
Report job"
153,Data Scientist,Fortune Select,Not shown,Newcastle NSW,"Location: New Castle
Immediate Position
Requirement
We are looking for data scientist with over 10 year’s exp. using advance analytics algorithms and AI, ML techniques. The candidate should have good Telco background and must have executed 2-3 projects in field force analytics in Telco domain. Truck roll analytics exp. is also desirable. Opening is for one of the leading Telco giant in Australia. Location will be New Castle. He/She will be responsible for END TO END project delivery. Candidate should be very good in stakeholder management, presentations and should be able to articulate and architect the solution effectively to bring-in the values which data analytics solution can deliver.
Job
The person will be required to:
Understand the field data to be used for advance analytics using AI & ML techniques
Drive the analysis of data, present it to client stakeholders
Ability to manage high volume and high complexity projects
Candidate should have exp. in virtual environment with excellent client communication skills
Highly competent technically with significant, hands-on expertise in technical architecture and delivery of data Analytics solution
Minimum 10 years exp. in data scientist role and 5 years in telco exp.
Must have exp. in optimization using analytics to reduce cost, staff, and failure incidents, lead-time etc. using field force data.
Predictive &prescriptive data analysis like predicting propensity of required truck roll, truck roll drivers, recommendations to reduce unnecessary truck rolls etc. is also preferred
Conduct business due-diligence activities to identify analytics led opportunities for transforming business
Develop a deep understanding of systems and processes in order to extract insights from existing data leveraging rigorous project management discipline to ensure the highest possible quality of delivery while managing team capacity
Candidate should have big data analytics exp. working on AW/Azure cloud for data analysis & delivery
Required Skills and Experience
He/She should have excellent approach in understanding data and business.
Experience in managing, cleaning and analysis of large datasets using statistical packages like SAS, R, Python, Azure/AWS ML
Exp. in Alteryx from data analytics stand point is also preferred
Exp. required in statistical techniques like cross-tabulations, correlation, Anova, Hypothesis testing, regression, logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting, decision trees, ANN, NLP etc.
Experience in Oracle, PL/SQL database
Good understanding of Big Data eco system.
Strong problem solving and conceptual thinking abilities
Ability to work in a fast-paced and deadline driven environment.
Ability to work as a consultant
Mentor team members in the area of BI and Visualization and provide guidance as necessary
Qualifications:
Education: Bachelor / Master’s degree in Engineering Kindly Email CV to amits@myfortuneselect.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
154,Analytics Consultant / Aspiring Data Scientist,Talent Insights Group,"$90,000 - $120,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"We are currently seeking a junior-mid level analytics consultant (2-5 years’ experience) with a strong data and statistics background. If successful, you will join a team with a great reputation in the industry that wins large, complex analytical projects across industries including; Telco, Financial Services, Media, Health, Insurance, Retail and more.

Required experience and skills:
You must hold a bachelor’s degree or higher in a numerical or scientific field, such as; Statistics, Physics, Actuarial Studies, Engineering or Mathematics
Commercial experience applying statistical modelling techniques and machine learning techniques including; regression, decision trees, predictive models, Generalised Linear Models (GLM), GBM and more.
Confident communication skills and experience presenting ideas, insights and reports to stakeholders (this could be to consulting clients or internal stakeholders)
Extracting data and building/maintaining/optimising models using SQL, R, Python or SAS
Experience with Cloud Platforms (Azure / AWS / GCP) would be beneficial and you should be happy to learn new tools and technologies as they evolve!

Why this role is different:
Many other ‘consulting’ positions in analytics are heavily weighted towards only the client-facing presentation of insights to non-technical business stakeholders. Often, the level of modelling and opportunities to use machine learning can be very limited in these roles.
This team strikes a balance that includes building and developing strong client relationships and carrying out advanced statistical modelling and machine learning.
You will have opportunities to collaborate with and be mentored by senior analytics and data science professionals with varied backgrounds
Clients in different industries means you will be exposed to varied business problems and data sets
Problems you might solve include: predictive modelling, advising strategy in the public sector, pricing strategy optimisation or building risk profiles

Please apply with your CV and Cover Letter through the links below – we will be arranging interviews with short-listed applicants as soon as possible.
25 days ago
Report job"
155,Data Scientist,FXCM,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We’re looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing Data Analytics team. The role aims to further push forward and expand our customer-related models. You would have the opportunity help drive real change in our sales and marketing efforts. This would be ideal for somebody who is passionate about data and analysis, and focused on the practical impact and end-use of a model. Rather than being siloed to one area, our goal is to make use of all the data and tools at our disposal. The current team is large enough to make an impact, but small enough to be flexible. We are continually looking to learn more, improve and expand, and are looking for candidates that have the same values.
The work involves the development of data models, data visualization, algorithms and automation scripts. You would interact heavily with the marketing, sales and business intelligence teams.
We need somebody who is detail oriented, focused on continually learning, and very importantly, must be proactive.

Qualities Needed:
Self-motivated and able to work independently
Able to work efficiently with international staff
Analytical mind and good problem solving skills
Able to deal with ambiguity in defining activities and direction
Proactive and persistent
Good spoken and written English
Able to work in a fast pace MNC culture environment.

Strong experience working with various customer-related models (customer segmentation, lifetime value, markov chains, A/B testing)
Working with raw data from the main platforms marketing / sales platforms (Salesforce, Google Analytics and Ads/Display network, Social Media etc.)
Python and/or R
SQL
Using statistical, analytical and visualization skills to generate insights
Automating regular work flows
Version control software such as git
Strong desire to learn new analytical skills and techniques
30+ days ago
Report job"
156,Data Scientist,Boston Consulting Group,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Location:
Canberra, Melbourne, Perth, Sydney
Geography:
Asia Pacific
Capabilities:
Big data & advanced analytics
Industries:
Technology industries
Who We Are
Boston Consulting Group partners with leaders in business and society to tackle their most important challenges and capture their greatest opportunities. BCG was the pioneer in business strategy when it was founded in 1963. Today, we help clients with total transformation-inspiring complex change, enabling organizations to grow, building competitive advantage, and driving bottom-line impact.

To succeed, organizations must blend digital and human capabilities. Our diverse, global teams bring deep industry and functional expertise and a range of perspectives to spark change. BCG delivers solutions through leading-edge management consulting along with technology and design, corporate and digital ventures—and business purpose. We work in a uniquely collaborative model across the firm and throughout all levels of the client organization, generating results that allow our clients to thrive.
Practice Area Profile
BCG GAMMA combines innovative skills in computer science, artificial intelligence, statistics, and machine learning with deep industry expertise. The BCG GAMMA team is comprised of world-class data scientists and business consultants who specialize in the use of advanced analytics to get breakthrough business results. Our teams own the full analytics value-chain end to end: framing new business challenges, building fact-bases, designing innovative algorithms, creating scale through designing tools and apps, and training colleagues and clients in new solutions. Here at BCG GAMMA, you’ll have the chance to work with clients in every BCG region and every industry area. We are also a core member of a rapidly growing analytics enterprise at BCG - a constellation of teams focused on driving practical results for BCG clients by applying leading edge analytics approaches, data, and technology.
What You'll Do
We’re looking for a passionate and talented Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing team. In this role, you’ll have the chance to roll up your sleeves and apply data science methods and analytics to real-world business situations across a variety of industries. Successful candidates are intellectually curious builders who are biased toward action, scrappy, and communicative. You will also get the chance to travel: we have clients in New York, Paris, Stockholm, Peru… Make sure your passport is ready to go!

WHO YOU ARE:
Are comfortable in a client-facing role with the ambition to lead teams
Can distill complex results or processes into simple, clear visualizations
Are able to explain sophisticated data science concepts in an understandable manner
Love building things and are comfortable working with modern development tools and writing code collaboratively (bonus points if you have a software development or DevOps experience)
Have significant experience applying advanced analytics to a variety of business situations and a proven ability to synthesize complex data; as well as a deep understanding of modern machine learning techniques and their mathematical underpinnings, and are able to translate this into business implications for our clients
Have strong project management skills
What You'll Bring (Experience & Qualifications)
Recent PhD or Master’s Degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, machine learning, or other data centric disciplines with 2-5 years of relevant industry work experience providing advanced analytics solutions strongly preferred.
Strong record of extracurricular activity, professional accomplishment, and leadership
Additional experience in core analytic methods such as predictive modeling, customer segmentation/clustering, network analysis, supply chain optimization, etc.
Fluency in at least one scripting language (e.g. Python, R)
Fluency in English and local office language is required
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast-paced, intellectually intense, service-oriented environment
Expect up to 60-80% of time spent traveling

Date Posted:
27-Nov-2020
Boston Consulting Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity / expression, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under national, provincial, or local law, where applicable, and those with criminal histories will be considered in a manner consistent with applicable state and local laws.
BCG is an E-Verify Employer.
30+ days ago
Report job"
157,"Associate, Data and Analytics",Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Are you working in an analytics/insight/data science related field, passionate about technology, and excited by exploring and experimenting with the latest techniques to improve business outcomes in areas like sales, marketing, retention, and client experience? If so, apply to join the commercially focused Data & Analytics team in Macquarie’s Banking and Financial Services Group.
With a busy and growing business to support, we are always looking for ways to optimise our client and employee experience, and to reduce risk and costs. Using our data and analytics capability, this could range from designing and automating analytics solutions, to developing interactive metrics and dashboards, through to applying machine learning models to business problems.
To succeed in this role, you will ideally have 1 to 3 years’ experience. You will enjoy working with people and building relationships. You will have good technical skills, but you will also have a strong interest in the business impact and context of your work.
You have a degree in a relevant field (e.g. computer science, applied statistics or mathematics or a related quantitative discipline, such as economics or finance) and are comfortable in a fast-paced, agile environment full of complex technical and business challenges.
You have experience using SQL plus commercial experience with at least one of the following technologies: Tableau/Power BI, Alteryx/Talend and R/Python. Experience with cloud platforms e.g. AWS, Google or Databricks will also be viewed favourably. You will also bring good communication and presentation skills, with the ability to explain complex analytical concepts to people from non-technical teams.
Join our innovative retail bank by applying online today.
About Banking and Financial Services
Banking and Financial Services is Macquarie’s retail banking and financial services business, providing a diverse range of personal banking, wealth management, business banking and vehicle finance products and services to retail clients, advisers, brokers and business clients.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: BFS-955147
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Junior, Data & Analytics
Group: Banking and Financial Services
Division: Product & Technology
Recruiter: Chloe Lee
Opening Date: 11/11/2020
30+ days ago
Report job"
158,Amaris.AI SG - Senior Data Scientist (Natural Language Processing),TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"Amaris.AI is an innovative artificial intelligence solutions provider in intelligent automation and cybersecurity. Our solutions are deployed in fintech, government, telecommunications and manufacturing enterprises. We aspire to advance the age of humanity with innovative applied artificial intelligence and cybersecurity solutions that solve complex problems in the world today.

Job Description
As an Amaris.AI Senior Data Scientist, you will be tasked to deliver outcomes as part of our business overall vision and objectives in a technical or managerial role. You will work closely with our CTO office to deliver cutting-edge natural language processing solutions for internal and external users. Your primary focus is to oversee activities of junior data scientists, build products or deliver projects using cutting edge technology. You will apply state of the art natural language processing solutions to solve complex problems that plague many industries such as healthcare, governments, fintech and many more. Your future progression has other career opportunities into strategic leadership in a technical or managerial role.
Responsibilities
Manage and guide junior data scientists to ensure proper execution of projects or research and development deliverables in line with business vision and objectives.
Provide analysis on research, design, implementation and deployment of artificial intelligence solutions to address client and internal business issues.
Develop, refine and implement state-of-the-art algorithms for product research and development or client solutions via ensemble or artificial intelligence model workflow.
Build APIs to host models as a microservice / container
Perform other duties as delegated by CTO Office.
Skills and Qualifications
Bachelors/Masters/PHD in Data Science/Computer Science/Computer Engineering
At least 5 years of experience in the Data Science Industry
Previous execution and delivery of Natural Language Processing related projects such as Chatbots, Question and Answer, Recommender Engines, Summarization or Information Retrieval.
Strong understanding of traditional machine-learning techniques and data science toolkits (R, Numpy, Weka, Scikit-Learn, H20.AI, Data Robot)
Previous experience of working with state-of-the-art algorithms and ability to develop a custom model from scratch with related transformers o NLP: Document NLP Processing, Transformer Algorithms (BERT, RoBERTa), ELK, Indexing
Strong understanding of deep-learning natural language processing techniques and algorithms
Experience working with text-related databases, datasets, big data, data mining or exacttransfer-load of streaming data.
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes and AI Software Delivery
Strong scripting and programming ability in Python or Java
Self-driven, ability to work independently and cross-functionally in teams.
Ability to apply data science in a business perspective
Strong communication Skills
Bonus
PHD / Academic Publications / Patents.
Participated in Kaggle Competitions / Hackathons / Data Science Competitions
Experience in Fintech/Insurance/Health industries
30+ days ago
Report job"
159,"Analyst, Analytics & Insights",Public Service Commission,"$119,567 a year",Sydney NSW,"Analyst – Clerk Grade 7/8
Analytics and Insights
Public Service Commission

High profile agency
2x ongoing opportunities
Work/life balance
Attractive remuneration package

About the role
We are looking for an experienced Analyst to join our Analytics and Insights team to perform key data analysis and generate insights to support and inform the development of public sector workforce policy and initiatives.

This is a unique opportunity to work in an organisation that is driving change in the NSW Public Sector. If you enjoy working in a job that has influence across a large business group, enjoy using your skills to inform and influence decision making then this is the job for you. Analysts with experience using coding and statistical software such as SPSS, SQL, Python or R would be highly regarded.

We are looking for individuals who can:
Compile, organise and analyse large data sets using various analytical, statistical and data science techniques
Apply data governance principles to manage and resolve data quality issues
Engage, consult and communicate effectively with internal and external stakeholders
Communicate analysis and insights with data visualisations and clear and concise commentary
Apply critical thinking and analysis to data to demonstrate findings of data beyond simple presenting of numbers
Operate in a fast paced, high volume environment

To find out more, view the Role Description.

About the Public Service Commission
The Public Service Commission (PSC) is headed by an independent Public Service Commissioner and is a separate agency under the Government Sector Employment Act 2013 (GSE Act) that supports the Commissioner in the exercise of her functions and powers.

The PSC leads the design, development and implementation of the full range of sector-wide workforce management strategies to enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the NSW government sector.

Talent Pool
The purpose of this recruitment is to fill two ongoing Analyst roles within the Analytics and Design team and to also create an Analyst talent pool. A talent pool is used to fill future ongoing and temporary vacancies as they arise and remains valid for 18 months.

Am I eligible to apply?
To be eligible to apply you must be either:
An Australian citizen, or
A permanent resident of Australia, or
A New Zealand citizen with a current New Zealand passport.

Applying for the role
Applicants must apply through www.iworkfor.nsw.gov.au (search by job reference number 000085RP).

The application and selection process will include a range of assessment techniques to assist in determining your suitability for the role. For the initial application process, you should submit a short covering letter including responses to the targeted questions, your resume and answer the pre-screening questions.

Please note we may seek verification of the experience, skills and qualifications you provide in your application from your nominated referee or educational institution.

For questions about the role, please contact Ying Ying Chen, Senior Analyst, on (02) 9272 6016.

For questions or to request a reasonable adjustment, please contact Elleanor Wood on (02) 9272 6152 or PSC_HR@psc.nsw.gov.au

Further information to assist you with applying for this role:
PSC Applicant Information Package
Applying for a role in the NSW Public Service

Please visit our website to learn more about the workings of the Commission http://www.psc.nsw.gov.au/

Closing Date: Sunday, 28 February 2021 (at 11.59pm)

The NSW Government is a proud employer of a diverse workforce. We encourage applications from everyone regardless of age, gender, ethnicity, cultural background, or sexual orientation. We are committed to reflecting the diverse community we serve and creating an inclusive and flexible workplace.
People with disability are supported to access adjustments in recruitment processes and in the workplace, to enable them to demonstrate their skills and capabilities to meet the requirements of the job.

As supporters of flexible working, we understand that flexibility means different things to different people. We welcome discussions about how our roles can be undertaken flexibly, including through job share arrangements.

Key Application Responses
Please answer the following questions by providing tangible examples. The responses you provide may be verified should you progress to interview and by your referees. Responses for each question should be limited to approximately 300 words.

Provide an example of a complex analysis you have completed. What were the requirements, what was your role, what analytical techniques did you use and how did you overcome any problems encountered to ensure the result met the requirements in terms of both content and timeframe?
Provide an example of a paper or report you contributed to where you generated insights from analysis to tell the story. What was your role, the type of insights you generated, and your approach in presenting the story, eg commentary, visualisations etc.
NSW Public Service Commission
3 days ago
Report job"
160,Data Analyst/Data Scientist - Manager,PwC,Not shown,Perth WA,"Line of Service
Assurance
Industry/Sector
Not Applicable
Specialism
Risk
Management Level
Manager
Job Description & Summary
With PwC, you’ll ignite a meaningful career while being supported by a flexible working culture, innovative learning and development opportunities and progressive policies and benefits, such as 18 weeks paid parental leave for mums, dads and foster carers (no minimum service!)
What will you create?
You’ll help Australian businesses, not-for-profits and governments create value and improve the way they work. From digitising healthcare, to creating smarter cities and igniting our start-up industry, together we build trust in society and solve important problems.
Our Data Assurance team brings this to life by helping clients to protect and strengthen every aspect of their business; from people to performance, systems to strategy and business plans to business resilience. You’ll use your data analysis and visualisation skills to communicate insights for some of Australia's largest energy, resources, utilities, government and health organisations. Helping them to solve problems such as automating financial and operational processes, digitising reporting, remediating business issues using data and identifying fraudulent activities through cross functional testing.
As a Manager in our Data Assurance team your impact will be seen by:
Building professional relationships and providing businesses with confidence through successful delivery of innovative digital and automated solutions to improve efficiency and quality of business processes
Partnering with clients to enable them to understand the value in their data through analytics and visualisation, pairing your technical capabilities with strong communication skills and the ability to engage with a variety of stakeholders
Managing all elements of client projects, to help businesses make sense of complex data sets and given them the confidence they are doing things right
About you
You have 5-8 years experience with demonstrated strengths in client engagement and project management, underpinned by degree-level or higher qualifications in Data Science, Computer Science / Programming, Applied Statistics / Mathematics, Econometrics, Finance, Accounting, Commerce, Science or Engineering . Experience in Assurance and/or Consulting highly desirable. You have working knowledge of process automation, reporting digitisation, and data governance / transformation / analysis, as well as solution delivery comprising Alteryx, Sql, Python, R, PowerBI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Tableau and/or Qlik Sense. You know how to harness the power of digitisation, big data and automation tools to transform the way Assurance services are provided at PwC.
Passionate about being at the forefront of change, you’re ready to help our Assurance team solve complex business issues, improve how systems work and provide confidence on the bigger decisions.
You’re collaborative and enjoy working in an innovative environment. You’re a problem solver by nature and want to join a firm that values the kind of people who reimagine the possible for their clients and stakeholders. Most importantly, you act with integrity and show care for the people you work with.
Life at PwC
Our culture and benefits are something we’re proud of, and also why we’re consistently named as one of Australia’s best workplaces. With PwC, you’ll belong to an inclusive community where differences are both embraced and the underlying driver in everything we create together.
We empower you with the technology, coaching, flexibility and trust needed to make a meaningful difference, while supporting you in bringing your whole self to work each day. We’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce because we know it’s only by working together that we can realise the potential of our people, clients and society around us.
We’re living this commitment through initiatives including our Reconciliation Action Plan to increase Indigenous employment and employee-led diversity networks promoting cultural, disability, LGBTI and gender equality. At our core we’re a people business, which means you’ll be supported not just in your professional development but your personal growth as well.
Liza Darnell is the Recruitment Manager for the role. As the team experiences high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a timely and fair process for all.
Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)
Degrees/Field of Study required:
Degrees/Field of Study preferred:
Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)
Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)
Travel Requirements
Not Specified
Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?
Yes
Government Clearance Required?
No
Job Posting End Date
March 31, 2021
15 days ago
Report job"
161,Chief Data Scientists,The Star Entertainment Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About The Star
The Star Entertainment Group’s vision is to be Australia’s leading integrated resort company. Attracting 18 million guests each year, The Star Entertainment Group’s properties across Sydney, Brisbane and the Gold Coast are world class tourist destinations that offer visitors a diverse selection of award-winning restaurants, bars, cafes, nightclubs, accommodation and gaming entertainment options.
We are seeking an energetic, and innovative Chief Data Scientist that can work within these areas to deliver the master plan and our objectives and can positively influence the broader group on this journey of change.
As the Chief Data Scientist, you will be responsible for managing the data science team to deliver technical requirements assigned by the Analytics Steerco; the optimisation teams delivering various optimisation inputs to the business (including the labour optimisation portfolio and its operational responsibilities); and bring thought leadership and best-practice techniques to the overall Insights & Analytics function
Key Responsibilities
Deliver the use analytics use cases assigned by the Analytics steerco and socialise its features, applications and business value to relevant stakeholders
Proactively generate optimisation opportunities in gaming, marketing, labour and other operational situations
Lead innovation in data analytics as well as finding opportunities in existing and new sources of data.
Developing ‘test and learn’ framework (to support innovation)
Determine ideal optimal table spreads
Technical Capabilities
Be able to create insights from data
Use data to forecast and drive predictive insights Data science & governance
Strong communication skills and ability to collaborate with stakeholders
Skills and Experience
Minimum 10 years’ experience in a senior role in gaming related to insights and analytics
Exposure to gaming systems & proficiency in the preparation of analytical presentations.
Outstanding attention to detail.
Understanding of casino rules and regulations and reporting requirements.
Our Culture
We are committed to our people. We recognise the importance of each team member and strive to provide a workplace that empowers staff to be the best they can be.
“The Star Entertainment Group is committed to building a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to building a diverse workforce that reflects our community.”
Our Benefits
Ongoing career development and training programs via The Star Academy
Discounted staff parking
FREE meals and fruit daily
Free light rail travel between Central Station and The Star
Discounts across The Star's Hotels and Restaurants
Proposed salary including super $240,000 to $250,000
It's your move
If you've got the drive to inspire change, grow with our business and the desire to achieve extraordinary things, come and play with us at The Star. Make your next move by clicking the link below.
** No Agencies please **
14 days ago
Report job"
162,Senior Data Scientist,Vic Auditor-General Office,Not shown,Melbourne City Centre VIC,"Who we are
We play a critical role in holding the public sector to account by reviewing how effectively agencies deliver services and use public funds.
VAGO is filled with people who love what they do, enact change and uphold our values. We are a workforce of highly motivated, empathetic and collaborative people, who encourage innovation and knowledge sharing.
We encourage and celebrate our diversity, and actively support flexibility and work/life balance.
What you'll do
Reporting to the Lead Data Scientist, you'll work under limited supervision to:

Apply data and statistical analytics to government data to drive transparency and accountability through our performance audit program
Play a leading role in collaborating with performance audit teams
Use imagination and creativity to discover problems and devise data driven solutions using available data
Establish and maintain positive relationships with internal and external partners
Apply auditing standards and guidelines, audit methodology and processes
Drive an evidence-based, scientific approach to performance audit
Teach and learn every day to continuously develop your own and others' technical and professional skills
Who you are
We're looking for tertiary qualified data professionals with several years' experience. You have proven your ability to engage with stakeholders, help define and understand problems, develop responses using the available data then deliver solutions using your technical skills.

You have several years' experience working in:
Data analytics, business intelligence, decision support, operations research, or similar
Applied knowledge of audit, investigations or risk management would be well regarded
Experience in leadership and stakeholder management
You also have:
Highly developed communication and social skills
A drive to use creativity and imagination
Willingness to use initiative and challenge the status-quo
Alignment with the established VAGO values
You'll demonstrate advanced programming expertise in Python, R, SQL or similar. Qualifications requirements are found in the position description which is available on our careers page.
We look for the best people to join us, but it's not just about technical skills! If you have some development areas, we're keen to explore options including negotiating the role requirements to better suit your skillset.
Why join us
We audit every sector of government, so you will enjoy unparalleled access to government data sets, which you'll use to improve the lives of Victorians.
You'll enjoy ultra-progressive approach to work/life balance. This includes working where you want, when you want (between 7-7 weekdays), and as much as you want (minimum part time requirements apply).
How to apply
VAGO strongly encourages applications from First Nation Peoples and/or people who are differently abled.
Click the “Apply Now” button and send us your resume and brief cover letter highlighting your relevant experience (1-2 pages).
If you require adjustments to the recruitment and selection process, or require an alternative format to any of the application material, please reach to the contact person listed on this ad.
We're not about red tape, so a separate response to selection criteria isn't needed.
11 days ago
Report job"
163,AI Engineer - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP,Oracle,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"AI Engineer - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP-20000SHC

Applicants are required to read, write, and speak the following languages: English
Preferred Qualifications

AI Engineer - Digital Assistant and Bots Platform Team

We are a newly formed group within Oracle creating innovative products that leverage the power of AI and Machine Learning to bring world-class speech, vision and natural language capabilities to Oracle’s Digital Assistant platform. We are like a start-up inside a large company with a big charter and a lot of creative freedom. We have assembled some of the smartest people in the industry and are growing this team.
If you are looking for an exciting new opportunity as a data scientist to help solve difficult problems, be creative, create success for customers, and engage with the product team to do some innovative research and development, please review our profile.

We are looking for someone who is:

Experienced with Machine Learning and AI especially deep learning models.
Experienced with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch.
Experienced with Conversational AI / Chatbots and/or Digital Assistants, including having developed a Chatbot or similar Digital Assistant is a plus.
Ph.D. degree in computer science on natural language processing, speech processing, computer vision is preferred but not a must. A strong publication record is a plus.
Possesses excellent communication skills with an ability to explain and write specifications that embody complex concepts to stakeholders within the team.
Eager to work on a highly sellable, performance optimized infrastructure which elastically handles customer needs.
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment and can quickly adjust to changing priorities.
Detail oriented with a focus on quality of the product, data, and code.
An experienced engineer with 3+ years of professional development in Java, C#, C++ or Python. Java and Python preferred. JavaScript, Node.js, HTML/CSS and Mobile development on Android/iOS is a plus.

DUTIES:

Keep track of and experiment with state of the art dialog systems both from academia and industry to keep pushing the market competitiveness of ODA.
Involve in all steps of software life cycle such as planning, coding, testing and maintenance to productize developed models.
Involve in planning and budgeting product roadmap.
Write papers/reports and communicate results to stakeholders and customers.
Require to communicate and coordinate with ODA head office (California) and European team as necessary which may include travel and after-hour participation.
Detailed Description and Job Requirements
Design, develop, troubleshoot and debug software programs for databases, applications, tools, networks etc.

As a member of the software engineering division, you will take an active role in the definition and evolution of standard practices and procedures. You will be responsible for defining and developing software for tasks associated with the developing, designing and debugging of software applications or operating systems.

Work is non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in area of specialization. Leading contributor individually and as a team member, providing direction and mentoring to others. BS or MS degree or equivalent experience relevant to functional area. 7 years of software engineering or related experience.
Job: Product Development
Location: AU-AU,Australia-Melbourne
Other Locations: AU-AU,Australia-Sydney
Job Type: Regular Employee Hire
Organization: Oracle
Just posted
Report job"
164,Data Scientist,Sherpa,Not shown,Australia,"About the Role
Sherpa's mission is to change the way retailers execute their last mile fulfilment – driven by our industry-leading technology and customer-centric approach. Our intuitive delivery and fleet management tools, easy to-use booking platform and one Australia’s largest fleets of crowd-sourced drivers, boasts a unique solution that offers unprecedented flexibility for businesses big and small.
Our leading Last Mile Logistics SaaS platform is currently searching for a Data Scientist to join our fast-growing team. The ideal candidate will be intricately involved in running analytical experiments in a methodical manner, develop dynamic and regularly evaluate alternate pricing models via theoretical approaches. This is the perfect opportunity for the successful candidate to become a part of an innovative and energetic team that develops analysis tools which will influence both our products and clients.
Who You Are?
A technologist & mathematician. You apply your technical prowess and mathematical expertise to wrangle large amounts of data to gain insights into challenging business problems.
A self-starter. You work well with little direction and seek out how you can add value to the business.
Innovative. You love to question current ways of working and relish the opportunity to develop and present data-driven improvements that create greater value to the business.
An amazing problem solver. You don’t shy away from challenges and can come up with innovative and elegant solutions.
What You'll Do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Collaborate with product management and sales departments to understand company needs and devise key solutions
Leverage technology to enhance existing reporting to deliver insightful and reliable data to key stakeholders through simplified presentations
Be our Continuous Improvement champion, staying close to latest systems so that opportunities for streamlining reporting and time saving simplification can be rolled out across National Finance
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive tangible business outcomes
Respond to ad-hoc requests for information / insights from business partners and be able to manage competing priorities. Use your initiative to swiftly resolve requests
What You'll Need:
Masters degree in data science, computer science, mathematics or equivalent
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience
Finance experience is preferred but not essential
A high level of proficiency with programming languages used in data science, including python and SQL
Strong experience using both financial and non-financial systems in a commercial environment e.g. Excel
Experience with Business Intelligence tools
Experience with ETL tools and techniques is highly regarded but not essential
Experience with machine learning is highly regarded but not essential
Strong data analysis skills & Presentation skills making the complex simple
Strong communication skills - able to effectively communicate key messages to relevant stakeholders
Have an inquisitive and proactive mindset, work with the team to understand where systems can be leveraged to free up time while delivering better outcomes
Able to self prioritise workloads and concurrently manage stakeholder expectations
Analytical mind and business acumen
Sherpa welcomes people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to deliver nothing short of excellence and who embrace the adventure and enjoy the ride! So if you are interested in joining us behind the wheel and believe you can help to drive our Community to become our greatest advocates then we’d love to hear from you!
How to Apply
Send your cover letter and resume to info@sherpa.net.au and we will get in touch with you soon.
30+ days ago
Report job"
165,Senior Manager - Data Scientist,Capgemini Australia,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"REINVENT YOURSELF WITH THE BEST.
Capgemini Invent is the global strategy and transformation consulting team at Capgemini Group. We ideate and bring to life what's next for our clients by combining strategy, technology, data science and creative design expertise. Our Insight-Driven Enterprise team help our clients create a smart organisation using data, AI & analytics to gain insights and enable better decisions - for customers, operations and the workforce.

The focus of your role:
As our Insights-Driven Enterprise team grows we need a Senior Manager who can combine their consulting skills and Data Science expertise to work with our clients to create advanced model and lead them through innovative environments.
You'll define, design and deliver strategic data science implementations, leveraging cloud environments to drive results in projects. You'll help our clients seize new opportunities and realise the value of data by trying new things, testing-and-learning, not being afraid to fail (quickly) and critically being able to rapidly scale and integrate successes for true competitive advantage.

What you'll do:
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be a key partner to our clients and be involved in innovating, designing and delivering high-value data science use cases, mentoring and managing teams to deliver high-quality projects.

Develop and maintain senior client relationships being a senior advisor to CxO's and enabling continued growth.
Develop new client propositions leveraging data to grow existing and new client accounts.
Provide thought leadership to advance your reputation as a SME and a trusted data partner with internal and external audiences.
Create intuitive models to solve client problems with realistic and understandable metrics.
Design and produce detailed client roadmaps and strategies for adoption of data science.
Work with vague (and sometimes complicated) project requirements, understanding how to evaluate and discover the best approaches to delivering.
Work in a flexible and dynamic team that enables work to fit your lifestyle.
What you'll bring:
6+ years experience in a data scientist type role working with multifunction teams.
Strong comprehension of data science techniques, both in theory and in practice.
Proven experience in cloud-based data science projects.
An active business and commercial acumen with clients, coupled with demonstrated experience in growing client accounts.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment, leading a client along the data science journey to achieve transformation outcomes.
Understand how to work with Python 3 in a production environment, any additional languages such as R, C/C++, or Java are a bonus.
Can quickly learn and be impactful in new areas to keep pace with our rapid growth and evolution
A higher degree in a relevant field.
What can we offer you?
Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.
As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:
Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.
Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.
Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.
Recognised by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee's stories.
Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures.

Please note unsolicited resumes from employment agencies or other third parties will not be considered.
#invent
#LI-LB1
27 days ago
Report job"
166,Graduate Data Engineer,Ventia,Not shown,Perth WA,"The Company
Ventia are one of the largest suppliers of essential services in the region and are proud to provide the expertise to keep infrastructure working for our communities. No one else does exactly what we do in the way we do it.
The Role
Ventia are currently looking to engage a Graduate Data Engineer which will see you working at a Defence Base in East Fremantle within a well-established Asset team.
As a Graduate Data Engineer your duties will include
Asset Data Base Program Development and continuous Improvement
Provide Estate Data Configuration Control SME support within the Region
Drive adherence of Estate Data Configuration Control delivery.
Support Estate Data Configuration Control Program Delivery Analytics Development and take ownership of Program Monitoring and reporting
Drive a culture of delivering customer and stakeholder value.
Carry out all work activities upholding the Company values of Integrity, Ingenuity, Collaboration and Challenge.
Actively participate in the Performance and Development Review process.
Positively contribute to a diverse, inclusive, and fair work environment, free from discrimination, bullying and harassment.
Carry out all duties in line with Company policies and procedures as amended from time to time.
Skills and Experience
Relevant Degree in Data Science or a related discipline
Demonstrated organisational skills.
Demonstrated interpersonal communication skills and the ability to work as a member of a team.
Demonstrated written communication and IT skills Database, Excel, Word.
An ability to work flexibly and adaptively in a complex environment with multiple stakeholders.
If you enjoy a challenge and would like to be part of our dynamic, growing and exciting company, apply now.
You must be an Australian citizen and able to obtain and maintain a Department of Defence Security Clearance to apply.
Ventia Pty Limited
17 days ago
Report job"
167,Senior Data Scientist,KBR,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Title:
Senior Data Scientist
Is the future as exciting to you as it is to us?
Are you passionate about digital innovation and data driven solutions?
At KBR we are paving the way in how we do things. Creativity, collaboration and excellence is what KBR’s core is made up of. Does this resonate with you?
We value an inclusive and diverse work environment and are working together to build a culture that embraces each other’s unique strengths and experiences.
Our people are important to us and are what makes our business successful. Therefore, we realise it is important to nurture a culture of trust giving you the freedom to step up and take opportunities that challenge you and push your career to the next level. We will encourage you to work in a way that suits you and look forward to discussing what you need to be successful.
The Opportunity
KBR’s Infrastructure Services Business is reimagining how we deliver and transforming into a digitally enabled business. Our strategy focuses on data-driven solutions, using cloud-based data analytics to provide improved outcomes for our clients and our business. The Senior Data Scientist will work within the Digital Transformation team, providing specialist advice and best practice solutions to internal and external stakeholders. The role will use both technology and support from domain experts to identify trends based on context in a professional services business. They will support the development of BI tools for the analysis of strategic data, allowing the business to interrogate and report on data trends that further improve its decision making and performance.
Core tasks include educating functional teams on how to understand and utilise their data. In many cases, this includes designing data models and using PowerBI services to surface data, though often requires integration with other business software. Guidance is provided to teams that are less familiar with BI principles, or that have less structured data. Other functions include coordination or engagement with other digital transformation initiatives, and support in the development of a digitally enabled and interconnected business.
Who are you?
If you have qualifications in Computer Science, Data Science or Information Systems with 6+ years experience in a similar role we would love to hear from you. We are seeking a technically savvy candidate, with competency and enthusiasm in data management and mathematics, able to problem solve and create innovative analytical solutions and build relationships within different business units. Previous experience with Power BI service, DAX & M is necessary, with knowledge in portfolio management, project controls, and information management advantageous. You are comfortable working autonomously where necessary and enjoy a balance of technical work and engagement with stakeholder groups. Inter-industry experience is often valuable, however relevance and applicability needs to be clearly communicated in your application.
About Us
KBR have been established for over 100 years and we pride ourselves on being an innovative and forward-thinking company with a reputation for delivering on some of the most challenging and complex engineering projects in the world.
So how do I apply?
If what you've read resonates with your values, experience and career aspiration then we want to hear from you! Just click apply and upload your resume and cover letter.
KBR values an inclusive and diverse work environment and we encourage candidates from all backgrounds to apply. Our hiring decisions are based on the key requirements of each role and candidates are selected based on their unique strengths and experiences.
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
25 days ago
Report job"
168,Financial Advisory - Forensic Analytics - 2022 Graduate Program (Sydney),Deloitte,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Date: 20-Jan-2021

Location:
Sydney, NSW, AU

Department: Financial Advisory

Description:
Be part of Australia’s largest cohort of graduates – meaning you’ll have a community of other grads to lean on and learn from!
Receive unparalleled professional development through our year-round graduate training program, D|Academy.
Roll up your sleeves for worthwhile causes on our annual volunteer day, Impact Day, or by working on pro-bono projects.

Are you excited to be a part of the team dealing with real and ever-present threats such as fraud, corruption and money laundering?

What will you get to do?
No two days are the same in the Forensic Analytics Graduate program. We provide consultancy and support to clients on a wide range of financial crime and regulatory issues that include money laundering, financial crime and fraud. We look for needles in the massive haystacks of data and information that can signal trouble in the making. Pretty cool, right?

Your future starts with us.
As part of the Forensic family, we're a fast-growing team of trusted advisors who help clients manage their growing regulatory and customer demands for fraud mitigation. In this diverse team, you’ll be involved in:

Data visualisation, statistical and quantitative analysis, explanatory and predictive modelling information to facilitate an informed decision-making process for clients
Continuous monitoring of client’s transactions and activities
Identification of new opportunities for clients through better utilisation of data

Enough about us, let’s talk about you.
You are an inquisitive student with a knack for solving complex problems. You may also have:

A passion for data analysis and presenting data for visual impact
Completed or may be completing a degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, Actuarial Science, Physics, IT, Engineering, Computer Science, Commerce or equivalent field(s)
Is quick to learn, naturally inquisitive and always up for a challenge
Is excited an open to learning new ways of working
Australian permanent residency or Australian/New Zealand Citizenship (required)

Why Deloitte?
At Deloitte, we create positively differentiated work experiences that enable our people to feel valued and achieve their full potential. We value difference and embrace people with diverse backgrounds and thinking styles. Knowing that people work best in different ways, we are happy to discuss alternative arrangements if the working pattern you are looking for is not specifically indicated.
1 day ago
Report job"
169,Data Scientist,Amplifon,Not shown,Mulgrave VIC,"About the business
We are proud to be part of Amplifon Group – the global leader in hearing healthcare. With over 16,000 employees located across 29 countries, we transform the way hearing healthcare is perceived and experienced worldwide, changing the lives of millions of customers through the passion and superior care of our People. We offer exclusive, all around, highly customised hearing care solutions and services, guiding our customers through their hearing journey to rediscover all the emotions of sound. Together, we make more possible everyday!
About the role
We have a newly created opportunity for a Data Science leader to join our Marketing and CRM Function. Reporting to the Head of CRM and Operations, you will play a leadership role for data science across the organisation. With exposure to the entire business and customer journey, you will work to optimise marketing campaigns to generate business opportunity and growth.
To be successful you will have a curiosity streak, coupled with an ability to think critically and problem solve means that you always leave things in a much better state than what you found them in.

This is a great opportunity to lead how Amplifon approaches data science and optimise the end-to-end delivery of data and analytics by working across both projects and BaU in agile and traditional models.

The key accountabilities of the Data Scientist includes but not limited to:
Playing a key leadership role in the Amplifon data science community where you will focus on uplifting how Amplifon's data science competencies and acting as a key advocate for data literacy across the company
Use advanced analytics methods to extract insights from business data
Participation in the delivery of a suite strategically-identified, cutting-edge data science use-cases that will cover the entire customer journey
Perform analysis and build data-driven models to answer business questions and needs
Create hypotheses and experiments to identify hidden relationships to direct new Sales strategies
Developing visualisations and presentations that you will use to influence key stakeholders to implement key recommendations from data science initiatives
Develop machine learning models with the aim to facilitate Sales processes
Working with other team members across Marketing/CRM, IT, Reporting & Analytics to develop operational processes, practices and pipelines
Working with our Data Governance function to identify opportunities and uplift data collection and quality practices
Benefits and perks
Attractive and competitive base salary, tools of the trade
4 weeks annual leave + Birthday leave!
A structured career path to help achieve your goals including potential opportunity in the future for a global assignment
Amplifon training, career development and lots of e-learning tools
Yearly flu vaccinations
Join our conferences and team functions throughout the year
About You
Degree in quantitative fields like Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Computing and Engineering
A background in data science, that preferably covers both but with one mandatory;
Digital, customer or retail data science with experience in churn analytics, sentiment analysis (including data from voice and social/ text), customer segmentation, life time value model development and supporting call centre analytics and operations
IoT/OT based-data science preferably but not mandatorily in the power generation space with exposure to OSIsoft PI or similar OT technologies
Expertise in management of complex structures of data
Have a strong inclination to data analysis combined with same attention to business impacts
Possess strong analytical skills, mathematic abilities and business acumen
Possess critical thinking, a clear and open communication, relational and team building skills
Excellent written and verbal communication with the ability to share information.
Excellent knowledge of Office package, with advanced expertise in Excel (pivot, macro, statistics formulas)
Excellent knowledge of SQL
Knowledge of R or Python; nice to have knowledge of PowerBI, SSRS, Dataiku
Demonstrated success in influencing stakeholders to deliver business results, sales and customer satisfaction improvements
Able to build long-lasting relationships with customers, both internal and external, based on trust, professionalism and rapport.
Open minded to change and always seek to improve your way of working, knowledge and attitude
A self-starter approach with the confidence to look beyond the “here and now” for the “what could be”
An alignment with company values
A positive “can-do” attitude
Organised, with attention to detail
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment, with conflicting time demands
Ability to manage expectations & deliverables for multiple stakeholders
If this sounds like you, apply NOW today!
As an employer who embraces Equal Opportunity and promotes diversity, we encourage persons of all ages and backgrounds, including Indigenous Australians, to apply.
30+ days ago
Report job"
170,Applied Scientist - Machine Learning Products,Xero,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Xero is a beautiful, easy-to-use platform that helps small businesses and their accounting and bookkeeping advisors grow and thrive.

At Xero, our purpose is to make life better for people in small business, their advisors, and communities around the world. This purpose sits at the centre of everything we do. We support our people to do the best work of their lives so that they can help small businesses succeed through better tools, information and connections. Because when they succeed they make a difference, and when millions of small businesses are making a difference, the world is a more beautiful place.

Are you inspired by delivering real-world impact through your work?
Do you want to work with awesome colleagues to solve challenging problems?
Do you want to grow your skills in a supportive environment?

We are the Data Team. A collective of specialists driven by our shared mission to help establish Xero as the most insightful and trusted small business platform. Our backgrounds and work are diverse—we work on data platforms, data modelling, application development, applied research, ethics, literacy, and strategy, to name a few. At the heart of our mission is helping our colleagues and customers get value from data responsibly, on robust data platforms, with robust methods.

Applied Scientists work in cross-functional teams (engineers, designers, product managers, etc) to create AI-powered experiences. We apply machine learning to develop products that reduce toil and provide insight, allowing small businesses to focus on what matters.

What you'll do
Immerse yourself in vast quantities of messy and complex data, figuring out what it means and whether it’s useful for machine learning product development
Work on analyses, proofs of concept and production-grade product development using a variety of machine learning techniques
Generate hypotheses, conduct experiments, and analyze results. Rinse and repeat.
Collaborate with engineers to build, maintain, and operate end-to-end machine learning pipelines for training and inference at scale
Stay up to date with developments in artificial intelligence
Consider the ethics of your work and keep our customers’ interests in focus
Identify issues with our data and work with teams to diagnose and rectify the problem

About you
You rejoice in identifying tough problems that can be solved using scientific thinking, algorithms and analytical data processing
You read ML research papers, keep abreast of new work on arXiv.org and sometimes spend your weekends tinkering around with that interesting new framework you read about recently. But ultimately, you relish simple and robust solutions to real problems
You instinctively seek to understand how machine learning will impact customer experiences and society more broadly
You have at least a years’ experience working on a team that has delivered a machine learning project to a production environment
You take pride in writing high quality, documented, and maintainable code
You know your way around the ‘nix command line, ssh-ing your way into virtual machines or containers; and
You can write Python, Scala or similar

What you'll bring
Ability to think about both the business and machine learning domains
Sound software engineering skills in Python, Scala, or similar
Hands on practitioner skills in one or more of: time series forecasting, natural language processing, classical machine learning, deep learning
An understanding of the mathematical concepts behind the techniques and toolkits
Comfortable with version control and command line
Strong communication skills and the ability to tailor a message for peers, and stakeholders (technical and non-technical)
Why Xero?

At Xero we support many types of flexible working arrangements that allow you to balance your work, your life and your passions. We offer a great remuneration package including shares plus a range of leave options to suit your well-being. Our work environment encourages continuous improvement and career development and you’ll get to work with the latest technology.

Our collaborative and inclusive culture is one we’re immensely proud of. We know that a diverse workforce is a strength that enables businesses, including ours, to better understand and serve customers, attract top talent and innovate successfully. We are a member of Pride in Diversity, in recognition of our inclusive workplace. So, from the moment you step through our doors, you’ll feel welcome and supported to do the best work of your life.
26 days ago
Report job"
171,Applied Machine Learning Scientist,Zendesk,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Job Description
At Zendesk, our focus is helping our customers build great relationships with their customers. Founded by three Danish entrepreneurs, Zendesk has experienced remarkable success and growth while maintaining a fun, community oriented, and down-to-earth culture.
As part of our team, you will work at a scale where the challenges start to get seriously interesting. You will get a chance to do cool things with a diverse bunch of people while working in the Melbourne office that is home to Zendesk’s first machine learning (ML) research team. We have built and launched a number of machine-learning-powered products such as Answer Bot, Content Cues and Satisfaction Prediction. In 2019, we expanded the footprint of the Machine Learning team to our Copenhagen and San Francisco offices which means that you will have opportunities for global collaborations.
What you get to do every day:
Collaborate with product and engineering teams to craft machine-learning-powered features, and scale to delight millions of users a day.
Take your models from concept to production.
Solve meaningful NLP problems with recent ML techniques including neural networks in TensorFlow.
Write and deploy production-grade code.
Collaborate with hardworking, intelligent and humble colleagues.
Present your work to a multi-disciplinary, global audience.
What you'll bring to the role:
A solid foundation in statistical machine learning techniques (experience with deep learning and/or NLP a bonus).
Well developed written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to convey technical concepts to a diverse audience of stakeholders.
A calm demeanour and collaborative attitude with the internal fire to deliver.
A positive, solution driven, pragmatic mindset which can recast “problems” into “opportunities”.
A commitment to continuous learning.
You have been working in Python, R or Scala. You are comfortable with at least one deep learning framework.
Zendesk Machine Learning believes in fostering a calm, collaborative, and focused environment that respects the importance of our products to our customers, without taking ourselves too seriously. Our approach to solving technically demanding problems is to focus on trying and learning new things, not just ticking boxes. That, and having fun.

Zendesk builds software for better customer relationships. It empowers organizations to improve customer engagement and better understand their customers. Zendesk products are easy to use and implement. They give organizations the flexibility to move quickly, focus on innovation, and scale with their growth.
More than 150,000 paid customer accounts in over 150 countries and territories use Zendesk products. Based in San Francisco, Zendesk has operations in the United States, Europe, Asia, Australia, and South America.

Interested in knowing what we do in the community? Check out the Zendesk Neighbor Foundation to learn more about how we engage with, and provide support to, our local communities.

Zendesk is an equal opportunity employer, and we’re proud of our ongoing efforts to foster global diversity, equity, & inclusion in the workplace. Individuals seeking employment at Zendesk are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, medical condition, ancestry, physical or mental disability, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.
By submitting your application, you agree that Zendesk may collect your personal data for recruiting, global organization planning, and related purposes. Zendesk's Candidate Privacy Notice explains what personal information Zendesk may process, where Zendesk may process your personal information, its purposes for processing your personal information, and the rights you can exercise over Zendesk’s use of your personal information.
22 days ago
Report job"
172,Applied Machine Learning Scientist,Zendesk,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Job Description
At Zendesk, our focus is helping our customers build great relationships with their customers. Founded by three Danish entrepreneurs, Zendesk has experienced remarkable success and growth while maintaining a fun, community oriented, and down-to-earth culture.
As part of our team, you will work at a scale where the challenges start to get seriously interesting. You will get a chance to do cool things with a diverse bunch of people while working in the Melbourne office that is home to Zendesk’s first machine learning (ML) research team. We have built and launched a number of machine-learning-powered products such as Answer Bot, Content Cues and Satisfaction Prediction. In 2019, we expanded the footprint of the Machine Learning team to our Copenhagen and San Francisco offices which means that you will have opportunities for global collaborations.
What you get to do every day:
Collaborate with product and engineering teams to craft machine-learning-powered features, and scale to delight millions of users a day.
Take your models from concept to production.
Solve meaningful NLP problems with recent ML techniques including neural networks in TensorFlow.
Write and deploy production-grade code.
Collaborate with hardworking, intelligent and humble colleagues.
Present your work to a multi-disciplinary, global audience.
What you'll bring to the role:
A solid foundation in statistical machine learning techniques (experience with deep learning and/or NLP a bonus).
Well developed written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to convey technical concepts to a diverse audience of stakeholders.
A calm demeanour and collaborative attitude with the internal fire to deliver.
A positive, solution driven, pragmatic mindset which can recast “problems” into “opportunities”.
A commitment to continuous learning.
You have been working in Python, R or Scala. You are comfortable with at least one deep learning framework.
Zendesk Machine Learning believes in fostering a calm, collaborative, and focused environment that respects the importance of our products to our customers, without taking ourselves too seriously. Our approach to solving technically demanding problems is to focus on trying and learning new things, not just ticking boxes. That, and having fun.

Zendesk builds software for better customer relationships. It empowers organizations to improve customer engagement and better understand their customers. Zendesk products are easy to use and implement. They give organizations the flexibility to move quickly, focus on innovation, and scale with their growth.
More than 150,000 paid customer accounts in over 150 countries and territories use Zendesk products. Based in San Francisco, Zendesk has operations in the United States, Europe, Asia, Australia, and South America.

Interested in knowing what we do in the community? Check out the Zendesk Neighbor Foundation to learn more about how we engage with, and provide support to, our local communities.

Zendesk is an equal opportunity employer, and we’re proud of our ongoing efforts to foster global diversity, equity, & inclusion in the workplace. Individuals seeking employment at Zendesk are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, medical condition, ancestry, physical or mental disability, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.
By submitting your application, you agree that Zendesk may collect your personal data for recruiting, global organization planning, and related purposes. Zendesk's Candidate Privacy Notice explains what personal information Zendesk may process, where Zendesk may process your personal information, its purposes for processing your personal information, and the rights you can exercise over Zendesk’s use of your personal information.
22 days ago
Report job"
173,Senior Data Scientist,Boston Consulting Group,Not shown,Canberra ACT,"Location:
Canberra, Melbourne, Perth, Sydney
Geography:
Asia Pacific
Capabilities:
Big data & advanced analytics
Industries:
Technology industries
Who We Are
Boston Consulting Group partners with leaders in business and society to tackle their most important challenges and capture their greatest opportunities. BCG was the pioneer in business strategy when it was founded in 1963. Today, we help clients with total transformation-inspiring complex change, enabling organizations to grow, building competitive advantage, and driving bottom-line impact.

To succeed, organizations must blend digital and human capabilities. Our diverse, global teams bring deep industry and functional expertise and a range of perspectives to spark change. BCG delivers solutions through leading-edge management consulting along with technology and design, corporate and digital ventures—and business purpose. We work in a uniquely collaborative model across the firm and throughout all levels of the client organization, generating results that allow our clients to thrive.
Practice Area Profile
BCG GAMMA combines innovative skills in computer science, artificial intelligence, statistics, and machine learning with deep industry expertise. The BCG GAMMA team is comprised of world-class data scientists and business consultants who specialize in the use of advanced analytics to get breakthrough business results. Our teams own the full analytics value-chain end to end: framing new business challenges, building fact-bases, designing innovative algorithms, creating scale through designing tools and apps, and training colleagues and clients in new solutions. Here at BCG GAMMA, you’ll have the chance to work with clients in every BCG region and every industry area. We are also a core member of a rapidly growing analytics enterprise at BCG - a constellation of teams focused on driving practical results for BCG clients by applying leading edge analytics approaches, data, and technology.
What You'll Do
We’re looking for a passionate and talented Senior Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing team. In this role, you’ll have the chance to roll up your sleeves and apply data science methods and analytics to real-world business situations across a variety of industries. As the field of advanced analytics is rapidly evolving, the SDS is responsible for staying current on leading-edge business applications, tools and approaches, proactively working with the Analytics Leadership to enhance offerings that deliver competitive advantage to BCG. Successful candidates are intellectually curious builders who are biased toward action, scrappy, and communicative. You will also get the chance to travel: we have clients in New York, Paris, Stockholm, Peru… Make sure your passport is ready to go!

WHO YOU ARE. YOU:
Have deep technical and Data Science expertise: The successful candidate will have a wealth of experience with applying advanced analytics to a variety of business situations, such that they can efficiently and effectively advise multiple teams on the best path to uncovering critical insights for clients.
Are an autonomous self-starter with a passion for analytics and problem solving. You will help build new Analytics service offerings that grow our portfolio of products and will captures proprietary content, and support the creation of proposal/selling documents.
Are comfortable managing engagements, client relationships, and acting as a “thought Leader.” Strong presence, strong collaborator and leadership skills and ability to operate effectively in a matrix organization are a must.
Love building things and are comfortable working with modern development tools and writing code collaboratively (bonus points if you have a software development or DevOps experience)
Have significant experience applying advanced analytics to a variety of business situations and a proven ability to synthesize complex data; as well as a deep understanding of modern machine learning techniques and their mathematical underpinnings, and are able to translate this into business implications for our clients
Have strong project management skills

What You'll Bring (Experience & Qualifications)
Master’s Degree or PhD with significant relevant experience providing advanced analytics solutions. The degree should be in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, machine learning, or a related data centric field.
Demonstrated deep technical and data science expertise, acute strategic and analytical skills, ability to lead and persuade, drive and energy, and desire to work in a project based environment on strategic issues.
Strong record of professional accomplishment and leadership.
Fluency in at least one scripting language (e.g. Python, R)
Fluency in English local office language is required
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast-paced, intellectually intense, service-oriented environment
Expect up to 60-80% of time spent traveling

Date Posted:
27-Nov-2020
Boston Consulting Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity / expression, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under national, provincial, or local law, where applicable, and those with criminal histories will be considered in a manner consistent with applicable state and local laws.
BCG is an E-Verify Employer.
30+ days ago
Report job"
174,Machine Learning Scientist,Amazon Support Services PtyLtd,Not shown,Adelaide Region SA,"Completed PhD in Machine Learning, Computer Vision, Statistics or in a highly quantitative field
Strong Problem solving ability
Good skills in Python (or similar language)
Strong communication and data presentation skills
At Amazon Australia, we are developing state-of-the-art large-scale Machine Learning Services and Applications on the Cloud involving Terabytes of data. We work on applying machine learning, and particularly computer vision, to a wide spectrum of problems in areas such as Amazon Retail, Seller Services, Customer Service and so on. We are looking for talented and experienced Machine Learning Scientists (Ph.D. in a related area preferred) who can apply innovative Machine Learning techniques to real-world e-Commerce problems. You will get to work in a team dedicated to advancing Machine Learning technology at Amazon and converting it to business-impacting solutions.

Although this position will be based in Adelaide, South Australia, for the duration of the Coronavirus-19 outbreak arrangements will be made to enable the successful candidate to observe the relevant travel restrictions, possibly by working from home, or another Amazon office.

Major responsibilities
Use machine learning, computer vision, data mining and statistical techniques to create new, scalable solutions for business problems
Analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of Amazon’s historical business data to help automate and optimize key processes
Design, develop and evaluate highly innovative models for predictive learning
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research, implement and publish novel machine learning and statistical approaches
2+ years post PhD completion experience in predictive modeling and analysis, predictive software development
Experience in Deep Learning
Publications in top-tier conferences such as CVPR, ICCV, NeurIPS, ICML, and ACL
Experience in mentoring junior team members, and guiding them on machine learning and data modeling applications
Experience handling gigabyte and terabyte size datasets
Experience working with retail or e-commerce data
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing
Amazon.com
10 days ago
Report job"
175,Data Scientist,FourQuarters,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Data Scientist - Trading

The Company

A growing investment firm that employs a small team of highly experienced and motivated market professionals. They develop and utilise sophisticated probability models that are universally scalable.

The Role

A newly created role within a growing organisation. You will utilise your exceptional data analysis skills and knowledge of the equities market to help build out a new asset class within our investment team.

You will work closely with the firm’s senior traders, portfolio managers, and developers.

Targeted Prerequisites
PhD/HRD degree in a highly relevant discipline such as Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Finance
Experience in quantitative or data driven research in financial markets,
Strong knowledge of the characteristics of equities, and global equities market,
proficient in managing and manipulating large sets of complex data, leveraging skills in applicable Data Science, Machine Learning and Statistical Modelling techniques
Experience with SQL, Python and/or C# are well regarded,
Curious, resourceful, diligent, with strong intellectual integrity,



Principal Responsibilities

You will work closely with the firm’s quants, portfolio managers and developers in the creation of advanced trading and risk-management systems. Principal responsibilities include:
Financial market-data gathering, preparation and analysis
Trading strategy back-testing, implementation, and optimisation,
Blue sky research projects focusing on the detection, modelling, and exploitation of significant behavioural, statistical, or seasonal patterns in the global financial markets.

Whats on offer
A culture valuing creativity and meritocracy that will see your ideas and input
A growing organisation with opportunities to:
initiate new projects,
gain experience in a variety of asset classes,
work closely with experienced investment professionals,
develop lateral career progression within the investment team
8 days ago
Report job"
176,Data Scientist,TROOCOO Pty Ltd,"$900 - $1,000 a day",Sydney NSW,"HIgh calibre team and outstanding working culture
Market leading ASX business
Visible and high profile position


About our client:


Our client is a prominent top 100 ASX listed company operating within the energy and infrastructure industry. A global presence with operations in Northern America, Asia, Australia and the Middle East, this organization is the market leader in its field.
With a reputation predicated on quality of service to clients and offering un-paralleled career opportunities to its employees, this company has become a destination of choice for the very best talent in Sydney.


The role:


As the Data Scientist you will have a strong background in data science, analytics or data engineering.
The main focus of the Data Scientist role is to provide advanced statistical analysis, machine learning and AI to our client's main business units and partners across the energy and resource sector.

Responsibilities will include by not be limited to:
Lead / execute analytical approaches, including developing / training / optimizing machine learning models, other forms of analytical modelling
Lead in house analytics projects and upskill people within the Data Science and Decision support team where appropriate.
Processing, cleansing, manipulating, and verifying the integrity of data used for analyses
The successful candidate:


Masters degree in highly quantitative field (mathematics, statistics, computer science, machine learning) or equivalent experience
Experience leveraging statistical programming languages (SAS, R and/or Python for analyses)
Experience with data visualization tools, preferably Power BI
Minimum of 8 years' experience with advanced statistical methods generally, and particularly in the areas of predictive modelling and machine learning


What's on offer?


What's on offer?


Based 5 minutes from Circular Quay, our client offers beautiful office space with harbour views and a plethora of cafes, gyms and restaurants near by.


The position will initially be a 6 month contract with a daily rate of c.$900-1000 a day + super. The intention is that the successful candidate will be moved to a permanent hire in the new financial year.


We guarantee that all candidates who apply for this role will receive a call from the Troocoo team if the following must haves are met:


1) Full working rights in Australia
2) Experience leveraging statistical programming languages (SAS, R and/or Python for analyses)
3) Minimum of 8 years' experience with advanced statistical methods
15 days ago
Report job"
177,Data Scientist,Bluefin Resources,"$120,000 - $140,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Production of Machine Learning Models
Next Best Action Solutions
Global Services Firm
My client is a global services firm and is looking for a commercially focused Data Science for their growing team. Your role will be focused on developing recommendation models leveraging machine learning techniques, both supervised and unsupervised to model customer behaviour and preferences and contribute to the development of the next best action engine
The role
Development and production of machine learning models to drive commercial outcomes and customer engagement
Data mining , customer insights and deep dive analysis
Recommending next best action solutions
Working with large data sets in SQL and Python to produce meaningful insights and recommendations
Your background
A minimum of 4 years + experience in a data science role
Experienced in developing machine learning models in essential
Predictive modelling and customer analytics
Exposure to customer and marketing analytics environment highly desirable
Technical skills in both SQL and Python are essential
Consultative and commercial in your approach with strong stakeholder management skills
My client has the flexibility to complete the interview process before Christmas for suitable candidates. Please apply on line below or for more information contact Marie Thow at Bluefin Resources
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.
http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy

BBBH42215_161295284578822
5 days ago
Report job"
178,"Statistical Analysts & Data Scientists (APS 5), Labour Market & Population Statistics",Australian Bureau of Statistics,"$73,725 - $82,812 a year",Belconnen ACT,"Ongoing permanent positions
APS 5 level ($73,725 - $82,812 plus 15.4% super)
Canberra and Perth locations

The Australian Bureau of Statistics (ABS) is seeking to recruit several Statistical Analysts and Data Scientists at the APS 5 classification level for our Labour Market and Population Statistics Division. The positions are located in both our Canberra and Perth offices.

About the roles

Working as an APS 5 Statistical Analyst or Data Scientist, you will be responsible for the design, analysis and delivery of relevant and objective statistics. The roles and responsibilities may vary depending on the team in which the applicant is placed, however typical responsibilities include:

analysing data and drawing findings, using judgement and real-world insights
applying a strong understanding of statistical frameworks, classifications, standards and concepts that underpin the data
working with internal and external stakeholders and customers to develop fit for purpose specifications of data solutions requirements
critical thinking and reasoning: anticipate and analyse issues and develop logical conclusions based on reasoning
manage people effectively, delegating, driving high performance.

About you

To be suitable you should have most of or all the following skills, qualities and experience:

data skills including the ability to analyse large, complex datasets (preferably in the areas of labour or economic statistics)
project management skills and the ability to deliver quality outcomes within a dynamic and complex environment
demonstrated skills in problem solving and decision making
ability to work in and contribute to the management of a high performing team
strong oral and written communication skills.

Desirable: experience with statistical programming languages including (but not limited to) R, Python, and Excel.

Eligibility

To be eligible for this role you:
must be an Australian citizen at the time you apply
will need to undertake pre-employment checks, including national police check and health assessment
will need to obtain and maintain a Baseline security clearance.

Application Process

You will be required to submit a 700 word statement of your skills relevant to the qualities, skills and experience for these roles, together with a current resume.

If you are interested in submitting an application for this opportunity, please click the Begin button below to commence your application. Applications must be submitted by 11:30 pm AEDT, Sunday 21 February 2021.

Further information

Please read the
12 days ago
Report job"
179,Machine Learning Engineer,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Are you looking to challenge and expand your skillset by helping to build and deploy custom Machine Learning cloud-based applications to solve some of the most complex business problems?
At Macquarie’s Banking and Financial Services division, we are building and innovating for the future, and testing the limits of what can be achieved through machine learning. We are excited by consistently finding difficult-to-solve problems that others may overlook - and working to uncover and deliver genuine business value through the use of Data Science.
In this role, you will deliver production ready machine learning applications that have a high business impact. You will build machine learning models and deploy these models so they are automated and run on our cloud infrastructure.
What will be required from you? To be a successful in this role, you will have experience delivering in a fast-paced and energetic environment. You will be comfortable with the standard Data Science and Data Engineering languages (SQL, R or Python and Shell) and open to learning new programming languages/technologies, should the need present itself. You will also have a solid understanding of cloud technology and will have built and deployed automated cloud machine learning applications within a CICD framework before.
Apart from being technically competent, you must be a forward-thinking self-starter, comfortable with feeling challenged to grow, and have the persistence to see things through.
If this sounds like you, and the type of environment you would like to work in - then please !
About Banking and Financial Services
Banking and Financial Services is Macquarie’s retail banking and financial services business, providing a diverse range of personal banking, wealth management, business banking and vehicle finance products and services to retail clients, advisers, brokers and business clients.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: BFS-955975
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Junior, Data & Analytics
Group: Banking and Financial Services
Division: Product & Technology
Recruiter: Chloe Lee
Opening Date: 28/1/2021
17 days ago
Report job"
180,Analytics Consultant / Aspiring Data Scientist,Talent Insights Group,"$90,000 - $120,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"We are currently seeking a junior-mid level analytics consultant (2-5 years’ experience) with a strong data and statistics background. If successful, you will join a team with a great reputation in the industry that wins large, complex analytical projects across industries including; Telco, Financial Services, Media, Health, Insurance, Retail and more.

Required experience and skills:
You must hold a bachelor’s degree or higher in a numerical or scientific field, such as; Statistics, Physics, Actuarial Studies, Engineering or Mathematics
Commercial experience applying statistical modelling techniques and machine learning techniques including; regression, decision trees, predictive models, Generalised Linear Models (GLM), GBM and more.
Confident communication skills and experience presenting ideas, insights and reports to stakeholders (this could be to consulting clients or internal stakeholders)
Extracting data and building/maintaining/optimising models using SQL, R, Python or SAS
Experience with Cloud Platforms (Azure / AWS / GCP) would be beneficial and you should be happy to learn new tools and technologies as they evolve!

Why this role is different:
Many other ‘consulting’ positions in analytics are heavily weighted towards only the client-facing presentation of insights to non-technical business stakeholders. Often, the level of modelling and opportunities to use machine learning can be very limited in these roles.
This team strikes a balance that includes building and developing strong client relationships and carrying out advanced statistical modelling and machine learning.
You will have opportunities to collaborate with and be mentored by senior analytics and data science professionals with varied backgrounds
Clients in different industries means you will be exposed to varied business problems and data sets
Problems you might solve include: predictive modelling, advising strategy in the public sector, pricing strategy optimisation or building risk profiles

Please apply with your CV and Cover Letter through the links below – we will be arranging interviews with short-listed applicants as soon as possible.
25 days ago
Report job"
181,Data Science,Accenture,Not shown,Perth WA,"Job Profile Summary
Manage, architect and analyze big data in order to build data driven business insights and high impact data models to generate significant business value. Create models and processes to collect, distill and interpret data with a view to aid better, more informed decision making. Examine and explore data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering insights which in turn can provide competitive advantage for our clients.
Skills
Create insights from predictive statistical modeling to deliver client value •Apply deep statistical and mathematical knowledge, tools and techniques to find relationships between and among variables •Develop intellectual property involving specific analytical methodologies, mathematical modeling or optimization techniques and their applications to business issues •Translate business issues into specific requirements to develop analytic solutions, and identify appropriate data to support the solution •Collaborate with Accenture and/or external consulting teams to address business issues and influence change using strategy, industry and analytical skills
Data Analysis and Client Value Creation •Create value for our clients by providing new insights from predictive statistical modeling activities •Test theories by creating models and experimenting with data •Design the models, algorithms and visualizations that help companies distill insights from huge volumes of chaotic data •Involved in gathering big data. Formulating high business impact cluster or nodes and establish performance checks on the large data models
Data Analytics and Information Technology •Deliver large-scale programs that integrate processes with technology to help clients achieve high performance •Design, implement and deploy custom applications on Hadoop •Implementation of complete Big Data solutions, including data acquisition, storage, transformation, and analysis Responsible for the design and implementation of complete big data solutions including data acquisition, storage, transformation, and analysis
Salary range for this role: 80 – 110K

About Accenture
Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.
At Accenture, our philosophy is anchored in recognising that our people are multi-dimensional. We take an intersectional human approach to create a work environment where all people feel like they can bring their authentic selves to work, every day.
We believe that equality drives innovation. Our commitment to accelerating equality starts at the top with our board and CEO and extends across every part of the company. This comes to life when our people own the equality agenda, making it part of their jobs – every decision, every day – and feel free to speak up and to act.
We do not tolerate discrimination because of differences, such as age, ability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity or expression, religion, or sexual orientation. We want a workplace that is inclusive and diverse to that end we are setting bold goals and taking comprehensive action. To achieve these goals, we collect information that allows us to track the effectiveness of our Inclusion and Diversity programs.
Learn how Accenture protects your personal data and know your rights in relation to your personal data. Read more about our Privacy Statement.
#LI-DNI
26 days ago
Report job"
182,Research Fellow (Blockchain/Data Science),TBSx3,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Responsibilities:
Focus on blockchain, cryptography, security and/or Data Science research
Work with blockchain engineer team to develop blockchain prototype solutions for given use cases
Produce instruction manuals and methodology reference
Deliver technical instruction and knowledge to blockchain engineer team
Use data science to guide project strategic decisions
Required Skills & Experience:
Extensive knowledge in key areas of blockchain research (e.g. side chains, confidential transactions, data privacy, and other scaling methodologies, etc)
Experience with or deep understanding of big data or advanced analytics concepts and algorithms
Strong attention to detail
A research-focused mindset
Has strong analytical and technical skills
Passionate about blockchain or data science
Passionate about transfer useful knowledge from data to promote business decision-making
30+ days ago
Report job"
183,Data Scientist,Talentpool Recruitment,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Opportunity to work alongside and be mentored by highly intelligent Scientists
Competitive salary and flexible working environment

A new vacancy has come to light with a trusted and industry leading product & consulting business in the heart of Sydney’s CBD – The business in question is focused on driving transformational research in the Data Science & Machine Learning space using a research-based model that has continually proven to deliver for clients and internal products!

This role is suited to someone who has 1/2 years experience in a working environment and wants to dive deeper into the world of Data Science - You will be working alongside some highly intelligent data professionals delivering state of the art technical solutions! The team is broken down into Data Scientists, Data Engineers & Machine Learning Engineers all working on projects that deliver meaningful results to real world problems!

The Role:
Applying statistical analysis methods, including analysis of variance, regression, time series analysis, survival/environmental analysis
The development of data systems, including; data exploration/crawling, feature engineering, model building, performance evaluation and more
Research, customization, and development of statistical and machine learning algorithms
You propose analytics strategies and solutions that challenge and expand the thinking of everyone around you
Working alongside senior scientists you will deliver next generation solutions to real world problems
Requirements:
1+ year experience in a working environment providing data science solutions
Masters or Ph.D in Mathematics, Statistics or Data Science / relevant discipline
Strong experience around; Predictive Analytics, Statistical Analysis, Big Data Analytics
Detail oriented and comfortable working with large complex data sets
Technical requirements | Strong Python/R programming skills & AWS Exposure
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks, Keras or PyTorch and libraries such as scikit-learn
If you would like to hear more about this opportunity please get in touch with sean@talentpoolgroup.com for a confidential discussion
12 days ago
Report job"
184,Data scientists,Oprime technologies,"$100,000 - $150,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Urgently hiring
Data scientist with 5 yr experience in python, machine learning, developing mathematical models,etc
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $100,000.00 – $150,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
26 days ago
Report job"
185,"Director, Data Science - Visa Consulting & Analytics, Australia",Visa,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Company Description
As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.
At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of innovators who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.
You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let's transform the way the world pays.

Job Description
The Director, Data Science for Australia will be the analytics subject matter expert and will be reporting to the Head of Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific. The incumbent will be expected to have exceptional problem-solving skills using advanced analytics/ Machine learning/ AI with a sharp focus on execution. Responsibilities will include deconstructing the business problem into analysis approach, package analysis insights into client consumable format within committed timeline/scope and develop new solution capabilities. The incumbent is expected to be hands on and will have the required knowhow to work with big data using cutting-edge machine learning/ AI solutions. The role will have to closely collaborate with data science analysts, members of the broader team in Visa Consulting and Analytics and other business stakeholders. Staying on top of the analytics industry trends, the candidate will need to ensure the analytics solutions are constantly revamped, innovations are fostered and solutions are implementable. The role is focused on Australia market and will be based in Sydney, Australia.
Visa's Data Science team is a high-performing team of data scientists, data analysts, statisticians, and business analysts from a variety of countries – serving major FIs and merchants within Asia Pacific. We are looking for a hands-on person who is result oriented, highly organized and focused to delivered industry leading analytics solutions
Key Responsibilities
Analytics subject matter expert in all analytics topics including business problem definition, constructing analytical framework, development, validation of said framework via best statistical methodologies and implementation and package insights into client consumable format
Enhance existing analytic techniques by promoting new methodology and best practices in analytics field
Delivering multiple analytics projects along with rest of the stakeholders in Data Science & Consulting teams
Develop analytical solutions and strategies, testing & monitoring frameworks, estimate revenue impact for the client(s)
Actively seek out opportunities to innovate by using non-traditional data and new modeling techniques
Collaborating with the internal teams to fully understand business requirements and desired business outcomes
Defining detailed analytic scope and methodology, and creating analytic plan
Providing thought leadership in both using data to solve business problems and in arriving at innovative statistical solutions
Ensuring all project documentation is up to date and maintain the highest levels of quality in deliverables
Ensuring project delivery within timelines and budget requirements
Contribute to the development of the team’s analytical skills and expertise.
Cultivates open and clear communications across team members and stakeholders

Qualifications
Skills & Knowledge
Professional
Subject matter expert in analytics especially in areas of analytical methodologies
Strong understanding and prior experience in Machine Learning and Geo-location-based analytics is must.
Proficiency in coding skills using SAS, SQL, Hive, Python, R, Spark and Pyspark on large datasets
Proficiency in data visualisation and data visualisation software such as Tableau, Power BI etc.
Excellent communicator – should have the capability to translate numbers to business insights
Experienced in managing multiple projects and initiatives
Superior analytical and problem-solving skills, with demonstrated intellectual and analytical rigor
Must be team oriented, collaborative, diplomatic, and flexible, with excellent presentation skills, including strong oral and writing capabilities
Experienced in working across a matrixed organization; multi-regional experience preferred
Technical
Very strong advanced analytics experience. Hands on experience in developing machine-learning models using Python, R, SAS and other open source resources.
Strong expertise in data visualisation tools
Thorough understanding of the recommender system, classification techniques, graph theory, bayesian, time series and regression models are recommended
Excellent written English
Expert level PowerPoint
Experience and in-depth knowledge of the cards and payments business
Business
Excellent relationship and stakeholder management skills
Expert in presenting ideas and analysis to stakeholders and at leadership level
Very detailed oriented, is expected to ensure highest level of quality/rigor in reports & data analysis
Global mindset, desire and demonstrated ability to work cross-culturally and in a matrixed organization
Ability to execute and solve problems independently
Proven skills in translating analytics output to actionable recommendations, and delivery
Multi-disciplinary thinking skills: creative, analytic, strategic
18 days ago
Report job"
186,Data Scientist,Eliiza,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We're growing our data science capabilities and are looking for data scientists to join our Eliiza team in Australia.
In this awesome role you will work with other smart, passionate and skilled people to deliver data science products and services to clients.
With our diverse range of clients and projects, no day will look the same - but here's a great snapshot of what's some of the recent projects keeping our data science team busy:
NLP - sentiment analysis - social media, chatbot data, error correction
Prediction/Forecasting - prediction of economic growth from transaction, prediction of fraud transactions in real time, prediction of customer behaviour
Information extraction - satellite image analysis, facial recognition, image processing
Who are we?
Glad you asked! We are Eliiza. Data science. Engineered for scale.
We are a passionate team of data scientists and engineers who apply data science and machine learning to solve real-world problems. Our mission is to create a bright future for Australian businesses and society in a world increasingly influenced by intelligent technologies.

We've built a hybrid approach to remote working where you can access one of our awesome hubs providing a space for collaboration across Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, Magnetic island (and more to come!) meaning you can choose a work model that works best for you!

We've created a culture that values diversity where people can truly be themselves! We care a lot about growing the Australian AI community in a positive direction, and we're doing several things to try and achieve that:
We provide opportunities for underrepresented groups to work in AI through our associate and intern programmes
We organise and participate in a range of community events, reading groups and meetups
We produce the AI Australia podcast
We blog about topics we care about
We stream brown bag sessions to the broader community
We're also part of Mantel Group's 'house of brands' which means it's not just the Eliiza team you'll work with, learn from and see at social events - there's another 300+ of us across DigIO, Kasna & CMD Solutions!
So you're ready for something new?
We're keen to know more about you! Our team is made up of a range of people, with different experience across a huge range of data driven skill sets.
If you're the right Data Scientist for us, you'll have:
an undergraduate degree in maths or statistics, or a postgraduate in broader disciplines such as the sciences
commercial data science experience across different industries and organisations
an understanding of key statistical and machine learning concepts across different areas of data science
the ability to manipulate complex data sets to visualise and model the data
experience using at least one open source data science language such as Python or R
fundamental software engineering skills
an awareness of relevant data and ML engineering concepts (e.g. database management, processing pipelines, and model deployment)
consulting experience, either with external clients or internally within an organisation
the ability to plan and implement the different phases of a data science project
a genuine passion for and connection to the data science and ML community
However, we value a diverse of skill-sets, and don't necessarily require that you're skilled with all of the above. If you feel you don't fit all the experience/skills listed above we still encourage you to apply or get in touch.
What's on offer if you join us?
We make sure you're always one step ahead by investing your learning and development, every year. We build our own training where it doesn't exist yet.
We hire smart people and get out of their way. By focusing on our five principles and not getting caught up in red tape, we trust you to get the job done.
You'll get all the tools you need - a new iPhone or Google phone, a new Macbook Pro or Dell, and a lot of branded swag!
But hold on, you mentioned a house of brands?
We certainly did! Mantel Group is an Australian-owned, 'house of brands' company with four technology businesses (Eliiza being one of them!) across Australia. We're building a group of companies with open borders so we can support you to take on new skills without leaving an awesome team - we understand you won't have one job for life!
We may only be just over 3 years old but Mantel Group has already been recognised #9 in the 2020 Best Places to Work in Australia and #4 in the AFR's 2020 fastest growing new companies.
Keen to chat?

Click ""Apply"" to share your details with our talent team, and we'll be in touch.

In the meantime, check out 'how we hire' to find out what's in store if you're successful and get to know us better by visiting our website and following Eliiza on LinkedIn.
30+ days ago
Report job"
187,Research Fellow (Blockchain/Data Science),TBSx3,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Responsibilities:
Focus on blockchain, cryptography, security and/or Data Science research
Work with blockchain engineer team to develop blockchain prototype solutions for given use cases
Produce instruction manuals and methodology reference
Deliver technical instruction and knowledge to blockchain engineer team
Use data science to guide project strategic decisions
Required Skills & Experience:
Extensive knowledge in key areas of blockchain research (e.g. side chains, confidential transactions, data privacy, and other scaling methodologies, etc)
Experience with or deep understanding of big data or advanced analytics concepts and algorithms
Strong attention to detail
A research-focused mindset
Has strong analytical and technical skills
Passionate about blockchain or data science
Passionate about transfer useful knowledge from data to promote business decision-making
30+ days ago
Report job"
188,Data scientists,Oprime technologies,"$100,000 - $150,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Urgently hiring
Data scientist with 5 yr experience in python, machine learning, developing mathematical models,etc
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $100,000.00 – $150,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
26 days ago
Report job"
189,Data Scientist,Adaps,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Data Scientist
6 Months
Sydney
Your skills & experience
Demonstrate a strong proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint and SharePoint.
Strong organisation, attention to detail and an inquisitive mind are essential.
Strong writing skills with ability to communicate effectively in plain English.
Familiarity with development of digital channels and performance metrics and analysis (content, sentiment)
Demonstrate some knowledge and experience of corporate affairs.
Ability to relate to multiple stakeholders and ability drive results.
Most importantly, be adaptable and flexible.
Ability to work independently while being able to take direction and to ask for further instructions when needed.
Your qualifications
Tertiary degree with strong results in Business/Commerce or Communications is preferred.
Minimum 4 – 6 years of work experience that involves frequent use of reporting systems particularly Excel.
Excellent conceptual and analytical skills, evident business acumen and strong verbal and written communication skills required.
Research and analysis skills, preferably in a media environment.
Previous experience in creating reports with tools including Excel and PowerPoint required.
Previous experience in project management or team coordination is highly desired.
Appreciation and understanding of current media and government landscape required.
A proven ability to build relationships and to identify ways to improve tools and processes.
How to apply:
Please apply calling Rams on 03 8506 6524 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
190,"Director, Data Science - Visa Consulting & Analytics, Australia",Visa,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Company Description
As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.
At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of innovators who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.
You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let's transform the way the world pays.

Job Description
The Director, Data Science for Australia will be the analytics subject matter expert and will be reporting to the Head of Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific. The incumbent will be expected to have exceptional problem-solving skills using advanced analytics/ Machine learning/ AI with a sharp focus on execution. Responsibilities will include deconstructing the business problem into analysis approach, package analysis insights into client consumable format within committed timeline/scope and develop new solution capabilities. The incumbent is expected to be hands on and will have the required knowhow to work with big data using cutting-edge machine learning/ AI solutions. The role will have to closely collaborate with data science analysts, members of the broader team in Visa Consulting and Analytics and other business stakeholders. Staying on top of the analytics industry trends, the candidate will need to ensure the analytics solutions are constantly revamped, innovations are fostered and solutions are implementable. The role is focused on Australia market and will be based in Sydney, Australia.
Visa's Data Science team is a high-performing team of data scientists, data analysts, statisticians, and business analysts from a variety of countries – serving major FIs and merchants within Asia Pacific. We are looking for a hands-on person who is result oriented, highly organized and focused to delivered industry leading analytics solutions
Key Responsibilities
Analytics subject matter expert in all analytics topics including business problem definition, constructing analytical framework, development, validation of said framework via best statistical methodologies and implementation and package insights into client consumable format
Enhance existing analytic techniques by promoting new methodology and best practices in analytics field
Delivering multiple analytics projects along with rest of the stakeholders in Data Science & Consulting teams
Develop analytical solutions and strategies, testing & monitoring frameworks, estimate revenue impact for the client(s)
Actively seek out opportunities to innovate by using non-traditional data and new modeling techniques
Collaborating with the internal teams to fully understand business requirements and desired business outcomes
Defining detailed analytic scope and methodology, and creating analytic plan
Providing thought leadership in both using data to solve business problems and in arriving at innovative statistical solutions
Ensuring all project documentation is up to date and maintain the highest levels of quality in deliverables
Ensuring project delivery within timelines and budget requirements
Contribute to the development of the team’s analytical skills and expertise.
Cultivates open and clear communications across team members and stakeholders

Qualifications
Skills & Knowledge
Professional
Subject matter expert in analytics especially in areas of analytical methodologies
Strong understanding and prior experience in Machine Learning and Geo-location-based analytics is must.
Proficiency in coding skills using SAS, SQL, Hive, Python, R, Spark and Pyspark on large datasets
Proficiency in data visualisation and data visualisation software such as Tableau, Power BI etc.
Excellent communicator – should have the capability to translate numbers to business insights
Experienced in managing multiple projects and initiatives
Superior analytical and problem-solving skills, with demonstrated intellectual and analytical rigor
Must be team oriented, collaborative, diplomatic, and flexible, with excellent presentation skills, including strong oral and writing capabilities
Experienced in working across a matrixed organization; multi-regional experience preferred
Technical
Very strong advanced analytics experience. Hands on experience in developing machine-learning models using Python, R, SAS and other open source resources.
Strong expertise in data visualisation tools
Thorough understanding of the recommender system, classification techniques, graph theory, bayesian, time series and regression models are recommended
Excellent written English
Expert level PowerPoint
Experience and in-depth knowledge of the cards and payments business
Business
Excellent relationship and stakeholder management skills
Expert in presenting ideas and analysis to stakeholders and at leadership level
Very detailed oriented, is expected to ensure highest level of quality/rigor in reports & data analysis
Global mindset, desire and demonstrated ability to work cross-culturally and in a matrixed organization
Ability to execute and solve problems independently
Proven skills in translating analytics output to actionable recommendations, and delivery
Multi-disciplinary thinking skills: creative, analytic, strategic
18 days ago
Report job"
191,Data Scientist,Eliiza,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We're growing our data science capabilities and are looking for data scientists to join our Eliiza team in Australia.
In this awesome role you will work with other smart, passionate and skilled people to deliver data science products and services to clients.
With our diverse range of clients and projects, no day will look the same - but here's a great snapshot of what's some of the recent projects keeping our data science team busy:
NLP - sentiment analysis - social media, chatbot data, error correction
Prediction/Forecasting - prediction of economic growth from transaction, prediction of fraud transactions in real time, prediction of customer behaviour
Information extraction - satellite image analysis, facial recognition, image processing
Who are we?
Glad you asked! We are Eliiza. Data science. Engineered for scale.
We are a passionate team of data scientists and engineers who apply data science and machine learning to solve real-world problems. Our mission is to create a bright future for Australian businesses and society in a world increasingly influenced by intelligent technologies.

We've built a hybrid approach to remote working where you can access one of our awesome hubs providing a space for collaboration across Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, Magnetic island (and more to come!) meaning you can choose a work model that works best for you!

We've created a culture that values diversity where people can truly be themselves! We care a lot about growing the Australian AI community in a positive direction, and we're doing several things to try and achieve that:
We provide opportunities for underrepresented groups to work in AI through our associate and intern programmes
We organise and participate in a range of community events, reading groups and meetups
We produce the AI Australia podcast
We blog about topics we care about
We stream brown bag sessions to the broader community
We're also part of Mantel Group's 'house of brands' which means it's not just the Eliiza team you'll work with, learn from and see at social events - there's another 300+ of us across DigIO, Kasna & CMD Solutions!
So you're ready for something new?
We're keen to know more about you! Our team is made up of a range of people, with different experience across a huge range of data driven skill sets.
If you're the right Data Scientist for us, you'll have:
an undergraduate degree in maths or statistics, or a postgraduate in broader disciplines such as the sciences
commercial data science experience across different industries and organisations
an understanding of key statistical and machine learning concepts across different areas of data science
the ability to manipulate complex data sets to visualise and model the data
experience using at least one open source data science language such as Python or R
fundamental software engineering skills
an awareness of relevant data and ML engineering concepts (e.g. database management, processing pipelines, and model deployment)
consulting experience, either with external clients or internally within an organisation
the ability to plan and implement the different phases of a data science project
a genuine passion for and connection to the data science and ML community
However, we value a diverse of skill-sets, and don't necessarily require that you're skilled with all of the above. If you feel you don't fit all the experience/skills listed above we still encourage you to apply or get in touch.
What's on offer if you join us?
We make sure you're always one step ahead by investing your learning and development, every year. We build our own training where it doesn't exist yet.
We hire smart people and get out of their way. By focusing on our five principles and not getting caught up in red tape, we trust you to get the job done.
You'll get all the tools you need - a new iPhone or Google phone, a new Macbook Pro or Dell, and a lot of branded swag!
But hold on, you mentioned a house of brands?
We certainly did! Mantel Group is an Australian-owned, 'house of brands' company with four technology businesses (Eliiza being one of them!) across Australia. We're building a group of companies with open borders so we can support you to take on new skills without leaving an awesome team - we understand you won't have one job for life!
We may only be just over 3 years old but Mantel Group has already been recognised #9 in the 2020 Best Places to Work in Australia and #4 in the AFR's 2020 fastest growing new companies.
Keen to chat?

Click ""Apply"" to share your details with our talent team, and we'll be in touch.

In the meantime, check out 'how we hire' to find out what's in store if you're successful and get to know us better by visiting our website and following Eliiza on LinkedIn.
30+ days ago
Report job"
192,Data Scientist,PRA,Not shown,Brisbane QLD,"Permanent Position
South-Side location
Up to $130K package
Join a company that makes a difference with geo-intelligence and asset integrity solutions across the globe.

You will be responsible for creating innovative solutions for deriving information about the physical world from remote sensing data including LiDAR and imagery, leveraging highly scalable data processing pipelines in a cloud computing environment. Working closely with a team of other data scientists, engineers and developers, the candidate will be involved in all stages of development, from communicating with stakeholders, strategy, planning, research, implementation, deployment, and on-going improvement.

To be successful in this role, you must possess the following:
At least 3 years experience writing software and applying it to solve problems
Knowledge of and practical experience with applying advanced machine learning techniques (especially in a production environment)
Robust statistical skills
Proficiency with one or more technical computing languages such as Julia, Python, MATLAB, R, Haskell
Proficiency in one or more of C++, C#, Java, JS
Highly desirable:
Exposure to LiDAR, point clouds, imagery, geodesy and/or positioning systems
If this sounds like you and you are keen to be considered, hit APPLY NOW or contact Scott Abram-Evans via email on scott.abramevans@pra.com.au.
Just posted
Report job"
193,Head of Data & Analytics,Michael Page,"$250,000 - $270,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Champion the Data Management strategy and implementation
Develop a scalable environment to facilate AI/ML deliverables
About Our Client
Our client is one of the most prestigious Membership and Associations brands in Australia. At their heart they aim to provide elite customer experiences through their tailored product offering in the professional service spaces.
The business is embarking on an organisation-wide transformation which will pivot their Digital and Technology capability into a customer-centric model to facilitate the growth of the current Digital Technology frameworks.
Job Description
In this role, you will take ownership across the core pillars below:
Data & Analytics Strategy
Data Management Framework
Data & Analytics Maturity
Building a top tier ""Data Culture""
AI/ML ecosystem creation
In addition to this, you will also look after standard BAU responsibilities such as:
Leading developing, and motivating direct reports and broader digital team to advance data-literacy
Manage and recommend on expenditure and contribute to the development of business cases
Promote and educate on data ethics and security across the organisation
Managing a team of data analysts, data scientists and data engineers to drive new data analytics capabilities across the business
Plan and predict future plans for the businesses move towards an AI/ML ecosystem
The Successful Applicant
If the concept of driving company wide data transformation excites you, then please be ready to demonstrate the following experience:
Strong, demonstrable experience working within data management and leveraging data and insights to identity opportunities, lift organisational performance and increase revenue
Extensive experience in developing and implementing data-driven strategies and roadmaps in driving change and innovation
Extensive experience in developing and leading data science practices, including machine learning, and implementing business intelligence and data analytics systems
Experience working and cross colaborating with software engineering environments
Experience designing, developing, and validating descriptive, predictive, prescriptive and applied analytics
Experience implementing data governance and data process management and quality assurance
Strong working knowledge of data applications, solutions, and tools as well as all applicable data privacy laws and regulations
Strong conceptual, analytical and problem-solving skills
Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems or a similar related field is desireable
What's on Offer
This is a rare opportunity to be part of major organisational change, and building an industry-leading Data Culture. In addition to this, you will be afforded the following:
Ability to work flexibly
Champion both the Data Management and ML/AI strategy
An attractive salary package
An opportunity to work with a highly regarded and reputable CIDO
Unrivalled opportunity to learn with access to industry-leading personal development
Contact:
Sean Goulding
30+ days ago
Report job"
194,Insight Analyst (Analytics & Visualisation Focus),ALDI,"$121,900 - $139,000 a year",New South Wales,"An exciting opportunity to join the Commercial team has become available within the National Buying department of ALDI Stores, based in Minchinbury. This is a permanent full time role.

As an Insight analyst, you will be responsible for designing and developing solutions by leveraging your skills in data analysis and visualisation to support both technical and non-technical audiences. This role will be pivotal in supporting the broader National Buying business through the achievement of commercial targets in the category management process.

What we are looking for:
The successful candidate will demonstrate the ability to clean, transform and synthesise large datasets and distil insights from unstructured data. You will be able to influence stakeholders with the decision making process by communicating key findings effectively in the language of data visualisations.

Selection Criteria:
Tertiary qualification within a quantitative field (statistics, actuaries, applied mathematics, data science, econometrics, biostatistics or similar)
In depth experience in a hands-on analytical role (FMCG background highly regarded)
Demonstrated experience in delivering high impact dashboard designs (Tableau experience highly regarded)
Proficiency with SQL and strong data ETL experience, ideally in SQL Server or Hadoop
Competency in Python highly regarded (especially pandas, numpy, sklearn, tensorflow)
Ability to efficiently utilise statistical and machine learning methods (especially time series, hypothesis testing, clustering, classification and neural network)
Effective problem-solving skills with a meticulous attention to detail
Strong communication skills; both verbal and written
Experience in project management, ideally working with the Agile Methodology

What's in it for you?
Market leading remuneration - Starting at $121,900, including super
Great work life balance (work from home options)
5 weeks annual leave
Problem solving real business challenges
Be part of a leading international retailer

Role Responsibilities:
Retrieve, clean and manipulate data from different source systems
Identify trends and patterns, extract insights using data visualisation
Design and develop bespoke analytics solutions to address business needs
Understand the business context, help define the problem statement and scope business requirements in conjunction with stakeholders
Build predictive models for assortment optimisation using statistical and machine learning methods
Communicate data-driven insights effectively and explain complex methodologies to various stakeholder groups
Review existing reporting tools and processes to identify opportunities for improvement and automation
Collaborate to define data requirements and design efficient data ETL pipelines

This role reports to the Executive Manager - Commercial
30+ days ago
Report job"
195,Machine Learning Researcher,TRICENTIS,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Company Description

With the industry’s #1 Continuous Testing platform, Tricentis is recognized for reinventing software testing for DevOps. Through agile test management and advanced test automation optimized to support 150+ technologies, we provide automated insight into the business risks of your software releases—transforming testing from a roadblock to a catalyst for innovation. The result is accelerated software delivery speed, improved cost efficiency, and reduced business risk.
Tricentis is the only vendor to achieve “leader” status in all three top analyst reports (i.e., the “Triple Crown.”) This honor is based on our technical leadership, innovation, and a Global 2000 customer base of 1500+ companies, including global enterprises such as Allianz, Cisco, Dolby, First Data, HSBC, Office Depot, Samsung, Starbucks, Vodafone, Whole Foods, and WorldPay. Customers rely on Tricentis to achieve and sustain test automation rates of over 90 percent—increasing risk coverage while accelerating testing to keep pace with Agile and DevOps.
Tricentis has a global presence in Austria, Australia, Belgium, Denmark, Germany, India, Netherlands, Singapore, Switzerland, Poland, the UK and United States.

Job Description

We are looking for energetic, intelligent and driven people to join our Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning team. We work at the cutting edge of technology, designing machine learning systems and embedding them into our production .NET applications.
Responsibilities for Machine Learning researcher
Determine the fitness of AI/ML to solving specific customer problems
Assist in data triaging, gathering and cleaning operations
Designing / Adopting machine learning solutions where appropriate
Advising the team on how to best fit Machine Learning solutions into our platform
Contribute to team ceremonies, such as stand ups, estimation and brainstorming sessions
Continually contribute to and challenge decisions made by the team to ensure the best outcome for our organisation
Teach, and openly learn from your teammates
Strive to build not only the most maintainable, but the most efficient code to keep our performance lightning quick

Qualifications
Expertise in Pytorch, Tensorflow or equivalent
PHD or Masters degree in Machine Learning, AI, or similar
Excellent knowledge of statistical concepts
Excellent understanding of Deep Learning (including Convolutional Neural Networks, LSTM, Deep-Q learning, Autoencoders, etc)
Ability to work with both Windows and Unix environments
Understanding of Agile methodologies
Strong attention to detail
Excellent troubleshooting and communication skills
Able to communicate well with Team and external customers

Additional Information
Favorable working atmosphere in a rapidly expanding company
Personal and professional development

Tricentis is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran.
7 days ago
Report job"
196,Data Scientist (Advanced Analytics),Mindcloud Consultants,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job tasks and responsibilities About the role: Work with customers to identify opportunities where Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and Advanced Analytics (AA) can be applied to data and solve the customers pain points. Individually or collaborate with other team members to develop AI/ML/AA prototypes/Proof-of-Concept/Proof-of-Value to derive actionable insights from data. Collaborate with the customers and internal stakeholders to architect the overall supporting storage and compute infrastructure to support the deployment of the AI/ML/AA models, applications, and visualisation of the results. Collaborate with the relevant project managers to conceptualise, develop project scope, requirements, budget, and timeline for the implementation of the identified AI/ML/AA projects. Implement the AI/ML/AA projects and to ensure that the projects' AI/ML/AA objectives are met. Skills and experience To be considered for this role, you should have the following skills and qualifications:- Bachelors (honours) in Computer Science, Information System, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, or related disciplines. 10+ years experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine learning (ML) and Advanced Analytics (AA) Domain experience in Public safety, Defence, Transport, Education and healthcare are highly desirable. Smart city, social media and procurement domain experience in AI, ML, AA also highly desirable. Experience with large data sets, including statistical analyses, data visualization, data mining and data cleansing/transformation and machine learning Experience in solutions using technologies such as Hadoop/Hive/Hbase/NoSQL and developer skills in Python, Perl, and Java are highly desired Good technical understanding on Big Data Architectures (Hadoop, MPP, In-Database) Predictive analytics and Machine learning General Data science Familiarity with statistical software and programming language: SAS, SPSS, SQL, STATA, R & Python (At least 2 desirable) If you are interested please share your cv via resume@mindcloud.com.au in MS word format along with your visa status, notice period , ONLY Au citizen or PR will be considered. We do have other roles available and all roles have to be filled in June. For more jobs details please visit our website: www.mindcloud.com.au or reach us via resume@mindcloud.com.au
Job summary
Location:Sydney, Australia, Oceania
Career Level: Senior (5+ years of experience)
Education: Bachelor's Degree
Job type:Full time
Positions:2
Salary: Negotiable
30+ days ago
Report job"
197,Research Fellow (Blockchain/Data Science),Aglive,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Responsibilities:
Focus on blockchain, cryptography, security and/or Data Science research
Work with blockchain engineer team to develop blockchain prototype solutions for given use cases
Produce instruction manuals and methodology reference
Deliver technical instruction and knowledge to blockchain engineer team
Use data science to guide project strategic decisions
Required Skills & Experience:
Extensive knowledge in key areas of blockchain research (e.g. side chains, confidential transactions, data privacy, and other scaling methodologies, etc)
Experience with or deep understanding of big data or advanced analytics concepts and algorithms
Strong attention to detail
A research-focused mindset
Has strong analytical and technical skills
Passionate about blockchain or data science
Passionate about transfer useful knowledge from data to promote business decision-making
Apply Here to Join the Sydney Team
30+ days ago
Report job"
198,Data Scientist,Michael Page,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Permanent Opportunity
Tech required; SQL, Python/R, AWS, PowerBI/Tableau
About Our Client
My Client is a well-known Australian manufacturing organisation.
Job Description
Selecting features, building and optimising classifiers
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods
Extending company's data with third party sources of information when needed
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner using PowerBI
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
The Successful Applicant
Experience with data visualisation tools, such as PowerBI.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with Python/R.
Experience with NoSQL databases.
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression.
PhD or a research background will be highly favourable for this position.
What's on Offer
They recognise personal contribution and celebrate team success.
Desirable remunerations and benefits.
Contact:
Charlotte Weston
30+ days ago
Report job"
199,Data Scientist,Brunel Australasia,Not shown,Perth WA,"Global LNG Group
Data Scientist / Modeller
12 Month Contract


Seeking several Data Scientists to join a Global LNG Group in Perth on initial 12 month contracts.


Responsibilities:
This role will work closely with the Finance department and value chain business partners to:
Simplify and optimize existing complex processes through efficient Power Platform coding and model restructuring.
Work in diverse project teams to deliver creative solutions to drive business to competitive targets through digital initiatives


Skills & Experience:
Statistical computer languages SQL / Python / R script with experience working across large structured and unstructured data sets
Strong data analytic and modelling skillsets Power Platform (Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate)
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions etc)
Knowledge of the Agile approach to project management/product development


To discuss further, please reach out to Mark Crow on 0404 199 723 or m.crow@brunel.net
30+ days ago
Report job"
200,Junior Data Scientist,Adaps,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"1-2 Years of Data Experience
Must know MongoDB
Have an “understanding” of NoSQL
Project Space:
Projects are around the Security Domain of the Bank which covers / impacts 7 Tribes
The Client’sTeam are releasing 5 data sets at a time
Some POC’s (proof of concepts) have been done and are now moving into Production – Platform and systems are being built
This is the 1st time using MongoDB in the Bank
There are approximately 200 Data Sources within the Bank
Required Skills:
1-2 Years of Data Experience (could be someone with 4 years overall IT experience but they MUST have some Data Science experience / exposure of 1-2 years)
Must know MongoDB
Have an “understanding” of NoSQL
Hungry and willing to learn
Must be able to contribute to the team
Will need to build events in MongoDB
How to apply:
Please apply calling Alex on 03 8506 6547 for further details. Applications closes based on the volume of applications received. Only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Adaps is an equal opportunity employer that actively embraces diversity in its workforce through accurate community representation of gender, culture; thought and work arrangements.
30+ days ago
Report job"
201,Data Scientist,InfoCentric,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"InfoCentric is currently seeking Data Scientists with strong experience within either Forecasting or Optimisation Algorithms.

This role is going to be working within an exciting Advanced Analytics teams on multiple projects. This client is a large ASX listed organisation

This role is permanent and is Melbourne-based.

Who Are We?
We are one of the largest specialist Cloud, Data and Analytics Consulting firms

Data is in our DNA – Harnessing the latest technology, delivering thought leading outcomes in AI, Machine Learning, API development and Cloud Platform delivery

We translate the best ideas into awesome outcomes, that make a difference to Australia's largest organisations.

What We Offer
Opportunity – A chance to get exposure and hands on, onshore experience in Australia’s largest corporations. Own your role, show initiative and seek out responsibility
Training - We're investing in our people to make sure everyone is up-to-date on the latest technologies
Support – A large on-site team to help you settle in, to support any technical challenges and to support you personally, as well as Managerial Support from the on-site Principal Consultants
A place to have fun - Regular Social Events and Company Parties celebrating our collective achievements. Some recent events include, private cinema screenings, bubble soccer, mini golf, and bowling.
Due to the high amount of applicants we receive, you will be contacted if you are successful. We thank you for your interest in InfoCentric and working with us, if you're unsuccessful for this role we will keep your details and applications and reach out to you if you're suitable for future roles.
27 days ago
Report job"
202,Lead Data Scientist,Eliiza,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"We're looking for a Lead Data Scientist to join our Eliiza team.
In this awesome role you will work with other smart, passionate and skilled people to deliver data science products and services to clients.
With our diverse range of clients and projects, no day will look the same - but here's a great snapshot of what's in store:
you'll get to lead client projects by carrying out technical work, engaging with key stakeholders, helping to up-skill our clients and providing delivery oversight.
support pre-sales activities through client conversations, project scoping, and helping pull together proposals.
leading our internal data science capability by mentoring other data scientists, guiding our learning and development strategy, and helping with recruitment.
Who are we?
Glad you asked! We are Eliiza. Data science. Engineered for scale.
We are a passionate and collaborative team of data scientists and engineers who apply data science and machine learning to solve real-world problems. Our mission is to create a bright future for Australian businesses and society in a world increasingly influenced by intelligent technologies.

We've built a hybrid approach to remote working where you can access one of our awesome hubs providing a space for collaboration across Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, Magnetic island (and more to come!) meaning you can choose a work model that works best for you

We've created a culture that values diversity and fosters inclusion, where our people can truly be themselves! We're focused on providing opportunities for underrepresented minority groups to work within the tech industry.
While we get excited about building AI solutions for our customers we love nothing more than being part of the broader community. You'll find us at Meetups, writing blog posts, hosting brown bag sessions and podcasts!
We're also part of Mantel Group's 'house of brands' which means it's not just the Eliiza team you'll work with, learn from and see at social events - there's another 300+ of us across DigIO, Kasna & CMD Solutions!
So you're ready for something new?
We're keen to know more about you! Our team is made up of a range of people, with different experience across a huge range of data driven skill sets.
If you're the right Lead Data Scientist for us, you'll have:
an undergraduate degree in maths or statistics, or a postgraduate in broader disciplines such as the sciences
commercial data science experience across different industries and organisations
consulting experience, either with external clients or internally within an organisation
an understanding of key statistical and machine learning concepts across different areas of data science
the ability to manipulate complex data sets to visualise and model the data
fundamental software engineering skills
the ability to plan the different phases of a data science project
an awareness of how to deliver outcomes, prioritise steps and manage a team
experience in people leadership, thought leadership and driving best practices
a genuine passion for and connection to the data science and ML community
However, we value diverse skill-sets, and don't necessarily require that you're skilled with all of the above. If you feel you don't fit all the experience/skills listed above we still encourage you to apply or get in touch.
What's on offer if you join us?
We make sure you're always one step ahead by investing your learning and development, every year. We build our own training where it doesn't exist yet.
We hire smart people and get out of their way. By focusing on our five principles and not getting caught up in red tape, we trust you to get the job done.
You'll get all the tools you need - a new iPhone or Google phone, a new Macbook Pro or Dell, and a lot of branded swag!
But hold on, you mentioned a house of brands?
We certainly did! Mantel Group is an Australian-owned, 'house of brands' company with four technology businesses (Eliiza being one of them!) across Australia. We're building a group of companies with open borders so we can support you to take on new skills without leaving an awesome team - we understand you won't have one job for life!
We may only be just over 3 years old but Mantel Group has already been recognised #9 in the 2020 Best Places to Work in Australia and #4 in the AFR's 2020 fastest growing new companies.
Keen to chat?

Click ""Apply"" to share your details with our talent team, and we'll be in touch.

In the meantime, check out 'how we hire' to find out what's in store if you're successful and get to know us better by visiting our website and following Eliiza on LinkedIn.
30+ days ago
Report job"
203,Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP,Oracle,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Data Scientist - Machine Learning/ Computer Vision / NLP-20000SHH

Applicants are required to read, write, and speak the following languages: English
Preferred Qualifications

Principal Member of Technical Staff - Digital Assistant and Bots Platform Team

We are a newly formed group within Oracle creating innovative products that leverage the power of AI and Machine Learning to bring world-class speech, vision and natural language capabilities to Oracle’s Digital Assistant platform. We are like a start-up inside a large company with a big charter and a lot of creative freedom. We have assembled some of the smartest people in the industry and are growing this team.
If you are looking for an exciting new opportunity as a data scientist to help solve difficult problems, be creative, create success for customers, and engage with the product team to do some innovative research and development, please review our profile.

We are looking for someone who is:

Experienced with Machine Learning and AI especially deep learning models.
Experienced with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch.
Experienced with Conversational AI / Chatbots and/or Digital Assistants, including having developed a Chatbot or similar Digital Assistant is a plus.
Ph.D. degree in computer science on natural language processing, speech processing, computer vision is preferred but not a must. A strong publication record is a plus.
Possesses excellent communication skills with an ability to explain and write specifications that embody complex concepts to stakeholders within the team.
Eager to work on a highly sellable, performance optimized infrastructure which elastically handles customer needs.
Able to adapt to a fast-paced work environment and can quickly adjust to changing priorities.
Detail oriented with a focus on quality of the product, data, and code.
An experienced engineer with 3+ years of professional development in Java, C#, C++ or Python. Java and Python preferred. JavaScript, Node.js, HTML/CSS and Mobile development on Android/iOS is a plus.

DUTIES:

Keep track of and experiment with state of the art dialog systems both from academia and industry to keep pushing the market competitiveness of ODA.
Involve in all steps of software life cycle such as planning, coding, testing and maintenance to productize developed models.
Involve in planning and budgeting product roadmap.
Write papers/reports and communicate results to stakeholders and customers.
Require to communicate and coordinate with ODA head office (California) and European team as necessary which may include travel and after-hour participation.
Detailed Description and Job Requirements
Design, develop, troubleshoot and debug software programs for databases, applications, tools, networks etc.

As a member of the software engineering division, you will take an active role in the definition and evolution of standard practices and procedures. You will be responsible for defining and developing software for tasks associated with the developing, designing and debugging of software applications or operating systems.

Work is non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in area of specialization. Leading contributor individually and as a team member, providing direction and mentoring to others. BS or MS degree or equivalent experience relevant to functional area. 7 years of software engineering or related experience.
Job: Product Development
Location: AU-AU,Australia-Melbourne
Job Type: Regular Employee Hire
Organization: Oracle
30+ days ago
Report job"
204,"Product Manager, Machine-Learning & Sensors, Chrome OS Platform",Google,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Due to the current health crisis related to COVID-19 and the escalating visa/travel restrictions in place, we're currently unable to extend offers to anyone who cannot work from Australia due to lockdown visa/travel restrictions, or other restrictive measures until further notice. Consequently, we will be prioritizing candidates who can start in this location by set date as expected. We're keeping the situation under review and would adjust our position should the restrictive measures be removed later on.
Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field, or equivalent practical experience
5 years of product management experience in EE, ASIC, SoC, sensors, consumer electronics, machine learning or equivalent.
Experience with successful product launches and driving thorough execution focused on quality landings.
Ability to work across different timezones.

Preferred qualifications:
7 years of product management experience in EE, ASIC, SoC, sensors, low-level consumer electronics design, or machine learning.
Experience with leading large scale technical projects and/or working with engineering teams.
Experience working with other product managers across various disciplines
Effective at building relationships, collaborating and influencing others.
About the job
First launched in 2009 with the intent to bring speed, security and stability to devices, Chrome OS is an open source operating system that uses the Chrome Web Browser as its principal user interface. Devices using Chrome OS known as Chromebooks were first released to the market in 2011, and over time, have become the preferred computing device used in schools worldwide.
As an experienced product manager on the Chrome OS platform product team, you will own the vision, strategy & execution of Chrome OS projects located in the Sydney, Australia office.
As the Sydney platform PM, you’ll create a roadmap for these features and plan to intersect device launches, executing to your vision and creating seamless, smart, stable, and impactful user experiences.
You will also be a local product leader, maintaining consistent and reliable communication with other sites, and ensuring that the local team has all the strategic and roadmap resources they need to move fast and build great products
Responsibilities
Set the vision for Chrome OS platform machine learning, sensors and biometrics, defining the feature roadmap as well as goals for investments in new technologies and experiences.
Set quarterly and yearly goals and priorities for the engineering team.
Partner with engineering teams, ODMs, OEMs, and SoC providers to ensure seamless, stable user experience and ongoing evolution and improvement of the underlying technology.
Construct a compelling story for Chrome OS leadership on a multi-year vision, and the interim milestones required in order to achieve that vision.
Work collaboratively with engineering teams and peer platform product management teams in Sydney as well as in extended locations in Mountain View, CA, Colorado, and Taiwan.
Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing this form.
13 days ago
Report job"
205,Senior Data Engineer - Machine Learning,Servian,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Servian, is an award winning, regional and global tech consultancy with a rich heritage in Data, DevOps, Digital app dev, Machine Learning and cloud. We embrace innovation, change, and the positive impact it has for us and our clients. All roles at Servian involve personal and technical development pathways which aim to facilitate your career growth. We aim to build an employee experience where you will grow more with us, not be drowned out by the loudest voice, and hence we strive to set you up for a career which will have a greater impact.

We are currently looking for a talented Senior Data Engineer with experience in ML.

You will be working on exciting and interesting projects, being involved in implementing strategies and delivering on data solutions.

Our consultants are natural problem solvers - they are curious, ambitious and experts in their fields. You will have the opportunity to collaborate and learn from them. You will be working on exciting and interesting projects, working with our clients to understand their needs and to help shape the engagements that allow Servian to provide services that will meet those needs.

If you have a passion for learning new technologies, want to be tech agnostic, and work with like minded technologists, Servian is the place to grow your career and have fun in the process!

About the Role:

Machine Learning and Data Engineers at Servian are responsible for bringing experience and thought-leadership in all areas of data. Your skills will be leveraged by our clients, large and small, across all industries and technologies. Your expertise will guide their overall strategy and vision for data, analytics and AI and deliver on cutting-edge data projects, including machine learning.
Typical Responsibilities:
Discover the business problem to be solved and generate solutions that include Machine Learning
Develop Machine Learning models for diverse business problems
Develop optimisation solutions for business and industry
Architect, build and manage solutions for the establishment of data capabilities including data models, data warehousing
Architect, build and manage solutions for machine learning and analytics platforms in the cloud or on-premise
Design and implement machine learning pipelines. Design and build data ingestion solutions to import data from a variety of enterprise data sources
Develop reports and dashboards
Communicate analysis, insights, and technical solutions.
Analysis of human behaviours
Analysis of business operations and processes
Reporting and communication
Capabilities & Experience:
Strong strategic thinker and problem solver, with technical competency and commercial awareness.
A pragmatic approach to working
Mathematical background
Experience in data science, analytics, and statistics
Previous experience working with AI and ML technologies
Solid practical capability with SQL, P/SQL, databases, data modeling
Programming proficiency in Python or R with broad exposure to languages including Java, Scala or C
Knowledge of Cloud environments including Google, AWS, or Azure
Consulting experience would be highly desirable, but not essential
Why Servian?
At Servian we believe talented technologists matter, this means we want to help grow your career and develop your passion in the ever changing tech industry.
We were created by technologists, are led by technologists and we strive to build a consulting firm which offers:
A variety of interesting projects, using emerging technologies.
A collaborative environment for talented technologists.
Continuous learning and development across multiple dimensions including technology, leadership and commerciality.
Wellbeing & Benefits
Access to a wide range of internal training sessions, across both technical and consulting skills.
Certifications across all our partner technology vendors.
We provide employees with Life Insurance, Income Protection Insurance and access to an Employee Assistance Program.
Generous Parental leave.
We are proud to have a sociable workplace that values diversity and celebrates achievement with multiple company-wide, social, and family events throughout the year. Due to Covid-19, all social events are currently virtual.
Inclusion & Diversity
Servian recognises individual differences and welcomes people from a variety of life and work experiences. The diversity of our people is core to our ability to innovate, grow and to fulfil our collective aspiration of helping people to own their tomorrow.
A natural curiosity, a respect for differences and a growth mindset are valued at Servian.
Our business is focused developing our people and offerings across the following:
Cloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), DevOps and Automation inc HashiCorp
Data & Analytics - BI/DWH, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced Analytics
Digital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile Development
Customer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer Insights
Artificial Intelligence - Natural Language Processing, Computer Vision, Machine Learning, Deep Learning
Cyber Security - DevSecOps, Penetration Testing, Multi-Cloud Security, Security Posture Analysis
If this role sounds of interest, or you would like to hear about other exciting opportunities get in touch with the Servian Talent Acquisition Team.
30+ days ago
Report job"
206,Data Scientist,Robert Walters,Not shown,Perth WA,"Risk Management Technologies are a world leader in providing expertise in Enterprise Risk and Chemical Safety Data Management through software solutions. Committed to workplace safety for over 30 years RMT partner with large enterprise level resources and government organisations. RMT have a reputation for providing innovative data driven insights to better manage and mitigate future risks in the workplace.
Working with the Principal Data Scientist, you will work on a major program of work for the organisation in addition to projects across their client base as they expand their practice. They are seeking an experienced individual to engage with internal/external stakeholders, present critical findings and assist to enhance the capability of the data science practice.
Responsibilities:
Drive innovation within the internal team and with our lighthouse clients
Analyse and visualise data to generate insights
Design, implement and train machine learning models and algorithms
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyse model performance and accuracy.
Work in a cross-functional team to build real-world software solutions and demonstrate business
value
Requirements:
You must be articulate, adaptable and creative with excellent presentation skills.
You will have applied knowledge of several data technologies, practices and analytical approaches
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms, statistics, simulation, scenario
analysis, modelling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, support vector machines etc.
Qualifications:
Australian Citizenship or capable of rapidly obtaining one
3 to 5 year's post graduate experience ideally with PhD in mathematics, science or engineering

Why RMT?
Great projects, workplace, remuneration and colleagues
Development opportunities as company seeks to expand internationally
Opportunity to develop data science approaches and drive business growth
Innovative product suite with continued investment to improve market share
Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Peoples are encouraged to apply.
To apply please click apply or call Jodie Gillespie on 08 9266 0941 for a confidential discussion.

Risk Management Technologies are a world leader in providing expertise in Enterprise Risk and Chemical Safety Data Management through software solutions. Committed to workplace safety for over 30 years RMT partner with large enterprise level resources and government organisations ...
17 days ago
Report job"
207,Machine Learning Engineer,Nearmap,Not shown,Barangaroo NSW,"Nearmap is unique. An Australian global technology company with incredible people.

At Nearmap, we have petabytes of high quality aerial imagery (covering half a million square kilometres a year at 5-7cm resolution, and regularly captured imagery back to 2009). We produce automated 3D models of entire cities, and have recently launched our new product, Nearmap AI, which turns our visual content into semantic information to power decisions in a wide range of organisations. As a publicly listed company focussed on growth, we have both the resources to allow you to succeed in your role, and the agility (thanks to cloud-based infrastructure) to rapidly take advantage of the latest developments in the field. Nearmap is continually evolving, and you’ll need to thrive in a fast paced environment that changes rapidly.

We are looking for a Machine Learning Engineer to join our growing AI team team. You’ll be designing, building and operating software systems that manage petabytes of data, as we transform imagery with deep learning, and human expert labelling systems in the loop. Operating on mix of cloud and on-premise clusters, using cloud native technologies (primarily Kubernetes), you’ll make heavy use of technologies like Tensorflow, Keras, NVIDIA toolkits, Kubernetes, gRPC, and other modern MLOps solutions.

You will work with an incredibly passionate and talented team of Data Scientists and Machine Learning Engineers, and Data Engineers and your work will interface with systems that run tensorflow on thousands of GPUs, and train large deep learning models with novel architectures. You will report to the Principal Machine Learning Engineer who runs our Data Engine team within the AI Systems group. The team mixes data science, ML engineering and software engineering, and has responsibility for building the systems and managing the data for human expert labelling of our imagery, and support the training and management of our deep learning models. We have a custom labelling environment built on our Map Browser product that allows our labelling team to annotate 2D, 3D and source imagery. We use algorithms in the loop to enhance the human labelling of millions of images, and automatically produce training data sets for ML that continually grow and improve in quality as we seek to build a richer machine learning derived picture of our physical world. We are looking to build software and systems in place to facilitate efficient distributed and continual model training platform. This role will be critical in achieving that.

A typical day will look like this
Completing end-to-end technical data science projects (taking design decisions, prototyping, putting into production).
Reviewing code and work of peers.
May be required to supervise associates.

Experience
Minimum 4 years specific experience in machine learning (through any combination of an ML focused Masters or PhD, and relevant work experience)

Skills
We're after an exceptional candidate, who has real world experience but is still eager to learn.

Essential:
Programming/Tech Environments: Ability to code in scientific python, using a linux environment, and git for source control. Understand the software engineer principles and passionate about good quality software engineering and machine learning code.
Machine Learning: Strong grasp of machine learning fundamentals (regularisation, hyperparameter optimisation, validation methods)
Scientific Approach: Follow the scientific method of formulating hypotheses, and applying statistical tests to validate them
Software Engineering: Working on shared codebases to produce production quality code
Cloud Computing: Working on AWS or GCP using distributed virtual machines, docker containers, etc.
GP-GPU: Using GPUs to accelerate scientific computing
MLOps: Experience with operationalizing ML applications and workflows

Highly Desirable:
Domain Knowledge – Computer Vision: Working on Machine Learning problems applied to image data
Deep Learning: Applying modern artificial neural networks to solve machine learning problems
Scale: Working with large data sets, where data sets don’t fit into memory, and require multiple nodes to compute efficiently

Personal attributes
Pragmatism: While extensive knowledge of ML theory is highly valued, pragmatism wins over elaborate theory when it comes to shipping products that work
Collaboration: data science is a team sport, communicate well, share knowledge, and be open to taking on ideas from anyone in the team.
Attention to detail: Showing attention to detail when it counts is important... to be considered for this role, [click this link](https://www.dropbox.com/s/u4janrzqgfxn61l/test.tar.gz?dl=0) and apply some basic data science skills (an astute software engineer should be able to solve it quickly with a little googling!).

Tertiary Qualifications
Formal education in a technical, data related field (Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, statistics, physics, etc.)

Some of our benefits
Nearmap takes a holistic approach to our employees’ emotional, physical and financial wellness. Some of our current benefits include competitive pay, access to the Nearmap employee share scheme, short and long-term financial incentives, flexible working options, paid volunteer days, gym and phone rebates, and lots of development opportunities including hack-a-thons and pitch-fests.

If you can see yourself working at Nearmap and feel you have the right level of experience, we invite you to get in touch.

Watch some presentations on what we do in the AI Systems group:

https://youtu.be/WSMYfAEdAe4

https://youtu.be/WSMYfAEdAe4

https://youtu.be/ZEGdSLWdrH0

https://youtu.be/ZEGdSLWdrH0

https://youtu.be/8mSSG6uICW0

https://youtu.be/8mSSG6uICW0?t=211s
24 days ago
Report job"
208,"Machine Learning Scientist - Adelaide, South Australia",Amazon Support Services PtyLtd,Not shown,Adelaide Region SA,"PhD in CS, Machine Learning, Operational research, Statistics or in a highly quantitative field. (PhD strongly preferred).
Strong Problem solving ability
Good skills in Python (or similar language)
Strong communication and data presentation skills

Interested in creating new state-of-the-art solutions using Machine Learning and Data Mining techniques on Terabytes of Data? Join our newly created Machine Learning Lab in Adelaide, South Australia!

At Amazon Australia, we are developing state-of-the-art large-scale Machine Learning Services and Applications on the Cloud involving Terabytes of data. We work on applying predictive technology to a wide spectrum of problems in areas such as Amazon Retail, Seller Services, Customer Service and so on. We are looking for talented and experienced Machine Learning Scientists (Ph.D. in a related area preferred) who can apply innovative Machine Learning techniques to real-world e-Commerce problems. You will get to work in a team dedicated to advancing Machine Learning technology at Amazon and converting it to business-impacting solutions.

Although this position will be based in Adelaide, South Australia, for the duration of the Coronavirus-19 outbreak arrangements will be made to enable the successful candidate to observe the relevant travel restrictions, possibly by working from home, or another Amazon office.

Major responsibilities
Use machine learning, data mining and statistical techniques to create new, scalable solutions for business problems
Analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of Amazon’s historical business data to help automate and optimize key processes
Design, develop and evaluate highly innovative models for predictive learning
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches

5+ years of industrial experience in predictive modeling and analysis, predictive software development
Experience handling gigabyte and terabyte size datasets
Experience working with retail or e-commerce data
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing
Experience in using R, Matlab, or any other statistical software
Experience in mentoring junior team members, and guiding them on machine learning and data modeling applications
Publications or presentation in recognized Machine Learning and Data Mining journals/conferences
Amazon.com
30+ days ago
Report job"
209,Director; Data and Analytics (EL2) Strategic Data Analysis Unit,Australian Competition & Consumer Commission (ACCC...,"$123,969 - $145,280 a year",Adelaide Region SA,"Are you a highly motivated and innovative data and analytics practitioner? The ACCC is seeking multiple data and analytics leaders to join its specialist team and use their technical expertise for the benefit of Australian consumers, small businesses and the wider economy.
In a data and algorithm driven economy, it is critical that the ACCC has the ability to use advanced data and analytics techniques. It’s also critical for the agency to be able to analyse and understand how companies are using these data and analytics techniques to run their businesses and make decisions.
This is a unique opportunity to contribute to complex and often high profile investigations across the ACCC’s economy-wide role.
Successful candidates will be capable of working independently and have advanced expertise in data analytics, data science and/or data engineering.

Our successful applicants will:
Deliver complex analysis and interpretation, to contribute to data informed decision making at all levels of the agency.
Apply significant judgement in choosing a course of action to manage highly complex and/or sensitive issues.
Provide leadership in implementing and promoting a climate of innovation, change and continuous improvement for Strategic Data and Analysis Unit and the agency as a whole.
Act on opportunities to ensure more efficient and effective ways to use data. Identify areas of innovation in data tools and techniques, and recognise appropriate timing for adoption.
Represent the ACCC/AER in external forums.
Prepare written papers, reports, presentations, speeches and submissions for the Commission, committees and external parties.
Develop and manage strategic relationships with a broad range of internal and external stakeholders promoting the agency’s business objectives and communicating the strategic direction and vision of the agency.
Contribute to agency-wide strategic planning and set strategic direction, develop long-term plans and implement strategies for work area
Build data literacy and organisational capability in quantitative skills
Negotiate with and influence internal and external stakeholders to encourage adoption of better data practices
Lead a team of technical experts:
Build problem solving capabilities in others
Plan, organise and prioritise a team’s demanding workload
Contribute to and manage multiple projects with competing deadlines
Manage, lead, guide, mentor and develop team members.
Perform other duties as required.
The Legal, Economic and Data Division and the Strategic Data Analysis Unit
This role will sit in the Strategic Data Analysis Unit (SDAU) within the Legal, Economic and Data Division.
The SDAU is the ACCC’s specialist data and analytics area. SDAU also leads the agency’s data governance and knowledge management programs. The Unit contributes to matters and projects across the whole of the ACCC’s remit.
The Legal, Economic and Data Division (LEDD) is the ACCC/AER’s in-house provider of legal, economic and data analysis services across the ACCC and AER. Within the broader Division, the Legal Group provides in-house legal support across the full range of the agency’s functions, including investigations and litigation, regulation and corporate law. The Economic Group similarly provides economic advice across the full ACCC’s range of functions.
How to apply
When applying you will be asked to upload your resume and submit a statement of claims that is no more than 500 words. Your statement of claims should cover: why you are interested in the role, what you can offer us, and how your skills, knowledge, experience and qualifications are applicable to the role. Use your statement to tell us why we should hire you.
When preparing your statement of claims, please take into consideration the role and duties, and detail instances from your past that demonstrate how you meet the selection criteria.
Salary: $123, 969 - $145, 280 per annum (plus 15.4% superannuation)
Contact Officer: Imma Chippendale, (02) 9230 3863
These roles are available on a full time, part time or job share basis.
11 days ago
Report job"
210,Analytics Manager,Greater Bank,Not shown,Hamilton NSW,"Greater Bank is transforming, adapting and rethinking banking. As one of Australia’s largest customer-owned financial institutions, with over 270,000 customers and over $7 billion in assets under management, we are more than just an award-winning financial services organisation, we do the right thing by our customers and provide a better way of banking.
About the Position
This newly created position will shape our organisation wide approach to data and analytics. Reporting to the Head of Data you will manage the analytics, reporting and data science function of Greater Bank in line with strategic objectives. This is an opportunity for an experienced data driven professional with enterprise experience to take a key position as Greater Bank transforms. The Analytics Manager will drive the development and interrogation of internal and external data assets using analytical and advanced statistical techniques to deliver actionable insights that will have significant financial benefits.
Key responsibilities:
Lead the development of new BI assets that align with our strategy of cloud based self-service analytics
Be responsible for executing on our Data Strategy and Roadmap, ensuring that appropriate technologies are utilised to support business objectives
Implement commercially orientated business system practices to ensure continuous improvement and competitive advantage
Conduct analysis and investigation of reports and other data sources to provide actionable insights regarding customer behaviour and industry trends to stakeholders
Explore and analyse data, deciphering key learnings and insights and present to the business to develop customer and business improvement strategy
Provide accurate and consistent design and distribution of interactive visualisations, leveraging these to create compelling data stories
Build and lead a team of analytics and data science professionals
What we’re looking for
You will bring best in class practices and you will have an inquisitive and creative mind to mould the analytics capabilities and resources of the Bank and help us take customer experience to the next level.
Additionally you will have:
Extensive experience in analytics and prior experience leading BI professionals
Strong understanding of the BI and Analytics Technology landscape
Proven experience using reporting and data visualisation tools such as Looker, Power BI, Tableau, Qlik, SAS VA
Experience in R/Python/SQL and SAS (statistical software) and MS Excel
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to consult and influence stakeholders
Ability to set clear achievable goals, priorities and meet deadlines
Proven ability to build strong, open and collaborative working relationships
High level of interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to build long lasting relationships with internal and external stakeholders
Tertiary or Degree level qualification in relevant field such as a relevant field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related discipline
Understanding of the financial services industry including working knowledge of banking products and metrics, covering mortgages will be a bonus
What’s in it for you
Greater Bank isn’t like the big banks. We are a mid-tier customer-owned bank with a commitment to delivering solutions that genuinely help our customers and their communities. Our people are key to our success and we provide a workplace that values flexibility, autonomy and transparency.
We offer you the platform to demonstrate your capability and further develop your career within an established challenger brand who are very much focused on our customers.
We offer you great benefits, including:
Being part of a change that has a meaningful and long-lasting impact on our customers
Informal and formal flexible work/life balance options, including purchasing additional leave and self-funded days off
Supported training and development options to support your career pathway
Participation in your relevant incentive program
Salary packaging, discounted financial products, corporate health insurance and an excellent corporate gym membership program
A rewarding employee recognition program
For those not currently living in Newcastle, this opportunity also offers a rare sea change. Newcastle offers superb beaches, a sun-drenched climate, historical architecture, great cafes and restaurants, the convenience of a national airport, major hospital facilities, and quality schools and is the gateway to picturesque Hunter Valley and Port Stephens.
To Apply
If this sounds like the perfect career opportunity, please submit your application online.
For a confidential discussion please contact Caroline Martin on 02 4921 9721.
This could be the start of your rewarding career with Greater Bank.
7 days ago
Report job"
211,Developer Strategy PM for Data Science and Data Engineering,Microsoft,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Microsoft is on a mission to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. Our culture is centered on embracing a growth mindset, a theme of inspiring excellence, and encouraging teams and leaders to bring their best each day. In doing so, we create life-changing innovations that impact billions of lives around the world. You can help us to achieve our mission.

The Australian subsidiary is looking for a motivated, self-driven individual to drive Azure adoption with the local professional developer community—specifically in the area of data science, data engineering. In this role you will drive awareness and engagement with the professional developer community, both as the local developer audience expert and as an Azure subject-matter expert. You love to engage technically 1:1 with customers and also build strategies and programs that can drive engagement and impact at scale. The right candidate brings a technical leadership mindset with experience engaging with developers and data scientists across both open-source and Microsoft AI + ML technologies. This candidate must have a strong data engineering or machine learning background and love to collaborate with a team of fun, tech-minded humans!

Azure Developer Product Managers use their deep audience expertise and strategic planning skills to reach and influence professional data scientist and data engineers to try Microsoft’s Azure platform, both through in-person 1:many engagements and at digital scale. Azure Developer PMs help drive broad awareness, skilling and adoption of Azure services to promote a self-sustaining ecosystem of skilled cloud data scientists and data engineers.
Responsibilities
Business Management (30%)
Build strategies to reach and engage data scientists and data engineers
Track plan effectiveness, report insights, make adjustments as needed
Manage investments and funds, create accelerator programs /offers for customers and partners and land programs and offers across business groups
Create engagement strategy, including campaign/program business plan, community, customer and partner strategy, and campaign investment decisions that drive maximum reach/impact.
Influence the creation of marketing plans and campaign investment decisions that accrue to your core strategy.
Provide product-related content like customer benefits, competitive differentiators, and value of the product innovation to your audience
Conduct marketplace environmental and competitive analyses to inform your strategy
Identify strategic market-maker partners and influence joint go-to-market plans where relevant

Orchestration (30%)
Drive orchestration to deliver on metrics and commitments, support Rhythm of the Business (ROB)
Operate across many teams and stakeholders to bring the best of Microsoft to bear behind your strategy and to support your audience—key teams include: Marketing, Product Marketing, Technical Sales, and Solution Architects.
Determine a common set of KPIs for marketing activities in collaboration with other teams involved (e.g. segment marketing, audience marketing, other BGs)
Ability to drive impact through influence of others—whether inside Microsoft or across customers, partners, and the community.

Product Evangelism (40%)
Maintain product knowledge and evangelise the product internally and externally to Press, enthusiasts, influencers, pre-sales customer scenarios—represent Microsoft at first- and third-party events
Plan and execute activities that promotes Microsoft AI products and feature releases; lead product launch activities/releases
Influence and support marketing teams on customer journeys, messaging, call to actions, and activities (events, webinars, etc) that drive impact for your business strategy
Act as the voice of the field by ensuring timely updates/feedback to Corporate on product marketing and campaign execution in subsidiary
Leverage the customer voice to support your strategy in reaching your audience
Qualifications
Experience: 5-7 years related experience
Experience with cloud technologies, data, analytics, AI, and modern app dev
Evangelist and subject matter expert for product
Deep customer focus and understanding
Strong analytical skills
Excellent communicator
Experienced in core marketing functions
Education: Bachelor’s Degree (B.S./B.A.) required, MBA a plus. Relevant fields of study include Marketing, Business, Computer Science.
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances.

Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.
30+ days ago
Report job"
212,"Senior Statistical Analysts and Data Scientists (APS 6), Labour Market and Population Statistics",Australian Bureau of Statistics,"$82,820 - $93,530 a year",Belconnen ACT,"Ongoing permanent positions
APS 6 level ($82,820 - $93,530 plus 15.4% super)
Canberra and Perth locations

The Australian Bureau of Statistics (ABS) is seeking to recruit several Senior Statistical Analysts and Data Scientists at the APS 6 classification level for our Labour Market and Population Statistics Division. The positions are located in both our Canberra and Perth offices.

About the roles

Working as a Senior Statistical Analyst or Data Scientist, you will be responsible for the design, analysis and delivery of relevant and objective statistics. The roles and responsibilities may vary depending on the team in which the applicant is placed, however typical responsibilities include:

analysing data and drawing findings, using judgement and real-world insights
applying a strong understanding of statistical frameworks, classifications, standards and concepts that underpin the data
working with internal and external stakeholders and customers to develop fit for purpose specifications of data solutions requirements
critical thinking and reasoning: anticipate and analyse issues and develop logical conclusions based on reasoning
manage people effectively, delegating, driving high performance.

About you

To be suitable you should have most of or all the following skills, qualities and experience:

well-developed data skills including the ability to analyse large, complex datasets (preferably in the areas of labour or economic statistics)
strong project management skills and the ability to deliver quality outcomes within a dynamic and complex environment
demonstrated skills in problem solving and decision making
ability to work in and manage a high performing team
strong oral and written communication skills.

Eligibility

To be eligible for this role you:
must be an Australian citizen at the time you apply
will need to undertake pre-employment checks, including national police check and health assessment
will need to obtain and maintain a Baseline security clearance.

Application Process

You will be required to submit a 700 word statement of your skills relevant to the qualities, skills and experience for these roles, together with a current resume.

If you are interested in submitting an application for this opportunity, please click the Begin button below to commence your application. Applications must be submitted by 11:30 pm AEDT, Sunday 21 February 2021.

Further information

Please read the
12 days ago
Report job"
213,Early Career Development Fellow (ECDF) – Machine Learning and/or Artificial Intelligence (2 positions),RMIT University,"$98,495 - $116,965 a year",Melbourne City Centre VIC,"Early Career Development Fellow (ECDF) – Machine Learning and/or Artificial Intelligence (2 positions)
Job no: 593446
Work type: Full time - Fixed term/Contract
Categories: Science, Technology, Teaching, Teaching and Research, Information Technology
2 x Full-time, 3 -year fixed-term contract positions based at RMIT City campus but may be required to work and/or be based at another campus of the University and/or partner institutes (including overseas)
Grow and further develop your teaching & research expertise and experiences in Machine Learning and/or Artificial Intelligence to deliver impactful and effective learning experiences to students via use of digital teaching technologies, in-line with School of Computing Technologies, STEM College and the University strategic goals
Report directly to the Professor John Thangarajah, Associate Dean, Artificial Intelligence
Remuneration at Academic Level A ($68,983 - $93,569) or Academic Level B ($98,495 - $116,965) + 17% superannuation
About us
RMIT is a multi-sector university of technology, design and enterprise with more than 91,000 students and 11,000 staff globally. RMIT offers postgraduate, undergraduate, vocational education and online programs to provide students with a variety of work-relevant pathways.
Our purpose is to offer life-changing experiences for our students, and to help shape the world with research, innovation, teaching and industry engagement. With strong industry connections forged over 130 years, collaboration with industry remains integral to RMIT’s leadership in education, applied and innovative research, and to the development of highly skilled, globally focused graduates.
Culture
Our Values inspire us, wherever we are in the world, and guide how we live and work together.
Imagination. Agility. Courage. Passion. Impact. Inclusion.
What unites us is our purpose and our values; they are at the heart of who we are, what we stand for, how we make decisions and connect with each other.
Our people make everything at the University possible. We encourage new approaches to work and learning, stimulating change to drive positive impact. RMIT exists to create transformative experiences for our students, getting them ready for life and work. You will be a part of a productive and collaborative team, who values working relationships and outcomes through open and inclusive planning, continuous information sharing and transparent work practices.
About the College
The STEM College holds a leading position and expertise in the science, technology, engineering, mathematics and health (STEM) fields. We are uniquely positioned to influence and partner with industry, as never before.
STEM College is a community of exceptional STEM researchers, teachers, inventors, designers and game-changers, supported by talented professional staff. We offer higher education programs across all STEM disciplines at the Bachelor, Master and PhD levels, and ensure our students experience an education that is work-aligned and life-changing.
Further information on STEM College in this link.
School of Computing Technologies

There are three discipline clusters in the Computing Technologies School –
Artificial Intelligence
Cloud, Systems & Security
Data Science
The School's PhD students and faculty conduct world class research in Artificial Intelligence (AI), Search and Recommendation, Machine Learning, Data Analytics, Distributed Computing and Cybersecurity. Our goal is consolidating our digital innovation capabilities and expertise into one School positions us to respond to strategic industry and economic opportunities aligned to digital technology and transformations. The School will fast-track digital innovation across all College programs and elevate our external position as a leader in technology and digital innovation. The School's leadership is tasked with the significant responsibility of building the architecture and capability to position RMIT with a supercomputer capacity and a world class digital leading lab which will support interdisciplinary activities as they transition into augmented reality.
Details relating to the School of Computing Technologies in this link.
About You and the Role
You will be responsible for:
Developing and delivering authentic & pragmatic learning and teaching opportunities for students at undergraduate, honours and postgraduate level including delivery of lectures, and programs through high-quality and engaging course materials; preparing, conducting and moderating assessment; implementing improvements informed by course evaluation activities and student feedback;
Conduct research/scholarly activities under limited supervision both independently and as a member of the team, including publishing research outcomes as lead or co-author in highly ranked journals, conferences and forums, submitting and actively identifying appropriate research grants & funding, involvement in collaborative projects and supervision of higher degree by research students, honours and WIL (Work Integrated Learning) projects as appropriate;
Cultivate and ensure strong relationships through developing networks, maintaining memberships, links and partnerships with academic members, industry and professional communities; as well as participation in the on-going process improvement within this discipline and in the School of Computing Technologies;
Commitment to perform varied academic administrative duties based on the level of appointment and to deliver full academic responsibility relating to the coordination of course delivery.
Qualifications
Mandatory: PhD or equivalent research doctorates in Computer Science in particularly in the areas of Machine Learning and/or Artificial Intelligence as well as teaching experience coupled with research record in relevant field.
Desirable:
Demonstratable experience in preparing effective and efficient lectures, tutorials, online delivery of course material and/or blended learning for students undertaking undergraduate and graduate levels in Computer Science;
Candidates who have in-depth knowledge and/or hands-on experience teaching in areas of Computer Scienceincluding first year programming (Java, Python) and software engineering courses are encouraged to apply;
Experience supervising higher degree by research candidates is desirable;
An emerging track record and published research outputs in high impact journals & articles in Machine Learning, preferably applied to - Reinforcement learning, Deep Learning, Machine vision, Image Recognition, optimization or autonomous decision making and contributing to the development of new research initiatives, external research funding submissions and strong linkage to industry and government is highly regarded.
Preferred: Completion of the Essentials in Tertiary Teaching Practice program or equivalent (if the appointed candidate does not meet this requirement at time of appointment, they will be supported to complete this as a requirement to fulfil their probation).
In order to be eligible for this ECDF role you will have performed casual teaching work for an Australian University during the past three years and have not been employed on a continuing basis at an Australian University. If you have previously been employed on a fixed-term basis at an Australian University are eligible for this position, however, the requirements to also have performed casual teaching work as per above parameters.
Note: Appointment to this position is subject to passing a Working with Children check.
Bring your whole self to work
We are better for our diversity. When we listen to those who are different to us, or challenge us, we grow stronger together. When we feel like we belong, we can achieve so much more. We respect each other, embrace our differences and build a sense of belonging in our team and beyond.
We are proud that our dedication to diversity has been recognized by a broad spectrum of external organizations. Visit our Linkedin Life pages to learn more and see some of our most recent wins.
To Apply
Please submit your resume and a cover letter outlining your experience and achievements by clicking on the ‘Apply now’ link. Please note that a separate response to Key Selection Criteria as stated on the Position Description is required. For any enquiries regarding this role, please contact Professor John Thangarajah, Associate Dean (Artificial Intelligence) (john.thangarajah@rmit.edu.au)
PD - 593446 - ECDF Machine Learning or Artificial Intelligence.pdf
RMIT is a Disability Confident Recruitment Team and we are happy to adjust the recruitment process for your accessibility requirements. Please contact us at TalentSupport@rmit.edu.au telling us your preferred type of communication and we will be in touch as soon as possible to discuss your requirements.
Applications close Sunday 28th February 2021.
RMIT is an equal opportunity employer committed to being a child safe organisation. We are dedicated to attracting, retaining and developing our people regardless of gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, disability and age. Applications are encouraged from all sectors of the community and we strongly encourage applications from the Aboriginal and/or Torres Strait Islander community.
Please note that whilst we still accept applications from any persons interested in our roles, due to the impacts of COVID-19, we are currently prioritising applications from those with current working rights in Australia and who are not affected by travel restrictions. Please see the latest updates to Australia’s immigration and border arrangements during the COVID-19 (Coronavirus) outbreak: https://covid19.homeaffairs.gov.au/
Application close: 28 Feb 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Back to search results Apply now
18 days ago
Report job"
214,Senior Data Scientist,Job Capital,"$100,000 - $112,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"Our client is actively seeking a Senior Data Scientist
The purpose of this role is to support the Data Sciences team to develop, implement and optimise analytical and predictive models to deliver better product customer targeting to increase the effectiveness of campaigns at the same time driving great engagement/loyalty.
Accountabilities
Work closely with key stakeholders to understand business questions and execute data science projects that deliver business solution.
Develop and maintain state of the art advanced statistical and machine learning models (GLM, Random Forests, GBM, xGBoost, etc) to drive Woolworths Rewards marketing strategies and tactical executions.
Responsible for the end-to-end data science execution including scoping, building, testing, implementation, maintenance, tracking and optimisation of predictive models.
Responsible for complete and accurate documentation of all development.
Engage with business partners and delivery teams to ensure algorithms are delivered and implemented into production systems
Develop, maintain and enhance variety of customer segmentation models to uncover customer insights.
Interpret analysis and modelling results in a business context and provide commercially focussed recommendations to support business decisions.
Maintain and enhance the modelling data mart to ensure efficient and accurate modelling process.
Applicant requirements
7 to 10 years experience developing predictive models in commercial environments, preferably exposure to Sales and Marketing.
Ideally experience in retail vertical markets (not essential)
Experience in developing class-leading algorithms to drive commercial outcomes.
Proven commercial experience in statistical and machine learning modelling, with experience manipulating and ‘making sense’ of big data from disparate systems.
Advanced working knowledge of analytical programming: SQL, SAS, R or Python.
Exposure to Big Data platforms, such as Hadoop and Spark.
Experience with SQL essential; exposure to AWS Redshift or Teradata preferred.
Experience in working in complex, multi-stakeholder environments.
Experience in leading and mentoring teams of data scientists.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organise, analyse and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Tertiary qualified in relevant discipline (Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science). PhD preferred.
Due to the high volume of applications we receive Job Capital are only able to respond to the candidates fitting this roles criteria. Only successfully shortlisted candidates will be contacted.
Please note that Job Capital does not accept phone enquires, so please click apply now so we can review your application.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract, Permanent
Salary: $100,000.00 – $112,000.00 per year
Experience:
relevant: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor Degree (Hons) (Required)
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
20 days ago
Report job"
215,Data Analyst/Data Scientist - Associate,PwC,Not shown,Perth WA,"Line of Service
Assurance
Industry/Sector
Not Applicable
Specialism
Risk
Management Level
Associate
Job Description & Summary
With PwC, you’ll ignite a meaningful career while being supported by a flexible working culture, innovative learning and development opportunities and progressive policies and benefits, such as 18 weeks paid parental leave for mums, dads and foster carers (no minimum service!)
What will you create?
You’ll help Australian businesses, not-for-profits and governments create value and improve the way they work. From digitising healthcare, to creating smarter cities and igniting our start-up industry, together we build trust in society and solve important problems.
Our Data Assurance team brings this to life by helping clients to protect and strengthen every aspect of their business; from people to performance, systems to strategy and business plans to business resilience. You’ll use your data analysis and visualisation skills to communicate insights for some of Australia's largest energy, resources, utilities, government and health organisations. Helping them to solve problems such as automating financial and operational processes, digitising reporting, remediating business issues using data and identifying fraudulent activities through cross functional testing.
As an Associate in our Data Assurance team your impact will be seen by:
Partnering with clients to enable them to understand the value in their data through analytics and visualisation
Helping businesses make sense of complex data sets to improve efficiency and quality of assurance processes
Demonstrating an ability to listen, learn and understand when challenged by complex project issues
About you

You have 1-3 years experience with a background in Data Science, or Computer Science, or Programming and Applied Statistics, or Mathematics underpinned by related degree-level qualification or other fields such as Econometrics, Finance, Accounting, Commerce, Science or Engineering . You have working knowledge of process automation, reporting digitisation, and/or data governance, transformation, analysis , and experience with Alteryx, Sql, Python, R, Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Tableau and/or Qlik Sense.
Passionate about being at the forefront of change, you’re ready to help our Assurance team solve complex business issues, improve how systems work and provide confidence on the bigger decisions.
You’re collaborative and enjoy working in an innovative environment. You’re a problem solver by nature and want to join a firm that values the kind of people who reimagine the possible for their clients and stakeholders. Most importantly, you act with integrity and show care for the people you work with.

Life at PwC
Our culture and benefits are something we’re proud of, and also why we’re consistently named as one of Australia’s best workplaces. With PwC, you’ll belong to an inclusive community where differences are both embraced and the underlying driver in everything we create together.
We empower you with the technology, coaching, flexibility and trust needed to make a meaningful difference, while supporting you in bringing your whole self to work each day. We’re committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce because we know it’s only by working together that we can realise the potential of our people, clients and society around us.
We’re living this commitment through initiatives including our Reconciliation Action Plan to increase Indigenous employment and employee-led diversity networks promoting cultural, disability, LGBTI and gender equality. At our core we’re a people business, which means you’ll be supported not just in your professional development but your personal growth as well.
Liza Darnell is the Recruitment Manager for the role. As the team experiences high volumes of applications, we appreciate your patience to allow for a timely and fair process for all.
Education (if blank, degree and/or field of study not specified)
Degrees/Field of Study required:
Degrees/Field of Study preferred:
Certifications (if blank, certifications not specified)
Desired Languages (If blank, desired languages not specified)
Travel Requirements
Not Specified
Available for Work Visa Sponsorship?
Yes
Government Clearance Required?
No
Job Posting End Date
March 31, 2021
18 days ago
Report job"
216,"Senior Manager, Data Science Australia",Visa,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Company Description
As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.
At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of disruptors, trailblazers, innovators and risk-takers who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.
You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let's transform the way the world pays.

Job Description
Team Summary
Visa's Data Science team is a high-performing team of data scientists, data analysts, statisticians, and business analysts from a variety of countries – serving major FIs and merchants within Asia Pacific. We are looking for a hands-on person who is result oriented, highly organized and focused to delivered industry leading analytics solutions
What a Senior Manager, Data Science does at Visa:
The Sr. Manager, Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific (AuNZSP) will be the analytics subject matter expert and will be reporting to the Head of Data Science for Australia, New Zealand and South Pacific. The incumbent will be expected to have exceptional problem-solving skills using advanced analytics/ Machine learning/ AI with a sharp focus on execution. Responsibilities will include deconstructing the business problem into analysis approach, package analysis insights into client consumable format within committed timeline/scope and develop new solution capabilities. The incumbent is expected to be hands on and will have the required knowhow to work with big data using cutting-edge machine learning/ AI solutions. The role will have to closely collaborate with data science analysts, members of the broader team in Visa Consulting and Analytics and other business stakeholders. Staying on top of the analytics industry trends, the candidate will need to ensure the analytics solutions are constantly revamped, innovations are fostered and solutions are implementable. The role is focused on Australia market and will be based in Sydney, Australia.
Analytics subject matter expert in all analytics topics including business problem definition, constructing analytical framework, development, validation of said framework via best statistical methodologies and implementation and package insights into client consumable format
Enhance existing analytic techniques by promoting new methodology and best practices in analytics field
Delivering multiple analytics projects along with rest of the stakeholders in Data Science & Consulting teams
Develop analytical solutions and strategies, testing & monitoring frameworks, estimate revenue impact for the client(s)
Actively seek out opportunities to innovate by using non-traditional data and new modeling techniques
Collaborating with the internal teams to fully understand business requirements and desired business outcomes
Defining detailed analytic scope and methodology, and creating analytic plan
Providing thought leadership in both using data to solve business problems and in arriving at innovative statistical solutions
Ensuring all project documentation is up to date and maintain the highest levels of quality in deliverables
Ensuring project delivery within timelines and budget requirements
Contribute to the development of the team’s analytical skills and expertise.
Cultivates open and clear communications across team members and stakeholders
Why this is important to Visa
As a payment consulting arm of Visa, VCA is growing a team of highly specialized experts that can provide best in class payment expertise to the client. We want to bring this expertise closer to our clients by placing the Sr. Manager, Data Science in-market in Sydney. We are a global organization leveraging global expertise and best practice with local knowledge and understanding of our client partners. This enables us to deepen our partnership with our clients and bring value to their business.

Qualifications
What you will need:
10+ years of hands on analytical experience
Subject matter expert in analytics especially in areas of analytical methodologies
Strong understanding and prior experience in Machine Learning and Geo-location-based analytics is must.
Proficiency in coding skills using SAS, SQL, Hive, Python, R, Spark and Pyspark on large datasets
Proficiency in data visualisation and data visualisation software such as Tableau, Power BI etc.
Excellent communicator – should have the capability to translate numbers to business insights
Experienced in managing multiple projects and initiatives
Superior analytical and problem-solving skills, with demonstrated intellectual and analytical rigor
Must be team oriented, collaborative, diplomatic, and flexible, with excellent presentation skills, including strong oral and writing capabilities
Experienced in working across a matrixed organization; multi-regional experience preferred
What will also help:
Very strong advanced analytics experience. Hands on experience in developing machine-learning models using Python, R, SAS and other open source resources.
Strong expertise in data visualisation tools
Thorough understanding of the recommender system, classification techniques, graph theory, bayesian, time series and regression models are recommended
Excellent written English
Expert level PowerPoint
Experience and in-depth knowledge of the cards and payments business
27 days ago
Report job"
